2
THE BLACK STEED OF THE PRAIRIES.
A TALE OF THE ROCKY MOUNTAINS.
The
life of the American Indian is not so destitute of the
interest
created by variety of incident, as might be supposed by a
casual observation of the habits of this singular race. It is true
that the simple structure of their communities, and the sameness
of their occupations, limit the Savage within a narrow sphere of
thought and action. Without commerce, agriculture, learning, or
the arts, and confined to the employments of war and hunting,
the general tenour of his life must be monotonous. His journies
through the unpeopled wilderness, furnish him with no
information
as to the modes of existence of other nations, nor any
subjects
for reflection, but those which nature supplies, and with
which he has been familiar from childhood. Beyond his own
tribe, his intercourse extends only to savages as ignorant as
himself
,
and to traders but little elevated above his own moral
standard
.
But there are, even in savage life, seasons of great excitement,
and instances often occur in which individuals are drawn into
adventures of the most singular and perilous description. The
state of war is prolific of those chances and changes which call
forth the energies of individual character; and the chase, when
pursued not merely for spot, but as a serious occupation, in wilds
frequented for the same purpose by hostile bands, becomes really
what the poet has described it,
Mimicry of noble war.
The following legend exemplifies some of the accidents of this
singular mode of existence, and shows the training, by which the
Indian youth are prepared to encounter dangers, and achieve
exploits
,
which would seem incredible to those who are unacquainted
with the habits of that remarkable race.
Our scene lies in a region seldom visited by civilized men, and
only known to us through the reports of the adventurous trappers
who seek there the solitary haunts of the beaver, and of a few
travellers of the more intelligent class, who have been led thither
by scientific curiosity or missionary zeal. We stand upon the
Eastern declivity of the Rocky Mountains, and see stretched
before
us the Great Plain, which extends thence to the frontier
settlements
of the United States. Around us are immense bulwarks
of rock, towering towards the sky in all the gigantic magnificence
of mountain scenery, while we see below us, in beautiful contrast,
an interminable carpet of verdure, extending to the distant
horizon
.
The rays of the morning sun have lighted up the mountain
sides, and are reflected from peaks covered with snow, while the
mists of the dawn are reposing upon the prairie, whose rich
pastures
display the luxuriance of the summer vegetation.
The Flatheads of the Rocky Mountains were encamped in
one of the gorges of the Eastern declivity of that Ridge. The
spot was wild and secluded, indicating the cautious habits of the
people who had thus concealed their temporary residence in one
of the most inaccessible spots of that inhospitable wilderness. It
was a deep ravine, bounded on either side by parapets of solid
rock, whose rugged peaks towering upward to an immense height,
concealed and shaded the narrow glen, so as to wrap it in
perpetual
gloom. A strip of ground margining a small rivulet that
leaped in a succession of cascades down the gorge, afforded a
pathway accessible in most places for but a single horseman,
but sometimes spreading out to a width sufficient to accommodate
a small encampment.
In one of those nooks, which might have suited the ascetic
fancy of a misanthrope who desired to separate himself from his
species, the Flatheads had pitched the skin lodges, that formed
their only habitation throughout the year. It was the village
of a migratory people, habituated to sudden changes of residence,
and always ready to move at a moment's warning, with all their
population and property. Their horses, whose rough coats
showed
continual exposure to the weather, were browsing upon the
scanty herbage that grew along the banks of the rivulet;
sentinels
were posted in the defiles leading to the village and by which
alone it could be approached, while a watchman perched like an
eagle upon one of the tallest peaks, but concealed in the shadows
of the grey rock, looked abroad upon the neighbouring plain, and
upon the mountain passes, to give due notice of any approaching
danger. Even the children, as they dabbled in the brook or
climbed the precipices, seemed instinctively jealous of danger,
throwing up their dark eyes, and silently exchanging glances, if
an owl hooted, or a vulture sailing aloft threw his shadow in the
glen; and the dogs, with slouched tails, pointed ears, and wild
eyes, skulked about with the stealthy pace of the wolf.
These appearances, indicating a quick sense of surrounding
danger, were characteristic of the habitual watchfulness of this
band, who lived in continual terror of the Blackfeet, a tribe much
more numerous than themselves, and noted as well for their
predatory
habits, as for the ruthless ferocity which marked their
conduct
towards their enemies. To the Flatheads especially they
bore an irreconcilable hatred, which was indulged in an
unremitting
and unsparing warfare. There was a great disparity in
numbers between the two tribes, the Flatheads being a very small
band, while the Blackfeet were numerous, so that they never met
on equal terms, and although their battles were often desperate,
they were usually unsought by the weaker party. Both were
wandering tribes, having no fixed boundaries or settled habitations,
and deriving a precarious subsistence from the chase; but the
Blackfeet were the banditti of the mountain country, a fighting,
thieving, cut-throat nation, who made themselves formidable to all
who fell in their way, and observed no rule of justice unless it
was that of plundering alike the white man and the Indian, and
being terrible equally to friend and foewhile the Flatheads
were a fugitive people, pursued continually by their relentless
enemies, whom they had no hope of escaping but by cunning and
swiftness of foot.
The Flatheads are in many respects an interesting people.
Though inclined to peace, they are brave, and well trained in all
the arts of war and the chase, and when compelled to turn upon
their enemies, they fight with the desperation of men who expect
no quarter, and often succeed in beating off a force greatly
superior
to their own. Few of the savage tribes exhibit such
simplicity
of character. Wretchedly poorwith no property but
their horses and their arms, both of which are often lost in their
sudden flightsand having no means of subsistence but the chase,
which, precarious as it always is, is rendered more so, by the
persecutions of their enemies, they are yet a hospitable people.
The stranger always finds a welcome in their camp, and a share of
their pittance of food. They are considered honest and
inoffensive
.
The grasp of poverty, which often renders the heart
callous
,
not only to the generous sympathies of our nature, but also
to the simple obligations of good faith, has exerted no sinister
influence
upon the character of this tribe; nor has their unhappy
state of peril, and watchfulness, and flight, rendered them mean
or cruel. In all the moral qualities they rather excel than fall
below the standard of savage character, and compare well with
the tribes around them, in every thing but power. Perhaps if
they were stronger they might be less virtuous.
The Arab and his graceful courser, are not more constant
companions
than the Flathead and his steed, in whose services he
finds safety as well as convenience. Snuffing the approach of
danger in every tainted breeze, he throws himself upon the back
of his horse, on the slightest alarm, and flies with the speed of the
wild antelope of the prairies. He is fearless in his horsemanship,
and manages that noble animal with surpassing grace and skill,
even without the aid of rein or saddle, which he uses for
convenience
rather than necessity.
Among the exercises with which these Indians while away the
few and far distant intervals of security, which may be devoted
to manly sports, feats of horsemanship hold the highest rank. On
such occasions it is not uncommon for a young Indian to exhibit
his address, by mounting an untamed steed, just captured upon
the plains where these noble animals run wild. The horse,
perhaps
the noble-spirited leader of a herd, whose strength and speed
has long enabled him to set all pursuit at defiance, is brought to
the starting place properly bound, but without saddle or bridle.
The rider mounts upon the bare smooth back of the sleek and
nervous animal, holding in one hand a small flag attached to a
short staff, and in the other a hoop covered with a dried skin,
somewhat in the fashion of a tamborine. When firmly seated,
the animal is turned loose, and dashing off, endeavours, by
desperate
plunges, to disengage himself from the resolute savage, who,
clinging by his legs to the furious steed, retains his place in spite
of every effort of the enraged animal to dislodge him. If in this
contest of physical activity, the horse seems likely to gain the
advantage
,
the rider throws the flag over his eyes, and tames his
spirit by depriving him of light, at the same time terrifying the
blinded animal, by striking him on the head with the sonorous
hoop. With the latter also he changes the course of the horse
by striking one side of the head or the other, and by a skilful
use of both these simple aids, the subdued animal is brought back
to the starting place, and again made to traverse the plain in any
desired direction, until, worn down by fatigue and terror, he
submits
to the weaker but more intelligent being, who is destined to
become his master.
Such is the tribe to whom the pale-faced stranger, in his pride,
has given a name, not known to those who bear it, nor descriptive
of any personal peculiarity existing among them, for the heads of
the Flatheads are not flatter than those of their neighbours;
neither have the Blackfeet, blacker feet than other Indians. We
use these names, however, as we find them.
On the morning to which we have alluded, a party composed
of the most effective men of the Flatheads, were preparing to hunt
the buffalo upon the prairies. Their best horses having been
selected
,
they were getting every thing in readiness for an
expedition
which might be extended to several weeks. The remainder
of the band, with all the women and children, were in the
meanwhile
to retire still further into the recesses of the mountain, to
remain concealed in its solitary glens, subsisting upon roots and
herbage, and such small game as chance might throw in their
way.
A curious observer of the workings of the human mind might
have found rich materials for reflection, in the cheerfulness with
which all parties to this proceeding prepared for the approaching
separation. It was probable that many of those who thus parted
would meet no more. The noble sport of hunting the buffalo is
not a thing to be done in a corner. The herd must be sought in the
broad pastures, where the game is won by the fleet-footed horse,
and the swift arrow. All concealment was to be thrown aside;
the secret paths of the mountain, its nooks and hiding places, were
to be abandoned, and the hunters were to ride forth in the light of
day, upon a plain broad and level as the ocean. Like a little
fleet of defenceless merchantmen, venturing upon a sea swarming
with hostile cruisers, their best chance of escape lay in the
possibility
of passing unnoticed. Should they meet any of the
numerous
bands of the Blackfeet, who roved over the same plains, they
must fly with scarcely a hope that all would escape, or fight with
the certainty of being overmatched by superior numbers.
Nor was there more safety for those who remained in the
mountains. Although so poor as to possess nothing to tempt the
spoiler, their enemies pursued them with an eagerness for which
it would be difficult to assign an adequate motive, to those who
are unacquainted with the savage character, and who could
scarcely understand how the mere lust of carnage, whetted by
continual indulgence, becomes a master passion of the soul,
irrespective
of any desire for plunder or conquest, or of any present
or prospective advantage. Neither infancy, nor imbecility, nor
sex, affords any protection; as man bruises the head of the
serpent
,
so does the Indian crush the offspring of his enemy; and the
absence of the warrior only entices the brutal destroyer to seek
his prey with redoubled diligence.
Yet with such perils lowering on every side, the Flatheads
were apparently free from care. If they thought of the
casualties
which might sever the dearest ties, the reflection had lost the
freshness, which gives poignancy to sorrow, and had become
familiar
by frequent contemplation. The men were pointing their
arrows, or decorating their persons with paints and feathers; and
the women were attending to their domestic employments, with
as much tranquillity as if they, with their sons and husbands, had
already passed through the dark valley of the shadow of death,
and were now resting in the happy hunting grounds of the spirit
land.
Having made these explanations for the benefit of such of our
readers as may not be familiar with the society and manners of
the Aborigines, we proceed to the business of our story. At a
spot where the waters of the rivulet had collected into a
transparent
pool, stood a young girl, who had just filled a skin with
water
,
and was about to return with her burthenfor the young
females
of this nation, like the Hebrew maids of old, are employed
in all the various offices of domestic labour, and strange as it may
seem, to introduce a heroine thus engaged, our regard for the
sacred
obligations of truth, obliges us to state the fact, as we find it.
It was Bachitucky, or the White Cherry Blossom, the daughter
of the Peace Chief, the personage having the highest place of
authority
within the precincts of the village, and she excelled all the
maidens of the village in stature and beauty. The superiority
of her charms were universally admitted, and what was equally
remarkable she understood her own advantages quite as well as
others, and improved them by an attention to neatness and
costume
which was not usual even in the best circles of the
Flatheads
.
As she turned from the pool, a youth stood before her,
armed, but not painted, nor wearing any of the ornaments
appropriate
to the Indian warrior. He evidently sought an interview,
which the girl did not seem to avoid, and both stood for a moment
in silence. It was an awkward situation, as any gentleman will
testify, who has found himself in the presence of his lady love,
having something special to say, but wanting boldness to say it.
She was the first to break silence, and laughed coquettishly, as
she inquired:
Why does Ishtakka stand in the wayhas he anything to
say to the White Cherry Blossom?
Not much, replied the youth, in the brief and pointed style
of his people. I have sought you in marriage and have been
refused. For three days I hunted on the great plain, and at last
killed a fine antelope, which I carried last night, as soon as it was
dark, to the lodge of the Peace Chief. I laid it on the ground
before
the lodge, and retired a short distance, and seated myself on
the ground, to watch whether my present would be accepted.
Bachitucky's mother passed out of the tent, and returned, but took
no notice of the antelope. Then I knew that Ishtakka was
considered
as a dog, who was not worthy to marry the daughter of
the Peace Chief.
The Peace Chief does not know Ishtakka, rejoined the girl.
He has never seen him among the braves in the buffalo hunt,
nor heard him recount his deeds at the war pole.
I understand, replied the youth sarcasticallyBachitucky
is very beautiful, and her mother would marry her to a great
chief. She is a wise mother.
Ishtakka is a fool, said the girl; every mother wishes her
daughter to marry a man who can protect her, and hunt for her.
I am as able to hunt as others, exclaimed Ishtakka
vehemently
.
There is not a brave in the nation that can ride better
than I, unless it be Incillo, the war chief, who surpasses all men.
I am not a coward. Whose fault is it that I have not struck an
enemy? They say I am too young, and will not let me ride with
the braves.
If Ishtakka is too young to go to war, he is not old enough to
marry.
Very well; I will go to war. I will hang the scalp of a
Blackfoot upon the war pole in the village. I will kill a buffalo,
and bring the meat and the skin to the lodge of the Peace Chief.
Then I will ask him again for his daughter.
Now you speak wisely, replied the girl. When you are
mounted on a fine horse, with your face painted, your neck hung
with the claws of the grisly bear, and your head dressed with the
feathers of the war eagle, then the White Cherry Blossom will be
glad. She will say the Master of Life has given Ishtakka a bold
heart.
And will you listen to me when I am counted among the
braves?
I have no ears to listen to young men, when they speak of
marriage, said the maiden, and then taking the knife from the
belt of her suitor, she plucked a lock of her raven hair, and tying
it firmly round the hilt, added, When Ishtakka goes into
battle
,
let him look at that lock of hair, and it will make him strong.
The White Cherry Blossom cannot promise to be his wife,
because
2*
she is the daughter of a chief who will give her to whom
he pleases, but she will not marry willingly, until Ishtakka
comes to claim her.
So saying, the maiden passed on, and Ishtakka went to seek
the chief, Incillo. Now Incillo was the general, or war chief, of
his nation, and in consequence of his abilities, and popularity, was
in fact the ruler, whose word was law, though the Peace Chief,
who was an old man, presided in the council, and was also called
Father.
This leader having ascended to a commanding eminence, stood
gazing over the plain that lay extended to the eastward of his
retreat
,
scanning with practised eye, every dark spot, and every
object
that seemed to move upon the verdant surface. He was a
man whose appearance would have pointed him out to a casual
observer, as a ruling chief. Not tall, but muscular, his round
compact form, and well-shaped limbs, exhibited those just
proportions
which combine strength with activity, and his bearing was
that of the warrior. His countenance wore that expression of
simplicity and benevolence, that so often characterizes the
physiognomy
of a man of superior intelligence, whose sagacity has
elevated
him above the prejudices of his time and country. Neither
fear, nor hatred, nor any bad passion, was depicted upon his
features
,
whose frank, but sedate and quiet character, was touched
with a reflective cast, that indicated habits of thought, and the
consciousness of responsibility. However reckless his followers
might be, he was evidently one whose well-balanced mind was
awake to the duties and circumstances of his station. The
patriarch
of his people, he discharged the office with the kindness and
vigilance of the parent, tempered with the severe authority of the
chief. He was a hospitable man, and such was the frankness of
his manners, that the stranger was at once impressed with
confidence
in his good faith; while his cheerfulness, his fondness for
the athletic sports of his people, and his intelligence, made him an
agreeable companion.
Retired from his people, the chief was reconnoitering the
surrounding
country, and revolving in his mind the plan of the
projected
march, when Ishtakka stood before hima tall lad who
had attained the height of manhood, while his form and address
were those of the boy.
The chief briefly asked the purport of his visit.
I am no longer a boy, was the reply, I wish to go with the
braves to hunt the buffalo.
Those who go to hunt on the great plain, replied the chief,
may chance to fall in with the Blackfeet, and instead of killing
buffalo, will be obliged to fight in defence of their lives.
It is well, replied the youth, Ishtakka is not afraid.
I should hope that Ishtakka does not know what it is to be
afraid. But there is something more than courage required, to
make a hunter and a brave.
I can ride the wild horse that has just been caught, replied
the youth, and when at full speed I can hit the antelope with my
arrow.
That is well, said the chief, but the brave who follows
Incillo
,
must be wise and very prudent. He must be cunning and
quick-sighted, expert in watching the arts of the enemy, and
skilful
in devising schemes to defeat them.
Ishtakka remained silent for a moment, and then said
modestly
,
These things I expect to learn from seeing them practised.
If I follow the Great Chief, will I not be instructed by his
example
for
who is so wise as Incillo?
The chief replied, My son speaks wisely; it is a good way for
the young men to learn by observing their elder brothers; but we
do not trust any one to take upon himself the character of a brave
until he has proved himself worthy. What has Ishtakka ever
done? Has he ever struck a Blackfoot? Has he taken their
horses? Have their women, when busied about the camp fire,
heard his war-whoop breaking suddenly upon their ears, like the
thunder of the great Manito?
Ishtakka was abashed, and knew not what to reply to the great
chief. After a pause, he said, It is this that makes me ashamed.
I have hitherto been a boy, and have associated only with
children
and women; I now feel strong, and wish to earn a name.
I am willing to be tried. If my father will allow me to follow
the braves to the great plain, he shall see whether I can use my
arms like a man.
It is well, replied the chief: go, young man, and get
ready.
Two days afterwards, the band of hunters, led by Incillo, were
encamped upon the prairie, far from the place at which they had
left their tribe, who had also removed in an opposite direction.
The spot chosen for their hunting camp had little to recommend
it. A small stream trickling along a ravine, and a copse,
scarcely
visible above the level of the plain, furnished water for the
jaded horses, and a covert for temporary concealment, should
danger appear in the distant perspective. At present, not an
object
was seen moving on the broad expanseneither buffalo nor
Blackfeet Indians. The hunters were occupied much after the
fashion of any party of sportsmen, who find a poor lodging after a
hard day's travel: some snored on the grass, some were
examining
the galled backs of their steeds, some repairing their weapons,
a few were chewing some wretched remnants of jerked meat, and
the remainder, though they uttered no complaints, exhibited in
their looks the impatience and dejection of hungry men.
The chief, calling Ishtakka to him, walked apart from the band,
and then addressed him as follows:
[1]
[1]
See Appendix, No. I.
It is necessary for a youth to prove his manhood, before he
can be permitted to associate with braves. He must show that
he may be trusted, and that he is wise to contrive the means to
do things that are difficult. I require of you a small matter; see
that it be well done. To-night, when all are sleeping, separate
yourself from the band, and return to the camp of our people.
Enter it secretly, so that no one shall discover you. In the lodge
of the Peace Chief, directly over the entrance, hangs a knife which
he values highly as a present from Sublette, the great white
trader; at the other end of the lodge is usually placed the pipe
which the Peace Chief uses, when he invites his friends to a feast.
Bring the knife and the pipe to me; and remember that all this
must be done so secretly, that even the owl who looks out from
his hiding place in the night, shall not see a form move, nor hear
the sound of a footstep.
But if I should be discovered
Then you will have failed in what you undertook. The
braves, if they suspect the truth, will laugh at you for attempting
the exploit of a man, while you are yet a boy; if they do not find
out that you returned by my permission, they will despise you as
one who deserted a hunting party, that he might return home to
stealthe Peace Chief will beat you for seeking to rob his lodge,
the women will call upon you to carry their burthens, and the
boys will say, there is one who is too lazy to hunt, and not smart
enough to steal.
And this my father calls a small matter.
It is so, for one who has a bold heart, and a light foot.
I will bring the knife and the pipe, said Ishtakka, or else
the great chief shall never see me again.
That night Ishtakka left the camp secretly, and took up his
solitary journey towards the mountains. When he arrived within
a few miles of the place where the tribe had been encamped, he
abandoned his horse, and went forward with stealthy steps towards
the camp ground, thinking it possible that their departure might
have been delayed. As he approached the spot with cautious
steps, warily listening to catch any sound that might float on the
air, and throwing watchful glances in every direction, he espied
the fresh mark of a horse's foot upon the ground. He stopped,
and looked around with intense anxiety, not daring to move lest
the echo of his own footstep should betray him. All was still.
He advanced a few steps, carefully examining the ground, which
was hard and stony, and was enabled by his native cunning and
keen eye, to ascertain that several horses had passed recently
towards
the place of encampment. Uncertain what course to
pursue
,
he paused to consider. The tracks might be those of stray
animals seeking their former home, or of stragglers from his own
tribe, or of enemies pursuing the Flatheads to their new retreat.
In the latter case there was danger to the tribe, while he stood
personally in immediate and imminent peril. Even at that
moment
,
the keen eye of a Blackfoot scout might be resting upon
him, the bow might be bent to send an arrow to his heart;
whichever
way he turned, he might step into an ambush prepared for
him. But he scorned to retreat, and the idea of abandoning the
adventure entered not his head. Another step brought him to a
projecting angle of the rock, which concealed the site of the late
camp, and peeping cautiously from behind this buttress, he
discovered
that his people had deserted the spot. Not a vestige of the village
remained; but as his eye scanned the scene, in search of some
object which might convey intelligence on the subject now
uppermost
in his thoughts, it fell suddenly on a group whose
appearance
chilled him to the heart. Under the shadow of the same
projection against which he leaned, and but a few yards distant
from him, sat half a dozen Blackfoot warriors, decorated with war
paint, and fully armed, while their jaded horses, with heads and
tails drooped, stood panting around them. They looked like men
who had performed a forced march, upon some secret enterprise,
and whose thoughts were even now intent upon striking a sudden
blow.
One glance satisfied the shuddering youth, who shrunk back,
and began to retire silently from a spot fraught with dangers so
appalling. Regulating his flight with caution and presence of
mind, he stepped so lightly that not an echo rose from his stealthy
tread. He soon began to breathe more freely. His courage rose,
and while he reflected upon the most prudent means to avoid the
danger that threatened himself, he began also to think whether
he might not turn this accident to advantage, by averting the
blow which threatened his tribe. He resolved to make the
attempt
,
and being intimately acquainted with the passes of the
mountain, in that neighbourhood, began to ascend the precipice.
It was not difficult for one so young and active, to gain the height,
and he soon was perched upon an overhanging crag,
immediately
over the spot where the Blackfeet were seated, watching their
motions, and longing with all the avidity of his race for some
means to annoy or alarm them. While thus situated, he chanced
to place his foot upon a large fragment of rock, which yielded to
the pressure; a sudden thought struck him, and stooping down,
he succeeded in shoving it from its place. Down went the mass,
rebounding from crag to crag, crushing the bushes that impeded
its way, and falling in the valley with a loud crash. Upon the
first alarm, the Indian warriors started up, and sprung upon their
horses; at the same instant, terrific yells assailed their ears, from
various directions, for Ishtakka had no sooner despatched his
missile
,
than he uttered a succession of loud and long whoops, which
repeated by a hundred echos, fell upon the valley like the battle
cry of a host. The enemy waited not to ascertain the cause, or
the magnitude of the danger, but urging their horses to full speed,
scampered down the valley in the greatest panic.
Ish-tak-ka laughed at the discomfiture of the Blackfoot
warriors
,
and considered this happy relief from a danger so threatening,
an omen of the most auspicious promise; for the Indian believes
the result of every adventure to depend as much on good fortune,
as on good conduct, and is applauded for success, without much
regard to the means by which it is obtained. And he went
forward
rejoicing in the conviction that he was a lucky man.
Again he resumed his solitary way up the glen, in search of his
people, seeking for their trail upon the ground, and using every
possible
vigilance to conceal himself from any stragglers who might be
loitering in the valley, as well as from the watchmen that should
be posted on the heights. His progress was slow and painful, but
patience and perseverance are cardinal virtues in the Indian
code of honour, and he felt while thus creeping stealthily upon
the haunt of his people, an assurance of the distinction that
awaited his success, as firm as that of the warrior when preparing
for battle, and that gave a pleasing glow of excitement to his toil.
After several days of weary travel, and nights of brief
slumber
,
he found himself in the neighbourhood of the camp, about
which he hovered while daylight lasted, making such
observations
as might be necessary for his purpose, and when night threw
over the wilderness, the curtain which usually affords security to
guilt, while it sometimes lends a shield to valour, the young
Indian
prepared to intrude himself by stealth into the guarded
retreat
of his own people. Having ascertained, during the day, the
positions of the watchmen, it was not difficult for the active and
ardent youth to avoid them; and at the midnight hour he stood in
the midst of the camp.
Wayworn and hungry, a less determined individual might have
lingered to repose, or to procure the means of satisfying the
painful
cravings of appetite. But Ishtakka dared not yield to the
temptation. All his hopes of success and reputation were at
stake; every thing he held dear in life depended on the steadiness
of purpose, with which he should complete an enterprise,
prosecuted
thus far with vigour. He had doubtless received previous
lessons in the art of self-denial, for the earliest maxims
inculcated
upon the Indian mind are those which teach implicit obedience
to their superiors, and to the laws of the tribe, and a rigid
subjection
of their passions. It is this discipline which produces the
forbearance that passes with casual observers for apathy of
temperament
;
for when the restraints which cause it are removed,
the savage gives way to rage, to appetite, or to indolence, not
only like other men, but often to a degree unknown in other forms
of society. Ishtakka, therefore, like the Spartan boy who carried
the fox in his bosom, bore the gnawings of hunger and the pangs
of fatigue, without a murmur, and moved steadily on to the
achievement of his purpose.
He stood in the camp of a fierce clan, who were surrounded
by all the guards that experience and caution could suggest, and
who slept with arms upon their persons, ready to start up on the
slightest alarm. Accustomed to frequent and sudden attacks,
they slept lightly. The bark of a dog, the neigh of a horse, the
cracking of a dried twig, under the foot of the intruder, reaching
some watchful ear, would startle the whole band, and expose him
either to instant death, or a disgraceful discovery. Darkness
and the silence of the grave were around him, and as he stole
with noiseless steps, from lodge to lodge, more than one
watch-dog
crept stealthily towards him, and then scenting a friend,
returned
to his lair.
It was not long before he discovered the lodge of the Peace
Chief, and after pausing a moment to satisfy himself that the
inmates
slumbered, he entered it. All was dark and silent. By
the faint light of a few expiring embers, that glimmered in the
fire-place in the centre of the lodge, he discovered the Peace
Chief and his family, lying with their feet towards the fire, all
buried in slumber. The chief roused himself for a moment, and
turned his face towards the intruder, who carelessly threw
himself
on the ground, as if to sleep, and was taken for one of the
family. While thus reclining, the youth surveyed the interior of
the lodge, and marked the exact position of the articles he was
seeking to purloin, and then again approached the fire, which he
carefully covered up. As he moved, however, for this purpose,
he accidentally touched the foot of the chief's daughterthe very
one whose hand he sought in marriageand she, not dreaming
that any other than one of her own family had thus trespassed on
her repose, gave unconsciously a slight kick,we will not say a
graceful one,which lighted full upon the shoulder of the
intruder
,
as he stooped over the embers, and almost threw him off of
his centre; indeed, it well nigh upset his gravity in more than
one sense, for he could with difficulty restrain himself from
bursting
into a paroxysm of laughter. Resolving to take advantage
of this incident, and, as our party politicians say, make capital
out of it, he gently seized the foot of the sleeping girl, and drew
from it the moccasin, which he secured in his girdle. Pausing
again until all was quiet, he then stepped lightly but quickly to
the spots where the articles he sought were deposited, and having
secured them, made his escape.
A week afterwards Ishtakka, having returned to the spot where
he had left the Flathead band of hunters, and thence followed
the trail of their subsequent wanderings, presented himself before
Incillo. He modestly recounted his adventures, and in
confirmation
of his success, produced the knife and the pipe of the Peace
Chief, which he delivered to his leader.
I will take them and return them to the Peace Chief, said
Incillo. He will be glad that one of our young men has shown
himself so worthy.
I have done something more, added the youth, smiling
archly
,
and showing the girl's moccasin, I took this from the foot of
the Peace Chief's daughter, as she slept, and brought it with me,
to show my father that he had given me an easy task, and that
I was willing to do more than he commanded.
My son has done well, rejoined the chief. He speaks
wisely
also when he says he has done but little. But I am satisfied,
for he who does small things well, may be trusted with greater
matters. Go now and rest until to-morrow; I will then employ
you in something that will require more manhood, than taking a
pipe from the lodge of a peaceable old man, or a moccasin from
the foot of a sleeping girl.
Ishtakka felt somewhat humbled, at the slight commendation
which had been accorded to his exploit, and as he retired to seek
the repose which he needed, pondered on the words of his chief.
Being now in the neighbourhood of large herds of buffalo, the
whole band rode forth early the next morning upon a grand hunt.
They soon reached a commanding point, from whence they could
see the plain covered for miles with these animals, thousands and
tens of thousands of which grazed quietly upon the vast natural
meadow. The Indians had been careful to approach from the
leeward, so that the sagacious herd had not scented them upon
the tainted breeze; and they now sat upon their horses gazing upon
the rich scene, for a brief space, while they divided their force to
attack the game to the best advantage. Ishtakka looked upon
the inspiring prospect with delight, and longed for the
commencement
of the sport, when the hunters who were now silently
surrounding
a portion of the herd, would be seen rushing upon them at full
speed, from various directions, when all the energy and action of
man and horse would be exerted, and the most prodigious feats of
horsemanship and archery would be displayed by these eager
sportsmen. He panted to be among them, and was wondering to
which of the various parties that were filing off, he would be
assigned
,
when Incillo, who, having given his orders, was quietly
looking on, called him to him, and turning his back on the scene
of the proposed hunt, rode slowly off in the opposite direction.
Let Ishtakka listen, said the chief, as they rode side by
side.
The youth signified attention, by the utterance of a single
syllable
,
well known to those who have mingled in the society of the
Rocky Mountains.
Many days journey from here, and in that direction,
continued
the chief, pointing with his hand, there is a camp of our
mortal enemies the Blackfeet. Among them is a war chief, who
is called the `Killer of men,' on account of his numerous
victories
,
and his own personal success in battle. He is also
celebrated
as the owner of the `Black Steed of the Prairies,
[2]
[2]
See Appendix, No. II.
a
remarkably
fleet, strong and beautiful horse, of a deep sable,
without
spot or blemish. This noble animal was taken wild upon the
plains, where he was the leader of a herd, and by his fine form
and carriage had attracted the attention of all the hunters. There
was not a brave who did not long to possess this fine steed, who,
as he swept gracefully over the plain, outstripped his fellows in
swiftness, as much as he excelled them in beauty; and many
attempts were made to catch him, but all in vain, until he fell into
the hands of his present master, who soon rendered him perfectly
manageable.
Ishtakka has an eye, and knows a good horse when he sees
him. He cannot mistake any other for the Black Steed of the
Prairies. Should he see him among a thousand, he will remark
his small head carried high above all others, his slender ear
pointed
forwards, his large eye full of fire and courage, his fine limbs,
and a tail that trails like that of the fox. Now listen to my
words: Ishtakka would be ranked among the braves. Let him
show that his heart is bold, that his hand is quick, and that his
foot is so light that even the dry leaves do not rustle as he walks.
My son must bring me the horse of the Blackfoot chief. I have
no more to say.
Incillo has spoken, was the brief reply of the youth, who,
perplexed by the difficulty of the enterprise allotted him, remained
lost in reflection, while the chief dashed off at full speed towards
his people, and was soon engaged in the animating chase of the
buffaloes, who were now flying in every direction.
[3]
[3]
See Appendix, No. III.
No light adventure was that which our young hero had
undertaken
.
It was not merely the fire of youthful courage, burning
for distinction, nor the audacity of inexperienced valour,
underrating
the danger of the enterprise, nor yet the brazen front that
would look down opposition by seeming to despise it, that could
ensure success in such an exploit. The sage Incillo knew well
that courage is the common possession of all who are bred in the
habits of a military people, and that the more valuable qualities
of coolness and sagacity, are to be implanted and cultivated by
disciplineby that experience and self-reliance, which renders
the warrior alert, vigilant, and fertile of expedient. He imposed,
therefore, upon the youth, a task which would bring into exercise
all his mental and physical resources, and which, instead of
giving
play to an impetuous courage, would require caution,
patience
,
and self-control. The adventurer must travel alone over
a vast tract of wilderness, providing subsistence for himself and
his horse without unnecessary exposure, and eluding any parties
of the enemy he might chance to meet. He must find the village
of the Blackfeet, and if that tribe should have moved, or the chief
he sought to despoil be absent, must follow their trail over the
boundless prairie, or through the defiles of the mountain, exposed
continually to capture and death. He must enter by stealth the
well-guarded camp of a hostile people, seize and remove his
intended
prize, and at last, effect his escape from the inevitable
pursuit
of a numerous and well-mounted band, expert in all the
strategy of savage warfare.
The motives of human action, and all the springs of thought,
are so dependent upon the modifications of society, that it is
scarcely possible to reason confidently upon the one, where we
are not familiar with the other. It would be difficult therefore to
convey to any sentimental or romantic reader,supposing that
reader to be a civilized man or maiden,any adequate idea of
the feelings of a young savage, pricking forth like an errant
knight upon his first adventure, with a vast field of unknown
perils before him, and lady-love at home, who was waiting to be
made happy by his success, or wretched by his failure.
We may suppose, however, that Ishtakka went forward upon
his almost hopeless journey, with feelings such as usually
accompany
the youth upon his first battle-fieldwith a trepidation
allayed
by the reflection, that as thousands have passed harmless
through the same danger, he would probably be equally fortunate,
though he could scarcely imagine the possibility of escaping the
natural result of such perilswith a hope, that as laurels had
been gathered upon such fields, he too would gain the proudest
honours, though wholly ignorant how they should be won. Thus
are the visions of youth gladdened by the happy faculty of
turning
the eye from gloomy realities to bright illusionsof fixing the
gaze upon a distant and alluring object, while the obstacles that
lie near are overlooked. And thus Ishtakka went boldly
forward
,
hoping and believing he should win, though he scarcely
knew how or where to seek the prize, and had matured no plan
to guide his steps. He depended on his luck, and where is the
light-hearted youth, who ever doubted his own good fortune?
Passing over many long days of tedious travel, and nights of
solitary repose, varied chiefly by storm and sunshine, by hunger
and repletion, behold our hero in the vicinity of the enemy's
camp. He has abandoned his horse, and is lurking about in
holes and hiding places, watching the Blackfeet, who are riding
to and fro over the plain. When they approach him he creeps
into a ravine, or conceals himself in a thicket until they pass,
then he looks out again and watches every passer with a keen and
anxious eye. Happily their dogs have not scented him, for if
discovered
,
speedy and sorrowful would be the end of his adventure.
Among those who rode near the place of his concealment, was
the owner of the Black Steed, and Ishtakka trembled with
excitement
as he beheld the object for which he had made so bold a
venture. He marked the noble animal, graceful and full of fire,
whose hoofs seemed to rebound with an elastic spring, as they
touched the ground, and the rider, a fine warlike man, of large
frame and stern countenance, whose bearing was that of a mighty
chief. Great would seem the disparity between that proud
warrior
,
and the weary and squalid boy, who dared to come as a
spoiler to his dwelling.
That night as Ishtakka sat, viewing the expiring fires of the
camp, and pondering in his mind how to effect an entrance, a
number of women, carrying burthens, passed along the path near
which he was sitting. Instantly forming his plan, he seized a
small log that lay near, wrapped it in his blanket, and threw it
over his back, in a manner to resemble the loads borne by the
women. Bending his body forward, he slyly joined the company;
the tired and heavy-laden women not noticing the addition to their
numbers. Adroitly placing himself in the rear, where he would
attract least notice, he entered the village with them, and as they
separated to go to their respective lodges, he went apart, and sat
down by the trunk of a large tree.
Soon all was silent, and he began to wander about the village
in search of the Black Steed. Here and there he met persons,
wrapped in their blankets, and moving with noiseless steps: he
did not stop to inquire their business, and they, imitating his good
manners, or equally willing to avoid recognition, suffered him to
pass unchallenged. He found several places where groups of
horses were secured, but without discovering the one he sought;
and fearing to excite attention by too minute a scrutiny, he was
about to abandon the village for the night, when he perceived a
horse standing before one of the lodges. Walking boldly up, he
discovered, to his great joy, that it was the one he was seeking;
the colour, as nearly as he could tell by the murky starlight, was
black, the hair, unlike that of most of the Indian horses, was
smooth and silky to the touch, and the form was not to be
mistaken
.
The entrance of the lodge was unclosed, and as he stooped
down to seek the end of the halter for the purpose of unloosing it,
he discovered, to his surprise, that it was held in the hand of a
sleeping man.
It was no doubt the bold and wary chief, the Killer of many
men, who, in consequence of previous attempts to steal so
valuable
an animal, had adopted this singular plan of securing him.
He paused to consider how he should separate the halter from the
hand that grasped it firmly even in sleep; and now when about
to succeed or to fail, in the scheme which had been prosecuted
through such peril and fatigue, and when a single movement of
his body, would consign him to immediate death, or gain a trophy
which would place him high in honour among the braves of his
nation, a nervous tremour shook his frame, and for a moment
rendered him incapable of action. As he paused, to regain
composure
,
the tempting thought occurred, of enhancing the brilliancy
of the exploit, by the death of the chief. A new vigour braced
his nerves. He grasped his knife; his finger touched the lock
of hair placed there to remind him of the prize he sought; a step
brought him within striking distance; he stooped over the tall
form of the slumberer, and with a rapid blow buried his knife in
the heart of his victim. Thrice did he repeat the blow, in quick
succession, while he grasped the dying man so as to suppress the
sound of his voice. In a moment all was over. He took the
scalp from the slaughtered chief, and disengaging the halter from the
now powerless hand, led away his prize. There was less
difficulty
in leaving the encampment; all were asleep but the
watchmen
,
and these made no question of one passing outwards.
When Ishtakka returned to his people, several weeks had
elapsed
since his departure, and the place of encampment had again
been changed. But he traced them from place to place, and
when he rode into the village mounted on the Black Steed, many
looked at him, and exchanged glances, but no one asked him any
question. He alighted at the lodge of his mother, who, without
speaking, led away the horse. Entering the lodge, he sat down,
without noticing any one, threw aside his arms and remained
silent
until his mother placed food before him, which he devoured
greedily, for he had not eaten any thing for several days. Then
raising his head, he spoke to one and another of the family, as if
he had been absent but a few hours, and then, gradually, in reply
to their questions, detailed some of the prominent events that had
occurred to him. Such is the custom of the American Indian.
Presently he saw that the chiefs and principal men had seated
themselves round the war pole, and he went and took his seat
among them. Incillo lighted a pipe, and it was passed round.
Then the chief said,
Ishtakka has taken the Black Steed of the Prairies.
He has also struck the Killer of Men, added the youth,
displaying
the scalp.
He then narrated his adventures, which so delighted his
auditors
,
that they danced the war dance, and Ishtakka was declared
worthy to go to war with the braves. He offered the black horse
to Incillo, but the chief insisted on his retaining the steed, which
he had won with such persevering courage.
And now Ishtakka, mounted on the Black Steed of the Prairies,
rode gallantly among the braves of his nation, exciting universal
envy and admiration, for no man was so well mounted, and the
grace and dexterity of his horsemanship could not be excelled.
It was a noble sight to see him in the chase, overtaking the
buffalo
with perfect ease, and riding fearlessly abreast of the fiercest
bull, guiding his horse by the inclination of his own body, and the
pressure of his heel, and discharging his arrows with fatal
certainty
.
In vain did the enraged animal turn suddenly upon his
pursuer, with a fury that in most cases would have hurled horse
and rider upon the plain, for the Black Steed, with an instinct
equal to his spirit, would evade the attack by nimbly springing
aside, and by a few vigorous bounds would again place himself
in a position from which Ishtakka could discharge his arrows.
In the pursuit of an enemy, in battle or in flight, the young
warrior was equally fortunate; his sagacious steed seemed on
every occasion to catch the spirit of his rider, or to possess a
native
sagacity and courage, which bore him into the thickest of the
battle and carried him triumphantly through every danger;
showing, in servitude, the same pride, which had marked him as
the noblest of his race, when he roved through his native pastures
as the leader of his herd.
After several successful expeditions, Ishtakka returned to the
village with his head ornamented by three feathers of the war
eagle, indicating the number of foes he had slain. So greatly
did the Flatheads pride themselves upon the precocious
destructiveness
of the young brave, that Incillo, the war chief, caused
several of his fattest dogs to be killed, and made a great feast, at
which they gave Ishtakka a new name of no less than fifty
syllables
,
which signified, when interpreted,
He that stole the horse
of horses, and killed the killer of many men
which name,
however
,
on account of its inconvenient length, we shall not attempt
to use in this narrative, but adhere to that with which the reader
has become familiar.
These fine doings made a wonderful stir in the Flathead village,
and were not unobserved by the Peace Chief and his wife.
We were very foolish, said she, in not giving our
daughter
to Ishtakka. He is a fine young man; what were you
thinking
of not to see it? I always thought well of him.
It was very foolish of you, sure enough, replied the
husband
,
to refuse so good an offer. You know you always have
your own way.
So they both were satisfied with their own sagacity, and each
was vexed that the other had not been gifted with the power of
foreknowledge. But although the course of true love had, as
usual, not run smooth, the stream was neither exhausted nor
diverted
from its destined channel, but was now rippling gayly along,
margined by flowers, and sparkling in the sunbeams of success.
In the fulness of time the young brave renewed his suit, and was
accepted, and the marriage was solemnized immediately.
At a feast given on that occasion, several of the warriors
related
anecdotes of their adventures. Among others an old man
rose, and delivered a speech to the following effect:
[4]
[4]
See Appendix, No. IV.
Chiefs and braves! I am an old manmy head is white
I am like a tree blasted by lightning from the hand of the Master
of Life. But I was not always withered as I am now. Young
sprouts were nourished under my protectionthey will show what
I was. It is not of myself that I am going to speak, but of one
that I nourished when he was a little child.
Chiefs and brothers, listen! Here stands our brother that
stole the horse of horses, and killed the killer of many men.
Listen!
He that speaks to you was once a young brave. He could
strike the enemythe scalps of the Blackfeet were hung up in his
lodgebut his heart was softhe had pity on a little boy. The
Master of Life put it in his heart to spare a small child from
death. Listen!
Fathers and brothers, listen! We had struck the Blackfeet,
and they were not able to stand against us. We rushed into their
camp, in the night, and they fled. One bold woman having
dropped
her child, turned back, and fought over it like a she-wolf.
She was knocked down, and left among the dead. I seized the
child, and was about to bury my knife in his body, when a good
bird whispered in my ear not to kill him. The good bird said,
He will surely become a great bravethe Great Spirit loves him,
and will make him an honour to the Flatheads. Then I listened
to that good bird, and brought the boy home, and gave him to our
brother the Arrow, who had lost a son.
Fathers and brothers, I have not much more to saylisten!
He that speaks to you told the Arrow what the good bird said; so
he adopted the boy and brought him up as his own. The Arrow
is no more. His bones are whitehis spirit is gone to the happy
land. His widow is alone, but the Great Spirit took pity on her.
That little boy that she took to be her son, has grown up to be a
great brave. There he stands!
3
Grey-headed fathers, and you too, my brothers, listen! That
good bird did not lie. The boy has become a man. The
Blackfeet
have felt the weight of his war-clubhis war-whoop has
made them tremble. He has taken the horse of horses from the
hand of their chief, and killed the killer of many men. I have
no more to say.
So it appeared that Ishtakka was by birth a Blackfoot. This
fact had been well known to all the Flatheads, yet they neither
loved nor trusted him the less; nor was there any reason for want
of confidence, for he was as faithful to them as if he had been a
native. There is no feature in the savage character more
singular
than this. Hostile tribes hate each other with an excessive
rancour, which is cherished and handed down from one
generation
to another. Every art is used by the leaders to increase and
perpetuate this aversion; and such is the antipathy existing
between
many tribes, that individuals have professed to know an
enemy in the dark, by the scent, or the touch, and to shrink from
each other's presence with a loathing, like that which some
persons
feel towards a noxious reptile. They murder women and
children as men crush serpents, not from a sense of present
danger
,
but out of hatred for the race. But if in a moment of
caprice
they resolve to spare the detested offspring of an enemy, it
becomes at once an object of fondness. The stain of birth is
instantly
removed. The young stranger is so unreservedly
adopted
,
as to become completely identified with the stock into which
he is engrafted. If Ishtakka knew his own origin, it is not
probable
that the knowledge ever cost him a moment of uneasiness,
nor perhaps a moment of serious thought.
A few months only had elapsed after the events last narrated,
when the Flathead village was thrown into a panic, one morning,
by the news that the Black Steed was missing. He had been
secured in the very centre of the village, around which sentinels
watched in every direction; yet he had been taken away, and no
trail was found to indicate the direction pursued by the spoiler.
Some shook their heads mysteriously, and whispered to each other
their suspicions that the Black Steed was a medicinea spirit
a manito, who had tarried with the Flatheads just as long as was
perfectly convenient and agreeable to himself, and had then
vanished
,
or transformed himself into some other shape. He might
be lurking near, in some den, in the form of a great rattlesnake,
or hovering over their heads in that of a vulture, or grinning at
them through the teeth of a raccoon, from an overhanging ledge
of rock. The old women thought it prudent to speak of him but
briefly, and in terms of marked respect. Several braves were
now ready to testify what had not been suggested beforethat
they had often, when following the Black Steed, looked for his
tracks, but had uniformly been disappointed; this wonderful
horse having the faculty of passing over the ground with the
swiftness of the wind, without leaving the print of his footsteps.
There were some veteran warriors, who could have told, had they
chosen, how horses had been taken with such adroitness as to
leave no mark nor sign to betray the hand of the marauder; and
Ishtakka himself had no doubt that the Blackfeet, mortified by
the disgrace of having so noted an animal taken audaciously from
the midst of their encampment, had redeemed the character of
their nation by a recapture equally expert. But the medicine
men, and all the women, hooted at the idea of any human agency
in so mysterious an event, and the braves, whether convinced or
not, acquiesced in silence, as the men usually do every where
when the doctors and the women unite in opinion.
Ishtakka was a sorry man. He had lost the trophy of a
valorous
exploitthe talisman of a brilliant career. He was like the
shorn Sampson, who went to sleep a man of mighty strength, and
awoke from the lap of Delilah to a sense of comparative
insignificance
.
He wandered about moodily for several days. He had
the best reasons in the world for believing the horse to be flesh
and blood, for he had fed and rode him, and almost lived in his
company, for several months, and he knew that the events which
had placed the animal in his possession, were quite as singular as
that which had caused so much wonder. But Indians are prone
to superstition, and when he recalled all the circumstances, his
convictions at times became unsettled, and he doubted whether he
might not have been the sport of some mischievous manito.
Finally he resolved to go in pursuit of the Black Steed; and as
he was impressed with the idea that the proposed enterprise would
be difficult and dangerous, he determined to seek the protection of
the Great Spirit by prayer and abstinence.
Having admonished his wife of his intention, he laid aside all
his ornaments, blacked his face as one mourning under calamity,
and retired to a solitary place, where he remained three days
without food. A part of this time he spent in prayer to the
Master
of Life, and in various incantations to disarm the malice of
evil manitos, and during the intervals between these exercises he
sate in silence, banishing sleep by torturing his flesh with thorns,
and by other cruel devices. Morning and evening he bathed, and
afterwards blacked his face, smeared his body with earth, placed
earth upon his head, and called upon the Master of Life to take
pity on him, and to drive away the bad manitos who had planned
his destruction.
On the morning of the fourth day he washed himself, and
having
returned to his lodge, directed his wife to kill a dog and
invite
his friends to a feast. A crier was accordingly sent out into
the village, who proclaimed that certain persons, whom he named,
were invited to the lodge of Ishtakka to partake of a feast which was
now ready, and advising them to come soon, and to bring their own
bowls and spoons. The guests were quickly assembled, and
Ishtakka
appeared before them with a cheerful countenance, freshly
anointed with bear's oil, painted with vermilion, and adorned
with war feathers and trinkets. The canine feast was consumed,
but the entertainer said nothing of his design; and when they had
smoked, the guests thanked him for the comfortable cheer they
had enjoyed, wished him good luck, and all dispersed to their own
lodges. The next morning Ishtakka was absent; no one knew
whither he had gone, but all guessed that he was upon some
dangerous
adventure.
Various are the perils that beset the solitary traveller in the
wilderness, and many there are who perish in the great forests
and upon the vast plains of Western America, though the greater
number of those who traverse them, avoid or escape the dangers
which would seem insurmountable to civilized men. When the
earth is covered with snow, or parched by drought, those
animals
which furnish game to the hunter are no longer to be seen;
while at other times, even when surrounded by plenty, the loss
of his weapons, or any injury which renders them useless,
deprives
the lone traveller of the wilderness of the means of
subsistence
.
Ishtakka had his full share of difficulties. There were some
evil spirits who delighted to torment him, and at every step he
experienced
their malign influence. After travelling a few days
over verdant prairies, he came to a region of parched sand, that
was destitute of herbage, affording no food for man or beast. Two
vultures, who were probably malignant spirits in that shape,
pursued
him for several days, hovering in the air above him by day,
and perching near him at night, awaiting the hour when they
might gorge themselves with the flesh of the worn-out traveller.
When he slept, these horrid creatures flapped their wings over
his head, and when he awoke it was to see their eyes gloating
upon him in hungry desire. His mouth was parched by thirst,
and his limbs emaciated by want of sustenance. His starved
horse became lame and galled, and at last sunk under him, and
then, leaving the expiring beast a prey to the vultures, Ishtakka
tottered along on foot.
Worn down and famished, the youth arrives at last at the
former camping ground of the Blackfeet, and finds the place
deserted
.
He crawls about in search of some cast-off fragment of
food, or of some living or creeping thing that might be devoured,
and sustain for the present the life that was fast ebbing, but
without
success. A gaunt dog, that ran howling away at the sight
of a rival tenant of the solitude, had gleaned the miserable
leavings
of the departed horde.
At a distance he perceived a pole standing upright, with a
bunch of feathers waving at the top; and creeping towards it, he
found it to be erected on a small, newly-made mound of earth,
indicating the grave of some distinguished person. He could go
no further; and retiring into a thicket which might shelter him
from the night breeze, he laid down to sleep, and perhaps to die.
The sun had gone down, and the mellowed hues of twilight
were gathered over the landscape;the wind was hushednot
a foot nor a wing stirred on the broad prairie, and all was still.
The tramp of men was hearda party of Blackfoot braves slowly
approached, and arranging themselves around the grave, stood in
silence. At that moment a bird perched upon a neighbouring
tree, began to pour out the rich and full melody of his song; and
they who stood about the sepulchre listened in sadness, as if they
recognised a voice that sympathized in their grief. Then
Ishtakka
knew that the grave was that of a great warrior; that
the braves who had followed him in battle were gathered around
the spot where his remains were deposited, to do honour to his
memory, and that his spirit, in the shape of a bird, was speaking
to them, and showing how grateful was that homage from his
friends, and telling them he was happy in the land of the blessed.
[5]
[5]
See Appendix, No. V.
The mourners retired. One figure only remained; it was a
woman who sate by the grave and wept bitterly. Ishtakka,
refreshed
a little by the cool breeze of the evening, crawled from
his hiding-place and sat down near her. Bodily anguish had
softened his heart, and he was touched by the sorrows of this poor
woman. She raised her head and looked for a moment towards
the intruder, and then resumed her wailing. After a while she said,
Why do you sit there watching me? Is it strange to see a
woman mourning by the grave of her husband?
I am a strangera poor famished travellerthe sun and the
moon have risen and gone down several times since I have tasted
foodI am dying of thirst, and am too much exhausted to seek
for water.
I pity you, but I cannot help you. I have crawled here to
die by the bones of the great chief, the
Killer of many men
.
What name was that? inquired the youth with a broken
voice.
Are you a Flathead, that his name makes you tremble?
I am a Flathead; but the name you mention does not scare
me. I never feared a Blackfoot, living or dead. If I had the
strength which once belonged to me, I would dance over the
bones of the
Killer of Men
, and laugh at the anger of his spirit;
but it is not with me now as it once was, and I desire to lie down
in peace by the bones of my enemy.
Vagabond and outcast! how dare you speak thus of the
dead! Get thee away from this placehide thyself in the bushes,
and die like a dog in a secret place. Do not stay hereare you
not afraid, villain of a Flathead, that his spirit will rise up and
crush you?
Why should I fear him? retorted the youth; is a spirit to
be feared more than a living man? Did he not fall by the hand
of a Flathead?
No one knows by whose hand he fell, said the woman
angrily
;
some thieves crawled into our camp at night, stole away
his horse, and murdered the great chief. They were not men,
not braves, but cowardly thieves. They stabbed him while he
slept. But it was like the Flatheadsthey do not face men in
open day. Once beforemany years agothey broke into our
hunting camp and seized upon my childI had only one, a little
boyI snatched up a club and fought by the side of my husband
there were but us two, and they were many; but the Killer of
Men was very strong and beat them offthey ran away like
cowards, carrying our child, to murder him in cold blood, at
their leisure.
And you never heard any more of the child?
No, never.
A pause ensued. The woman again spoke,
They were not allowed to keep the Black Steedthat is some
comfortour young men pursued the thieves, and brought back
the horse. It was determined that no one else should ever ride
him. He was killed and buried here
[6]
[6]
See Appendix, No. VI.
the bones of the chief
were deposited in the same placeand this mound was raised over
them. The horse and ride are now together in the happy
hunting
grounds.
The woman ceased speaking.
After a pause the youth inquired,
Had that child a remarkable scar on the left foot?
Yes, he was badly scalded on that foot.
Then Ishtakka said, Listen to me, I have something to say
before I die. It almost kills me to say it. I am too young to
remember
it, but this is what the Flatheads say.Twenty years ago,
a Blackfoot woman stood over her child, with a war-club in her
hand, beating off the Flatheads, that sought to kill it. She was
struck down and left for dead, and the little boy was taken
prisoner
.
A Flathead woman put him to her breast, and he knew no
other mother. He grew up among them, and became a brave. I
am that boy.
The woman started. Her eyes were riveted on the expiring
youth, in an eager effort to ascertain the truth of his disclosure,
by tracing out on his features some mark of the lineage he
asserted
.
Do not claim me as your son, continued the young man,
until you hear the name I hear among the Flatheads. Would
that the Great Spirit had crushed me under his heel, before I won
that dreadful name! They call me,
Him who stole the horse of
horses and killed the killer of many men
.
Dog of a Flathead! exclaimed the woman, springing at him
with the ferocity of an enraged wolf, do you dare to
acknowledge
yourself as the murderer of
him
, and claim to be his son!
The hapless Ishtakka spoke no more. His head was sunk
upon his father's grave, and he was breathing his last.
The wretched mother gazed upon her expiring son with
mingled
emotions of wonder, resentment, and pity. The long
smothered
fire of maternal love burst out anew. Who shall blame
him? she exclaimed. He was nursed in a den of serpents, who
gave him the poison that stung his father. I will go with my son
to the land of spirits, and ask his father to forgive him!
They who came to visit the grave the next day found the dead
bodies of the mother and son clasped together, and although none
knew why they should be thus united in death, a suspicion of the
truth, induced the surviving relatives of the deceased to bury the
bones of the deceased in the mound they had reared over the
warlike
chief. It was observed that the bird sang no more over that
lone grave in the wilderness.
THE WAR BELT.
A LEGEND OF NORTH BEND.
[7]
[7]
See Appendix, No. VII.
In
the year 1786, there stood upon the margin of the Ohio, near
the mouth of the Miami, a small fortress, over which waved the
flag of the United States. The banner was that of a confederacy
which had just emerged from a successful struggle with one of
the most powerful nations of the world, and over which the
illustrious
Washington
presided as Chief Magistrate. In the eye of
a military engineer, the fort would not have deserved that name,
as it was a temporary structure, intended only to protect its small
garrison against a sudden attack by an Indian force. It was
composed of a series of log houses, opening upon an interior area,
while the outer sides, closely connected, formed a quadrangular
rampart, without apertures, except a single entrance, and a few
loop-holes from which to discharge fire-arms. The whole
presented
the appearance of a single edifice, receiving light from the
centre
,
and forming barracks for the garrison, as well as
breastworks
against the foe. The forest was cleared away for some
hundreds of yards around, leaving an open vista, which extended
to the water's edge; and a few acres inclosed in a rude fence,
and planted with corn and vegetables, for the use of the soldiers,
exhibited the first attempt at agriculture in that wild and
beautiful
region.
It will be recollected, that when the shores of the Ohio were
first explored by the adventurous pioneers, no villages were found
upon them; not a solitary lodge was seen along its secluded
waters
.
The numerous and warlike tribes, whose battle-cry was often
3*
heard on the frontier, inhabited the tributary branches of the
Ohio, leaving the immediate shores of that river an untenanted
wilderness, rich in the glorious productions of nature, and
animated
only by the brute and the wild bird, by the lurking hunter
and the stealthy war party. It seemed as if man had been
expelled
from this blooming paradise, and only invaded its flowery
precincts at intervals, to war upon his fellow-man, or to ravage
the pastures of the deer and the buffalo. Historians are not agreed
as to the reasons of this curious arrangement; but we suppose
that the Manito of the Red man had reserved this loveliest of
vallies
to be the happy hunting-ground of the blessed, and that
though living forms were seldom seen within it, the spirits of
warriors
lingered here, to mourn the destiny of their race, and curse
the coming of the white man.
A few adventurous pioneers from Pennsylvania, Virginia, and
North Carolina, had crossed the Alleghanies and settled at
different
places, far distant from each other; but these also were
inland
as respected the great river; the civilized man avoiding its
dangerous shores on the one side, from an instinct similar to that
which induced the Indian to shun a residence upon them on the
other.
All the tribes inhabiting the country north of the Ohio, were at
that time hostile to the American people, and beheld with great
jealousy these migrations into the west, that indicated an intention
to plant a civilized population on this side of the mountains. The
agents also of a foreign power, which saw with dissatisfaction the
growing prosperity of the United States, deemed this a favourable
moment to unite the savage tribes against our young republic,
and they were accordingly instructed to address such arguments
to the chiefs as would be likely to effect that object. Councils
were accordingly held, and arms and trinkets distributed by those
unprincipled emissaries. In consequence of these efforts, the
hostile feelings of the savages, already sufficiently bitter, became
greatly excited; and at the period of which we write, a war with
the combined forces of the north-western tribes seemed inevitable.
The policy of the American government was pacific. They
did not aim at conquest. They desired to extend to the savages
within their borders the same justice by which their foreign
relations
were intended to be governed. Difficult as this proposition
might seem, it was not deemed impracticable. That the
enterprising
and intelligent population of the United States would spread out
from the seaboard over the wilderness; that the savage must
retire
before civilized man; that the desert must be reclaimed from
a state of nature, and be subjected to the hand of art, were
propositions
too evident to be concealed or denied. Had the
government
been disposed to perpetuate the reign of barbarism over the
fairest portion of our country, it could not have enforced its
decree
for a purpose so inconsistent with the interests of the people,
and the spirit of the age. But it never was intended that the
Indian
should be driven from his hunting grounds by violence; and
while a necessity, strong as the law of nature, decreed the
expulsion
of the mere hunter, and gave dominion to art, industry, and
religion, it was always proposed that the savage should be
removed
by negociation, and a just price given for the
relinquishment
of his possessory title.
Had these counsels prevailed, humanity would have been
spared
the anguish and humiliation of blushing for acts of deception,
and weeping over scenes of bloodshed. They did not prevail:
the magnanimous policy of the government remained unaltered;
but many individuals have committed deep wrongs against the
savages, while the latter, misled to their ruin by foreign
interference
,
spurned at the offers of conciliation, the acceptance of
which would have insured to them the strong protection of the
nation.
Such was the posture of affairs, when the little fortress alluded
to was established, at the outlet of the fertile valley of the Miami,
and near the track by which the war parties approached the Ohio,
in their incursions into Kentucky. The position was also that
selected
by Judge Symmes and others, the purchasers from
Congress
of a large tract of country, as the site of a future city;
though a trivial accident afterward changed the locality, and
placed the Queen City of the West at a point twenty miles
farther
up the Ohio. It was near the head of that great bend of the
Ohio, now widely known as North Bend,a spot which has
become
classic ground to the American, as the residence of that
excellent man, and distinguished statesman and soldier, the
venerated
and lamented Harrison. The fort was garrisoned by a
small party of soldiers, commanded by a captain, who was almost
as much insulated from the rest of the world as Alexander Selkirk
in the island of Juan Fernandez.
At this sequestered spot, a treaty was to be held by
commissioners
appointed by the President, with the Shawanoes, a
migratory
and gallant nation, which had fought from South Carolina to
Pennsylvania, along the whole line of the western frontier, and
whose eventful history, unless it has been lately collected by an
ingenious writer who is about to publish a life of Tecumthe,
remains
to be written. It is enough to say of them here, that no
western tribe has produced so many distinguished individuals, or
carried on so constant a series of daring enterprises.
For several days previous to that appointed for holding the
council, parties of Indian warriors were seen arriving and erecting
their temporary lodges at a short distance from the fort. An
unwonted
bustle disturbed the silence which usually reigned at this
retired spot. Groups of savages, surrounding their camp-fires,
passed the hours in conversation and in feasting; the tramp of
horses and the barking of dogs were heard in every direction.
The number of Indians assembled was much greater than was
necessary, or was expected; and their disposition seemed to be
anything but pacific. Irritated by recent events, and puffed up
by delusive promises of support, they wore an offended and
insolent
air. Their glances were vindictive, and their thirst for
vengeance
scarcely concealed. No one acquainted with the savage
character could doubt their intentions, or hesitate for a moment
to believe they only waited to ripen their plan of treachery, and
at a moment which should be most favourable to their purposes,
to butcher every white man in their power.
The situation of the garrison was very precarious. The fort
was a slight work, which might be readily set on fire, and the
number of Americans was too small to afford the slightest chance
of success in open fight against the numerous force of the
Shawanoes
.
The only hope for safety was in keeping them at a
distance
;
but this was inconsistent with the purposes of meeting
them in council, to treat for peace.
Both parties held separate councils on the day previous to that
appointed for the treaty. That of the Indians was declamatory
and boisterous. The caution with which they usually feel their
way, and the secrecy that attends all their measures, seems to
have been abandoned. They had probably decided on their
course, and deeming their enemy too weak to oppose any serious
opposition, were declaiming upon their wrongs, for the purpose of
lashing each other into that state of futy which would give relish
for the horrid banquet at hand, by whetting the appetite for blood.
The American commissioners saw with gloomy forebodings these
inauspicious movements, and hesitated as to the proper course to
be pursued. To treat with savages thus numerically superior,
bent on treachery, and intoxicated with an expected triumph,
seemed to be madness. To meet them in council, would be to
place themselves at the mercy of ruthless barbarians, whose
system
of warfare justified and inculcated every species of stratagem,
however disingenuous. To close the gate of the fortress, and
break up the negociation, would be at the same time a declaration
of war, and an acknowledgment of weakness, which would
produce
immediate hostilities. In either case, this little band of
Americans stood alone, dependent on their own courage and
sagacity
only, and cut off from all hope of support. They were far
beyond the reach of communication with any American post or
settlement. Under these circumstances, it was proposed to
postpone
the treaty, upon some plausible pretence, and to endeavour
to amuse the Indians, while the utmost diligence should be used
in preparing the fort for a siege: and in this opinion all concurred
save one; and happily that one was a master spirit, the
Promethean
fire of whose genius seldom failed to kindle up in other bosoms
the courage that glowed in his own. That man was Colonel
George Rogers Clarke
.
[8]
[8]
See Appendix, No. VIII.
Clarke was a Virginian, of high spirit, and of consummate
skill as a military leader. A series of daring exploits, evincing
a brilliant genius in their conception, executed with accuracy and
energy, and terminating in successful results, had placed his
name in the first class of our revolutionary heroes. It was said
of him, by one who had followed him in battle, He was the
bravest man I ever knew; his courage was governed by a
wisdom
that bore him through whatever he undertook, in security
and in triumph; and one could only see after the event, that it
partook not of rashness nor presumption, although it bore that
appearance
.
The truth was, that this remarkable man, to the
gallant
spirit that belonged to him as a native of Virginia, added a
knowledge of human nature, that enabled him to read and
control
the minds around him, and a promptness and energy of
purpose
,
that no ordinary obstacle could obstruct.
Whatever might have been the real opinion of Colonel Clarke
on this occasion, he treated the idea of danger with ridicule, and
insisted, calmly, cheerfully, even playfully, and in a way that
disarmed all opposition from his colleagues, that the negociation
should go forward.
An apartment in the fort was prepared as a council-room, and
at the appointed hour, the doors were thrown open. At the head
of the table sat Clarke, a soldier-like and majestic man, whose
complexion, eyes, and hair, all indicated a sanguine and
mercurial
temperament. The brow was high and capacious, the
features
were prominent and manly; and the expression, which was
keen, reflective, and ordinarily cheerful and agreeable, was now
grave, almost to sternness.
The Indians, being a military people, have a deep respect for
martial virtue. To other estimable or shining qualities they turn
a careless eye, or pay at best but a passing tribute, while they
bow in profound veneration before a successful warrior. The
name of Clarke was familiar to them: several brilliant
expeditions
into their country had spread the terror of his arms
throughout
their villages, and carried the fame of his exploits to every
council-fire in the West. Their high appreciation of his
character
was exemplified in a striking as well as an amusing manner,
on another occasion, when a council was held with several tribes.
The celebrated Delaware chief, Buckinghelas, on entering the
council-room, without noticing any other person, walked up to
Clarke, and as he shook hands cordially with him, exclaimed, It
is a happy day when two such men as Colonel Clarke and
Buckinghelas
meet together.!
[9]
[9]
See Appendix, No. IX.
Such was the remarkable man who now presided at the council
table. On his right hand sat Colonel Richard Butler, a brave
officer
of the revolution, who soon after fell, with the rank of
brigadier-general
,
in the disastrous campaign of Saint Clair. On the
other side was Samuel H. Parsons, a lawyer from New England,
who afterwards became a judge in the north-western territory.
At the same table sat the secretaries, while the interpreters,
several
officers, and a few soldiers, stood around.
An Indian council is one of the most imposing spectacles in
savage life. It is one of the few occasions in which the warrior
exercises his right of suffrage, his influence and his talents, in a
civil capacity, and the meeting is conducted with all the gravity,
and all the ceremonious ostentation, with which it is possible to
invest it. The matter to be considered, as well as all the details,
are well digested beforehand, so that the utmost decorum shall
prevail, and the decision be unanimous. The chiefs and sages
the leaders and oratorsoccupy the most conspicuous seats;
behind them are arranged the younger braves, and still farther in
the rear appear the women and youth, as spectators. All are
equally attentive. A dead silence reigns throughout the
assemblage
.
The great pipe, gaudily adorned with paint and feathers,
is lighted, and passed from mouth to mouth, commencing with the
chief highest in rank, and proceeding by regular gradation to the
inferior order of braves. If two or three nations be represented,
the pipe is passed from one party to the other, and salutations are
courteously exchanged, before the business of the council is
opened by the respective speakers. Whatever jealousy or party
spirit may exist in the tribe, it is carefully excluded from this
dignified assemblage, whose orderly conduct, and close attention
to the proper subject before them, might be imitated with profit by
some of the most enlightened bodies in christendom.
It was an alarming evidence of the temper now prevailing
among them, and of the brooding storm that filled their minds,
that no properiety of demeanour marked the entrance of the
savages
into the council-room. The usual formalities were
forgotten
,
or purposely dispensed with, and an insulting levity
substituted
in their place.The chiefs and braves stalked in, with an
appearance of light regard, and seated themselves promiscuously
on the floor, in front of the commissioners. An air of insolence
marked all their movements, and showed an intention to dictate
terms, or to fix a quarrel upon the Americans.
A dead silence rested over the group; it was the silence of
dread, distrust, and watchfulness; not of respect. The eyes of
the savage band gloated upon the banquet of blood that seemed
already spread out before them; the pillage of the fort, and the
bleeding scalps of the Americans, were almost within their grasp;
while that gallant little band saw the portentous nature of the
crisis, and stood ready to sell their lives as dearly as possible.
The commissioners, without noticing the disorderly conduct of
the other party, or appearing to have discovered their meditated
treachery, opened the council in due form. They lighted the
peace-pipe, and after drawing a few whiffs, passed it to the chiefs,
who received it. Colonel Clarke then rose to explain the purpose
for which the treaty was ordered. With an unembarrassed air,
with the tone of one accustomed to command, and the easy
assurance
of perfect security and self-possession, he stated that the
commissioners had been sent to offer peace to the Shawanoes;
that the President had no wish to continue the war; he had no
resentment to gratify; and, that if the red men desired peace,
they could have it on liberal terms. If such be the will of the
Shawanoes, he concluded, let some of their wise men speak.
A chief arose, drew up his tall person to its full height, and
assuming a haughty attitude, threw his eye contemptuously over
the commissioners and their small retinue, as if to measure their
insignificance, in comparison with his own numerous train, and
then stalking up to the table, threw upon it two belts of wampum,
of different coloursthe
war
and the
peace
belt.
We come here, he exclaimed, to offer you two pieces of
wampum; they are of different colours; you know what they
mean: you can take which you like! And turning upon his
heel, he resumed his seat.
The chiefs drew themselves up, in the consciousness of having
hurled defiance in the teeth of the white men. They had offered
an insult to the renowned leader of the Long Knives, to which
they knew it would be hard for him to submit, while they did not
suppose he would dare to resent it. The council-pipe was laid
aside, and those fierce wild men gazed intently on Clarke. The
Americans saw that the crisis had arrived: they could no longer
doubt that the Indians understood the advantage they possessed,
and were disposed to use it; and a common sense of danger
caused each eye to be turned on the leading commissioner. He
sat undisturbed, and apparently careless, until the chief who had
thrown the belts on the table had taken his seat: then, with a
small cane which he held in his hand, he reached, as if playfully,
toward the war-belt, entangled the end of the stick in it, drew it
toward him, and then with a twitch of the cane, threw the belt
into the midst of the chiefs. The effect was electric.Every
man in council, of each party, sprang to his feet; the savages,
with a loud exclamation of astonishment, Hugh! the
Americans
in expectation of a hopeless conflict, against overwhelming
numbers. Every hand grasped a weapon.
Clarke alone was unawed. The expression of his countenance
changed to a ferocious sternness, and his eye flashed, but
otherwise
he was unmoved. A bitter smile was slightly perceptible
upon his compressed lips, as he gazed upon that savage band,
whose hundred eyes were bent fiercely and in horrid exultation
upon him, as they stood like a pack of wolves at bay, thirsting for
blood, and ready to rush upon him, whenever one bolder than the
rest should commence the attack. It was one of those moments
of indecision, when the slightest weight thrown into either scale
will make it preponderate; a moment in which a bold man,
conversant
with the secret springs of human action, may seize upon
the minds of all around him, and sway them at his will. Such a
man was the intrepid Virginian. He spoke, and there was no
man bold enough to gainsay himnone that could return the fierce
glance of his eye. Raising his arm and waving his hand toward
the door, he exclaimed:
Dogs! you may go!
The Indians
hesitated for a moment, and then rushed tumultuously out of the
council-room.
The decision of Clarke, on that occasion, saved himself and his
companions from massacre. The plan of the savages had been
artfully laid: he had read it in their features and conduct, as
plainly as if it had been written upon a scroll before him. He
met it in a manner which was unexpected; the crisis was brought
on sooner than was intended; and upon a principle similar to
that by which, when a line of battle is broken, the dismayed
troops fly, before order can be restored, the new and sudden turn
given to these proceedings by the energy of Clarke, confounded
the Indians, and before the broken thread of their scheme of
treachery could be reunited, they were panic-struck. They had
come prepared to brow-beat, to humble, and then to destroy; they
looked for remonstrance, and altercation; for the luxury of
drawing
the toils gradually around their victims; of beholding their
agony and degradation, and of bringing on the final catastrophe
by an appointed signal, when the scheme should be ripe. They
expected to see on our part great caution, a skilful playing off,
and an unwillingness to take offence, which were to be gradually
goaded into alarm, irritation, and submission. The cool contempt
with which their first insult was thrown back in their teeth
surprised
them, and they were foiled by the self-possession of one
man. They had no Tecumthe among them, no master-spirit to
change the plan, so as to adapt it to a new exigency; and those
braves, who in many a battle had shown themselves to be men of
true valour, quailed before the moral superiority which assumed
the vantage ground of a position they could not comprehend, and
therefore feared to assail.
The Indians met immediately around their own council fire,
and engaged in an animated discussion. Accustomed to a
cautious
warfare, they did not suppose a man of Colonel Clarke's
known sagacity would venture upon a display of mere
gasconade
,
or assume any ground that he was not able to maintain; and
they therefore attributed his conduct to a consciousness of strength.
They knew him to be a consummate warrior; gave him the credit
of having judiciously measured his own power with that of his
adversary; and suspected that a powerful reinforcement was at
hand. Perhaps at that moment, when intent upon their own
scheme, and thrown off their guard by imagined security, they
had neglected the ordinary precautions that form a prominent
feature
in their system of tactics; they might be surrounded by a
concealed force, ready to rush upon them at a signal from the
fort. In their eagerness to entrap a foe, they might have blindly
become entangled in a snare set for themselves. So fully were
they convinced that such was the relative position of the two
parties
,
and so urgent did they consider the necessity for immediate
conciliation, that they appointed a delegation to wait on Clarke,
and express their willingness to accept peace on such terms as
might be agreeable to him. The council reassembled, and a
treaty was signed, under the dictation of the American
commissioners
.
Such was the remarkable result of the intrepidity and
presence
of mind of George Rogers Clarke.
THE NEW MOON.
A TRADITION OF THE OMAWHAWS.
Far
up the Missouri River, where the shores of that turbid
stream are bounded by interminable prairies, the traveller sees
the remains of a village of the Maha Indians.
[10]
[10]
See Appendix, No. X.
The former
inhabitants
,
obeying a law of their erratic nature, have removed to
some spot still more distant from the habitations of the white men,
and better supplied with game. Nothing remains of them, but
those vestiges which man, however poor or savage, always leaves
behind him, to attest his superiority, even in his simplest state,
over the brute of the forest.
The ruin is extensive, and of recent date. The naked poles,
that once supported the frail lodges, are still standing scattered
over the plain, and the blackened embers lie in heaps upon the
deserted fire-places. The area which was once trodden hard by
human feet, is now covered with a beautiful carpet of short,
luxuriant
blue grass, a sort of demi-civilized variety of grass, that
will not grow in the wilderness where only brutes do congregate,
but ever springs up near the habitations of man, flourishes round
his ruined mansion long after his departure, and clothes with
verdure
the grave in which his body reposes.
The council house, where the warriors met to recount their
victories
,
or to plan their hostile excursions, where the agent from the
great nation of whites opened his budget, and the trader displayed
his wares, where the preacher and the pedlar were alike
hospitably
smoked and welcomedis entirely destroyed, and its remains
are only distinguished from those of the other lodges, by their
larger dimensions and central situation. Here too is seen
crumbling
to decay, the war-post, around which the braves danced, in
all the glory of paint and featherswhere the war-song was sung
where the buffalo dance has frequently been witnessedand
where masques and dramas have been performed, which were as
fashionable in their day and generation, and quite as edifying, as
the Italian opera, or the lecture on newly-invented sciences, of
more refined communities. This was the scene of degradation
and suffering to many an unhappy prisoner, where the most
severe
tortures that ingenious hatred could invent, were endured
with the patience of the martyr, and the exulting captive
dispatched
to the spirit-land, in the most placid conviction of his own
manhood
,
and of having earned a clear title to a good name in this
world, and a blissful existence in the happy hunting grounds of
the world to come.
The village was bounded on one side by the Missouri, whose
bold surface, discoloured by the earthy substances with which it
loads itself in its violent career, swept along the base of the bluff
bank; and on another, by a deep lagoon, an expanse of clear
water, fed by a creek, and filled with aquatic plants, which shot
up luxuriantly from its oozy bottom, spreading their broad leaves
over the placid pool, and decorating the scene with flowers of
exquisite
hue and perfume. In front, an illimitable prairie,
covered
with its verdant and flowery carpet, presented a long
undulating
line of horizon to the eye. The whole town was surrounded
by a palisade, now entirely destroyed, beyond which were the
corn-fields, where the women practised their rude agriculture, and
which furnished a scanty subsistence to this improvident people
during the gloom of winter.
The spot has been some time deserted, though hundreds of
miles still intervene between it and the most advanced settlement
of the white people. For the blight of the white man often
precedes
him, and the Indian recoils instinctively, even before he
has actually suffered by contact with the race which has disturbed
his fathers. The shadow of the white man falls before him, and
the Indian, chilled by his approach, sorrowfully abandons the
graves of his fathers, and seeks a new home in some wilderness
less accessible to the footstep of the stranger.
The traveller pauses at such a place, to indulge that pensive
train of thought, which is always awakened by the sight of the
deserted habitations of man. How sacred is the spot which a
human
being has consecrated by making it his
home!
With what
awe do we tread over the deserted threshold, and gaze upon the
dilapidated wall! The feeling is the same in kind, however it
may differ in degree, whether we survey the crumbling ruins of
a castle, or the miserable relics of a hamlet. The imagination
loves to people the desolated scene, to picture the deeds of its
former
inhabitants, to revive the employments of those who now
slumber in the tomb. The hearth-stone which once glowed with
heat, is now cold, and the silence of death is brooding over that
spot which was once the seat of festivitythe scene of life and
action. Here the warrior trod, in the pride of manhood, arrayed
in martial panoply, and bent on schemes of plunder and revenge.
Here stood the orator and the hoary seer. Here were witnessed
the sports of youth, and the gossip of old age. The maiden was
here in the modest garb of youthful loveliness, listening with
affected
indifference, to the voice of adulation, or laughing away the
hours with the careless joy of young hilarity; the wife was
surrounded
by the maternal cares, and the burthens of domestic life;
and the child sported in boisterous mirth. Yesit is the same
feeling; few and simple as are the incidents of savage life,
humble
and sordid as his employments may seem, the wretched
wigwam
of the poor Indian is as much his home, as the palace of the
Roman senator; and though the ruins of the one, from their
superior
magnificence, may excite more curiosity than the relics of
the other, the shadow that rests upon the heart, as we linger among
either, is equally induced by sympathy for the fallen fortunes of
those who once flourished and are now fallen. It is difficult to
analyze the sentiment of awe, with which we see the evidences
of desolation, and repeat of a strange people, that the places which
knew them once, know them no more forever. Men are callous
to the sufferings of the living, but few tread with indifference over
the ashes of the dead, or view with insensibility the relics of
ancient
days.
All are gone. Some are banished, and others, as the Scripture
beautifully expresses it,
are not;
the graves of the dead may be
faintly discerned in the neglected fields, but the foot-prints of those
who have fled to other lands, have long since vanished from the
green sward, and the deserted streets. It is thus with Nineveh
and Babylon; it is thus with the strong castles of feudal Europe.
The record of what they once were, lives in song and history;
romance
has gathered a few fragments, and entwined about them
the fabulous creations of genius; but the eye of the spectator,
seeking the traces of a vanished reality, finds only the ruins of
mouldered edifices, and the bones of the unconscious dead.
Although we may find in such scenes little to satisfy a
laudable
curiosity, we still linger among them with mournful pleasure.
There is something remarkably exciting in the contrast between
the past and the present. Nothing seizes the imagination more
suddenly, or more strongly, than a vivid exhibition of death or
desolation, contrasted with possession, and life, and loveliness.
All that once was, is gone, or is changed. We repose secure,
surrounded by solitude and peace, where the warrior once stood
at bay, and where danger beat against the ramparts, as the waves
dash against the rock-bound shore. Where there was life once,
we stand in the midst of death. The abodes of those who once
lived are deserted, and an awful silence prevails. The reptile
and the wild beast have taken possession of the spot formerly
occupied
by the social circle. The weed and the brier cover the
dilapidated hearth-stone, and conceal the long-forgotten grave.
As we gaze at these things a feeling of sympathy is awakened
in favour of the departed inhabitant; however unamiable his
character
,
however fierce or wicked he may have been, the blast of
desolation has passed over him, and the heart spontaneously yields
its forgiveness to those sins and errors that have been punished,
and the consequences of which sleep in the tomb with aggressor
and the victim. We think of ourselves, and of those who are
dear to us. We too shall sleepour habitations shall be given
to the stranger, or be swept away by the hand of time, our
bodies
shall be dust, and our spirits vanish from the sphere of
human
life.
We are growing serious. Let us return to the village, and tell
our tale, lest the reader think us prosy. It was, in days past, a
pleasant spot, to those who could find pleasure in the savage
state. The Mahas dwelt here for five months in the year, which
the men spent agreeably enough in eating and sleeping, and the
women in cultivating corn and beans for their subsistence in the
winter, and in dressing the skins of beasts taken in the chase.
The girls followed their mothers to the field, while the boys were
trained to manly deeds by racing, fighting each other, and
transfixing
birds, bull-frogs, and small quadrupeds. During the rest
of the year they wandered over those wide plains where the
buffalo
grazes, and the deer and elk are found; spending the whole
time in hunting and feasting when the game was abundant, and in
toil and starvation when it was not plentiful.
They were often engaged in war. The Saukies, a warlike
tribe, were their enemies, and the fierce Sioux bands often
harassed
them. But they continued for years to elude their foes,
during the hunting season, by vigilance, by rapid marches, and
painful retreats; and to defend the village from assault, by their
watchfulness in discovering the approach of danger, or their
courage in repelling it, during the short interval of repose allowed
them, while their corn was growing.
Many miles below the town, at a very conspicuous point on the
shore of the Missouri, is a small mound which covers the mortal
remains of Washinggasaba, or the Blackbird, a celebrated chief,
who died some years ago, at this spot, on his way home.
According
to his own wish, he was interred, in a sitting posture, on
his favourite horse, upon the summit of a high bluff bank of the
Missouri, that he might continue to see the pale faces
ascending
the river to trade with the Omawhaws. A hillock of earth
was raised over the grave, on which food was regularly placed
for several years afterwards, by his obedient people. But this
rite has been discontinued. We know not how long a spirit
requires
to be fed: but it seems that there is a limit, beyond which
it is not necessary for the living to furnish aliment to the dead.
A staff, supporting a white flag, that marked to the eye of the
traveller the site of this solitary tomb, and called for a tribute of
respect to the memory of one whom his people delighted to honour,
stood here a notable land-mark for some years, but is no longer in
existence.
[11]
[11]
See Appendix, No. XI.
The Blackbird was a person of singular capacity, and the
greatest man of his tribe. He had an intellect, and an energy
of will, which obtained for him the mastery of other minds, and
gave him absolute power over those around him. They
honoured
his talents, not his virtues. Though an able, he was a
repulsive
man. He possessed an extraordinary genius, which enabled
him to sway the multitude, and gain them over to his purposes,
but not to enlist their affections. They clung to him with
devoted
fidelityfollowed, served, and obeyed, with a superstitious
obedience
,
which bound them to his person, but which was not love.
He ruled his tribe with arbitrary power, and permitted none to
share, or to dispute, his authority. He had acquired the
reputation
of a great medicine man, who was supposed to wield a
mysterious
influence over the lives of others, and the nation stood in
awe of him, as the supreme arbiter of their fate. Whenever he
prophesied the death of an individual, the event ensued with
unerring
certainty; and those who counteracted his views, who
disobeyed
his counsel, or in any manner incurred his displeasure,
were removed agreeably to his predictions, and apparently by the
operation of his spells. No absolute monarch ever swayed a
more potent sceptre. He possessed the power that the tyrant of
imperial Rome could only wish for.
Such a mysterious, dreadful influence, quelled the wild spirit
of the Maha warrior, who stood submissive, awed into silent
reverence
,
in the presence of the despotic chief, and trembled even
in his absence, if a rebellious thought spontaneously swelled his
bosom. He was regarded as the friend of the Great Spirit; and
it was thought that the Omawhaws were particularly honoured in
having so remarkable a personage placed at the helm of their
affairs. Many were the victims of his ambition. Whenever his
keen dark eye fell in displeasure on one of his subjects, and the
blighting prophesy was uttered, the unhappy victim from that
instant
bore a charmed life; he sickened, withered away, and sunk
rapidly to the grave. But the power of the chief continued
undiminished
to the last; and the white people alone believed that
they had discovered the dreadful secret of his influence over life
and minda secret which even they dared scarcely whisper to
each other. Such is arbitrary powergained by long years of
toil, and held up by painful watchfulness and sanguinary rule,
4
its harvest is distrust and hatred. Who would be great on such
terms!
To the American traders, who were induced by the
enterprising
spirit of traffic to visit that remote region, the crafty chief
was probably indebted for his dangerous power. It is supposed
that they supplied him secretly with the most subtle drugs, which
he used so artfully, that even they who furnished them, and thus
courted his favour, by a sacrifice of principle most incredibly
atrocious, remained uncertain whether he administered them
directly
as poisons, or employed them in the horrid rites of magic.
Certain it is, that although capricious towards all others, he
protected
and countenanced the traders with unwavering friendship.
He was true to them, and to the white people in general, under
all changes of fortune or of temper; and there is always reason
to suspect that a mutual kindness of long continuance, between
parties so politic and selfish, is produced only by reciprocal
advantage
.
It is said that while he compelled the traders to yield
up to him gratuitously a portion of their goods, he obliged his
people to purchase the remainder at exorbitant prices, so that the
trader lost nothing by his rapacity. The Blackbird was a savage,
who did not pretend to any civilization whatever, yet he seems
to have made commendable advances in social refinement, and to
have imitated very closely the most polished nations, in his
political
economy.
He delighted in the display of his power, and seemed on some
occasions to exert authority for no other purpose than to show that
he possessed it. One day, during a great national hunt in which
all the tribe engaged, and which was conducted with the
discipline
of a warlike expedition, they arrived, fatigued and thirsty,
at the brink of a flowing stream. They had been travelling over
plains exposed to the sun, and destitute of water; and the sight
of a clear rivulet of refreshing coolness filled the party with joy.
But, although all were parched with thirst, the chief, to their
astonishment
,
permitted none to drink but a white man, who
happened
to be in their company. He gave no reason for his
conduct
a
cold, peremptory mandate announced his will, and a
sullen, though implicit obedience, attested the despotic nature of
his command over his submissive followers. The painted braves,
fierce, wild, and untamed as they were, neither hesitated nor
murmured at an unjust order, which, although it seemed the
result
of caprice, was probably intended to try their discipline, and
to accustom them to obey without question.
There was one that loved him, and towards whom his stern
features sometimes relaxed into a smile of kindness. One of our
most popular writersa lady whose own affections are so pure
and refined as to enable her to describe with peculiar grace and
felicity the gentler emotions of the hearthas drawn so true a
picture of
the love of a father for a daughter
, that I shall not
venture
to dwell on this development of affection. Even the
callous
savage felt it. He who had no tear nor smile for any other
human being, was softened into a feeling akin to love, towards
one gentle creature. He had a daughter called Menae, or the
New Moon
, who was the most beautiful woman of the tribe. The
Indian women are usually short and ungraceful. It is with
reluctance
,
of course, that we give our testimony against them;
the use of bear's oil as an unguent, and the eccentric habit of
riding astride, may have prejudiced us, so that we do them
injustice
;
but historical truth requires us to say that we think
them far from attractive. Our heroine was an exception. She
had a face and figure of which any European lady might have
been vain. She was taller and fairer than the rest of the
Omawhaw
maidens, and towered above them as her father did above
the men. Her complexion was so light as to be nearly pure,
and the blush glowed on her cheek when she spoke. Her figure
was beautifully rounded, and her limbs of exquisite proportion.
But her superiority was that only of stature and womanly grace;
she claimed no observance as a tribute to rank, nor made any
ostentatious display of her beauty. Her appropriate and
euphonious
name was given, not merely on account of the mild
brilliancy
of her charms, but in reference also to the sweetness of
disposition which rendered her an universal favourite, and caused
her to be received at all times, and in every company, with a
complacency similar to that with which we welcome the first
appearance
of the luminary of the night.
Beauty always exerts an influence, for good or evil, upon the
softer sex. No woman grows to maturity unconscious of a
possession
,
which if rightly used, is her richest treasure. It is that
which raises her above her own sex, and gives her a transcendent
mastery over the affections of man. A beautiful woman
possesses
a power, which, combined with an amiable deportment, and
directed by honourable principle, is more efficient than wealth or
genius. No man was ever formed with a heart so callous as to
be insensible to its magic influence. It is a talisman as potent as
the lamp of Aladdin, in the hands of one who uses it with modesty
and spirit; but a deadly curse in the possession of a weak or
vicious woman.
The destiny of a beautiful girl, is usually coloured by the
possession of this fascinating treasure. It makes her the centre
of a sphere, and creates an atmosphere around her. It has a
controlling influence upon the formation of her character, which
elevates her above, or sinks her below, her companions. The
heartless beauty who lives for conquest, becomes the most
insensible
of her sex. Neglecting the appropriate graces, and solid
accomplishments, which throw so many pure and hallowed
fascinations
around the sweet companion of man, she soon learns to
feel the want, and to supply the absence, of womanly attractions,
by artificial blandishments. Almost unconsciously she becomes
artful, stoops to the meauest artifices of cunning and malice, and
lives in a corrupted atmosphere of deception. The time soon
arrives when the beautiful flower which attracted admiration
withers,and the stem which bore it is found to be composed of
a common and worthless material.
But where the mind is sound, and the heart pure, beauty
elevates
the character of the woman. The admiration which she
receives, even in childhood, softens her affections, stimulates her
latent ambition, and gives her the dignity of self-approbation.
The glance and the tone of gallantry, with which she is addressed,
awakens the responsive sentiment, gives tone and grace to her
manners, and brings out the energy of her mind. She feels her
power, and assumes the dignity of her sex. A womanly
tenderness
and grace is seen in all her actions. Accustomed to
admiration
,
she realizes that homage which poets feign as the heritage
of her sex; and her brain is not turned by the idle breath of
unmeaning compliment. Confident in her powers of pleasing, she
rises above the little stratagems, and sordid jealousies which
appertain
to the maiden state, and scorns to use any allurement to
extort those attentions to which she feels she is entitled. Thus it
is that beauty gives power to vice, and strength and gracefulness
to virtue.
It is also true, that the possession of beauty is apt to improve
those exterior graces, which are so important in women as to be
almost virtues, though in fact they seem to involve but little moral
responsibility. Neatness, affability, and politeness are
indispensable
requisites in the female character. The knowledge that we
possess an enviable quality stimulates to its improvement. The
woman who discovers in herself the power of pleasing, is apt to
cultivate that which produces an effect so gratifying to herself,
and so agreeable to others. Her ingenuity is quickened by
encouragement
.
As the man who has a capital to build upon, is
more apt to husband his resources, and to aim at great wealth,
than he who having nothing to begin with has no expectation of
accumulating a fortuneso the beauty has a capital, which
encourages
her to look forward to a desirable position in society,
and induces her to study neatness, grace, and propriety.
I know not whether this philosophy holds good among the belles
and beauties of the Maha tribe; I am sure that as things go in
our own land, I am not far from the orthodox creed in respect to
this delicate matter. Of one thing, however, there is no doubt:
Menae was not only the most beautiful of the Omawhaws, but
she seemed to feel the consciousness of her advantage, and to
improve it with a skill, of which the unenlightened heathen
around her had no idea. It might have been because she was the
daughter of the head chiefor because she inherited a portion of
her father's talentsbut I am inclined to think it was because she
was remarkably handsome. It will be perceived that I am high
church in my principles as regards beauty. For one or all of
these reasons, she was more neat in her dress, more graceful in
her carriage, more sedate and modest in her conduct, more
dignified
and altogether more lady-like, after the manner of the
Omawhaws, than any other young lady of that primitive nation
all which I am ready to verify.
Among the western Indians, girls are usually betrothed at a
tender age, but the daughter of Blackbird had remained free from
any engagement. Great men sometimes disregard national usages
which interfere with their personal convenience, and the politic
chief of the Mahas might have kept his daughter free from any
engagement, in order to be at full liberty to make for her the best
match which his situation might command. And it is not unlikely
that the awe in which the chief was held, by the general belief
in his supernatural power, may have kept the other fathers of the
tribe at a distance, or have induced a doubt in their minds
whether a near alliance with their dreaded leader was desirable.
Such, however, was the fact; she grew to womanhood as free as
the antelope of her native prairie.
Menae had now reached her sixteenth year, and the young
braves began to look towards her as an object of peculiar
attraction
.
In her presence they reined up their horses, involuntarily
seeking to display the action of their steeds, and their own
horsemanship
or
urged their canoes over the eddying waves of the
Missouri, with redoubled vigour. Some of them improved vastly
in the labours of the toilet, adorned their faces with an unusual
quantity of red paint, and their necks with the claws of bears
and hung all sorts of glittering and gristly ornaments about their
persons. Others exhibited the scalps of their enemies slain in
battle, with more than ordinary ostentation; and the trophies torn
from slaughtered foes became quite the fashion. They did not
get to the exquisite refinement of wearing beards and mustaches
for the Mahas are a barbarous people, and the beautiful art of
transforming the human face into the resemblance of those of the
bear and the billy-goat, had not yet travelled so far West. They
did all they could, to look fierce, and captivatingbut all in vain.
The New Moon moved gracefully in her orbit, shedding her
beams alike on all, and not distinguishing any with particular
marks of her approbation.
More than a year previous to the time at which our tale
commences
,
a young trader had arrived at the Maha village.
Naturally
sagacious and expert in business, he soon became
acquainted
with the customs of the tribe, and acquired the confidence of
the people. His appearance was prepossessing, his look was bold
and manly, his speech prompt and frank, yet cautious and
respectful
.
The women called him the
handsome white man
, but
the more discriminating braves designated him as
the wise stranger
.
He was one of the very numerous and successful class, who
are chiefly distinguished for their faculty for getting along in the
world, but who, in consequence of the possession of this one
quality
,
receive credit for many others. Calm, mild, with an
agreeable
smile always playing over his features, Mr. Bolingbroke was
universally considered a young gentleman of excellent heart;
when the truth was, that the heart had nothing to do with the
blandness of his manners. The secret of that uniform
self-possession
and civility consisted simply in the absence of passion;
the heart never concerned itself in Mr. Bolingbroke's business.
He was even-tempered, because he took no interest in anything
but his own personal advancement; and as long as his affairs
went on prosperously, there was no reason why a perpetual
sunshine
should not play over his features. He was courteous from
policy, because men are managed more easily by kindness and
stratagem, than by force; because it was more natural to him
to smile than to frown, and becauseit cost nothing. The
world gave him credit for a great deal of feeling, simply because
he had very little; for the less sensibility a man has the more he
affects. He was ardent and energetic in his business, earnest in
the pursuit of pleasure, and gay in company; but the observer,
who had watched him closely, would have found that the only
chords in his bosom which were ever touched, were those of
self-gratification
and self-interest.
The judicious conduct of Mr. Bolingbroke met its usual
reward
,
and he was prosperous in trade. But as time rolled on,
other traders came to the village, competition reduced his gains,
and he began to see the necessity of adopting some expedient
which should give him an advantage over his rivals. This was
a matter of too much importance to be settled in a moment;
therefore
he studied it over for several months, smiling and showing
his white teeth all the while, and banishing every shadow of care
from his fine open countenance. He even squeezed the hands of
his competitors more warmly than usual, strolled often to their
wigwams, laughed with glee at their jokes, and seemed really to
love them, and to take an interest in their prosperity. The result
of his cogitations was a conviction, that the most feasible plan for
rising above competition would be that of wedlockthat of
grafting
himself upon a native stock, identifying himself with the
tribe, enlisting their affections, and securing the influence of
powerful
friends by a marriage with the daughter of some leading
person; nor did he hesitate long in selecting as the happy lady,
the beauty of the tribe,
the New Moon
, the only and beloved
daughter of the ruling chief.
The young merchant had more than once looked with a
delighted
eye at the graceful form of Menae, had spoken to her
kindly when they met, and had paid her the homage of gallant
courtesy, which beauty always exacts. She had received his
attentions
with civility, but without any appearance of being
flattered
by them. But now her quick apprehension discovered, that
there was something in his manner altogether different from his
ordinary politeness. When he met this brightest of all the stars
in the galaxy of Omawhaw beauty, his eye rested upon her with
a peculiar meaning; and he more than once stopped as if he
would have spoken. How quick-sighted is woman in the affairs
of the heart! She saw that the white stranger was smitten; and
the conviction afforded her that mischievous satisfaction, which a
pretty girl always feels, on witnessing the havoc made by her
charms, when her own affections remain untouched. The white
stranger had as yet made no impression on her heart. Some
presents, of greater value than those which he had been in the
habit of giving to the Indian maidens, convinced her of that
which she had begun to suspect; and she whispered to herself in
the exultation of a girl over the first conquest in which her
feelings
are interested, The handsome white man loves the New
Moon!
Just at this crisis arrived the season for the grand hunt, when
the corn having been weeded, the whole tribe abandon the village,
and proceed to the great plains, where the buffaloes graze in vast
herdsso vast that the novelist would be considered as giving the
rein to his fancy, if he were to attempt to convey an idea of their
number, which I leave therefore to be stated by the traveller,
whose business it is to risk his reputation as a man of truth, for
the instruction of the public. This is an occasion of great
rejoicing
.
For several days previous to the departure of the tribe,
feasts were held, and councils assembled to deliberate on the route,
to devise the plan of the hunt, and to suggest the necessary
precautions
to avoid the snares of their enemies. The elders
of the tribe repeated the results of their experience, the
orators
embraced the occasion to win new trophies of applause, and
while some were successful in these ambitious attempts, and
gained
the popular applause so much coveted by the stump-speaker,
whether civilized or savage, there were many who
In that unnavigable stream were drowned.
The traders were consulted in reference to supply of guns and
ammunition; and the hunters made their contracts individually,
for sufficient supplies of guns, gunpowder, and other articles, to
be paid for in furs and peltry, at the close of the hunting season.
Bows and arrows, and spears, were also fabricated by those who
preferred the ancient weapons of their people.
It was on such occasions, that Bolingbroke had heretofore
discovered
his influence to be at the greatest height among his savage
customers; who treated his suggestions with deference, in
proportion
to the amount of the favours which they solicited at their
hands. In the wilderness, as in the marts of civilized life, people
are never so kind to each other as at the moment when the
relation
of debtor and creditor is about to be created, and never less
cordial than during the existence of that relation. Bolingbroke
had found himself at one season, worshipped as the idol of the
tribe, and at another, feared as its master; but by being
alternately
an indulgent creditor, and an unassuming friend, had
retained
its confidence. It was, therefore, with no small degree of
chagrin that he saw his business about to be shared, and his
influence
divided with others. His convictions, as to the propriety
of entering upon the honourable state of matrimony, became greatly
strengthened by this new evidence of the evanescent nature of his
popularity; and his love to the New Moon increased to a steady
flame, as the propitious influence which this bright luminary
might shed over his fortunes became clearly developed.
The councils continued to be held, and while the chief men
were employed in maturing the weighty affairs of their little
4*
state, the common people rejoiced exceedingly, and every leisure
hour was filled with sport and feasting. The men amused
themselves
with various pastimes, such as gambling, dancing,
football
,
and racing. The young braves were painted with more than
ordinary care, and freshly anointed with the fat of the bear, from
the crown of the head to the soles of the feet. Some gave
themselves
up to the affairs of courtship and gallantrysome showed
off their horses and their horsemanshipothers did honour to the
chiefs and distinguished braves, by dancing before the doors of
their respective lodgeswhile a few, ludicrously apparelled,
moved about the village, exciting laughter by the performance of
coarse feats of buffoonery. Men were seen wrapped in the skins
of wild beasts, equipped with horns and tails, bellowing in
imitation
of the animals they represented, and proving that men and
brutes are separated by a step as brief as that which divides the
sublime from the ridiculous.
The criers passed through the streets, inviting individuals by
name, in a loud voice, to feasts given by their friends, charging
them at the same time to be careful to bring their own bowls and
spoons; and again proclaiming on the part of the guests, that the
entertainments were over, praising the hospitality of the hosts, and
the goodness of the provisions; while others, again, published the
resolves of the council, and admonished the people to hasten their
preparations for departure.
At length, every requisite arrangement being complete, the
women, to whom the prospect of such a journey is always
gratifying
,
were seen rapidly moving about, assiduously occupied in
packing up, and loading upon the horses, all their household goods,
and personal chattelspots, kettles, and childrenprovisions, tents,
trinkets, and trumpery. It was obvious that they felt their own
importance
;
their active motions, busy faces, evinced that, for the
moment
,
they had broken through all the salutary restraints of
discipline
,
and assumed the reins of government; and they even
ventured
to rate their husbands, and other unfortunate men who fell
in their way, severely, for real or supposed trespasses, upon what
they considered their peculiar provinceas we are assured the
ladies of another people, which shall be nameless, are accustomed
to do, on certain privileged days, or when their liege lords intrude
upon them while in the performance of any household solemnities
which they regard as inviolate. From all which it may be safely
inferred, that the ingenious writer who had discovered that there
is a great deal of human nature in man, might have added, and
in women.
The march of the tribe from the village presented a picturesque
and beautiful scene. It was a bright summer morning. The sun
was just rising over the rounded bluffs, and throwing his beams
obliquely along the surface of the turbid Missouri. The prairie
was clad in its richest apparel. The young grass covered it with
a thick sward, which still preserved the living freshness and
grateful verdure of spring, while flowers infinite in number, and
diversified in hue, reared their heads to the surface of the grassy
carpet, and reposed upon it, like colours upon the canvass of the
painter. The whole plain displayed a series of graceful
undulations
not
hills and valesbut gentle swells and depressions,
which, at this early hour of the day, received the sunlight at such
a variety of angles, as to afford an endless diversity of light and
shade, while it heightened the effect of the perspective, by
throwing
up a few points into prominent relief, and casting others, whose
features were as distinctly visible, into an imaginary back-ground.
As the cavalcade commenced its march, a long train of
warriors
,
on horseback, were beheld issuing from the village, arrayed
in all the pomp, and all the dignity, of Indian display. Their
faces were carefully painted in the best style, some gaily with a
profusion of crimson, others lowering in the gloomy ferocity of
black, while their bodies were adorned with the trappings of
savage
magnificence, and their heads arrayed in feathers of a variety
of gaudy hues.
They were armed with the numerous implements of war and
huntingwith guns, bows, war-clubs, tomahawks, and knives
and mounted upon active horses, with vicious eyes and untamed
spirits, that evinced submission to the power of their riders, but
not affection for their persons. Some rode without stirrups, some
without saddles, and some with saddles richly ornamented. Their
bridle-bits were of every variety, from the plainest snaffle, to the
most powerful curb. The bridles of many were decorated with
gaudy-coloured ribbon, tape, or tinsel, or with bits of tin, or pieces
of dressed deer-skin cut into fringe, or rolled into tassels; and
many had adorned the manes and tails of their horses, while not
a few rode ragged steeds barebacked, and guided them with
halters
.
Although in the appearance of some of these native warriors,
the grotesque predominated, while extreme poverty was displayed
in the equipment of others, there was observable in each, the same
unconstrained air, and indescribable wildness, peculiar to this
original people; and there were a few braves mounted on fine
horses, well clad, completely armed and appointed, of sedate
carriage
,
and military bearing, and whose whole conduct bore the
decisive stamp of dignity.
They moved slowly; but here and there might be seen a young
brave, urging his horse rapidly along the flank of the column, or
seeking to attract attention by dashing off from the line of march,
across the plain, at full speed, with his feet pressed in his
courser's sides, his body bent forward, his buffalo spear poised,
as if for striking, and his long plume of feathers streaming upon
the wind. Behind the main body of horsemen, followed the
women, the children, and the old men, a few of whom were
mounted on lean ponies, but the greater part were on foot,
trudging soberly alongexcept the younger ladies, who amused
themselves with jeering any of the junior warriors, who happened
to lag behind, or who was casually thrown among the
non-combatants
by the laming of a horse, or the loss of an indispensable
part of his armament. Under the charge of this body of women
and unsexed men, was a train of pack-horses, bearing the mats,
skin-lodges, and other moveables. On the packs might be seen
many a little urchin, too big to be carried on his mother's back,
yet too small to walk, who enjoyed the high privilege of being
lashed among the baggage, and treated as an article of furniture
where he satcomfortably enough, poking out his dark face
from among the packages, and staring with his little wild black
eyes, like a copper-headed snake. With this part of the
cavalcade
,
too, were the dogs, which, when not abroad on duty with
their masters, usually seek the society of the ladies, and the
agreeable atmosphere of the culinary department. Those in
question
,
were particularly given to these loafing habits, and forever
stealing after the flesh-pots, and trying to curry favour with the
women, who, heartily despising the sycophants, gave them more
kicks than coppers. From their appearance one would not
suppose
their company was desirable; for the Indian's dog is a lean,
hungry, ferocious animala bad medium between the savage
wolf and the civilized dogwho is but little respected at home or
abroad, and sneaks about, with his bushy tail drooped, his pointed
ears erect, and his watchful eye gleaming with a thievish
expression
of mischief and distrust. Resembling the wolf in
appearance
and manners, he seems to be obedient from fear only,
and to have but little in common with the generous and
affectionate
animal who is the friend, as well as the servant, of civilized
man, and of whom the poet testified, when he said, they are
honest
creatures.
Leaving the village, the Indian train ascended a long gradual
swell, until they reached a beautifully rounded eminence, that
commanded an extensive view of the prairie, over which they
were about to travel. Nothing could be more striking than this
wild picture of native luxuriance, and aboriginal display. A
wide expanse of scenery was spread before the eye. The
interminable
plain extended further than the vision reached, spreading
out a landscape which was bounded only by the dim sea-like
horizon; and there was something peculiarly picturesque in the
march of the Omawhaws, whose long party-coloured line would
and undulated among the slopes and mounds of the prairie,
headed
by armed braves, and flanked by young horsemen, darting off
from the main body, to show the speed of their horses, and
displaying
their own dexterity by a variety of evolutions.
When the party reached the most elevated point of the plain,
it halted, and many a glance was thrown back towards the
deserted
wigwams. Not a living thing moved in the village, whose
lowly huts, untenanted, seemed to form a part of the natural
landscape. Beyond it flowed the broad and turbulent Missouri,
on its journey of a thousand leagues, and further-towards the
East, was a range of low, pointed hills, whose sides were thinly
clothed with timber, while their bald summits were only covered
with a verdant carpet of grass. The newly risen sun had just
appeared beyond these hills, lighting up their peaked tops with
the full effulgence of his splendour, and strongly marking the
characteristic horizon of this peculiar country. Over this scene
they gazed for a few moments with emotion, for some of them
might never return to the wigwams of their tribe, and those who
should survive might find their fields ravaged, and the graves of
their fathers desecrated. Even an Indian loves his home.
Erratic
as are his habits, and little as he seems to understand or
enjoy
domestic comfort, he acquires, unconsciously, an attachment
towards the spot on which he resides, and a reverence for the
associations
by which it is surrounded. This attachment is weak
compared with that of the civilized man, but the savage feels it,
though in a modified form, and with but a slight reference to
locality
.
There are dear and joyful recollections connected with
the fireside, however humble it may be, and the turf that covers
the remains of departed friends, is sacred even in the eyes of the
uneducated savage.
Bolingbroke was not a man to appreciate an interesting
landscape
,
or to sympathize with a flow of tender feeling. He sat on
his horse, apart from the others, and was calculating the
probable
advantages of an union with the daughter of the chief of the
Mahas, and revolving in his mind the means by which he might
most speedily bring about so desirable an alliance, when the
Blackbird himself rode up beside him.
Is the
Wise Stranger
sorrowful in spirit? said the chief,
or does he mourn because the Omawhaws are quitting the
graves of their fathers?
Neither, replied the politic trader; the Great Spirit has
not thrown any cloud over the heart of his white son, and the
graves that we are leaving are not those of
my fathers
.
Then why should the trader of the white people be sad,
when his red brethren are going to hunt on the plains where the
buffaloes feed?
I am thinking of something I had forgotten.
Has the Master of Life told my friend in a dream, that he
has failed to do something that he ought to have done?
Yes, my father; even thus has the Master of Life whispered
to my heart, while my eyes were sleeping. I have seen my
fault. But I feel comforted by the reflection that the great chief
of the Omawhaws is my friend.
The chief directed a calm thought penetrating glance of
inquiry
towards his companion, but the countenance of the trader
betrayed
no emotion. It was evident that the offence was not one
of deep dye. His eye wandered back to the cavalcade, and
rested
on the warrior train. The young trader resumed:
My father has always been kind to me.
The pale face has reason to believe that the Blackbird is his
friend, replied the chief composedly.
I have endeavoured to convince the great chief that I desire
to serve him. I have no other pleasure than to make the
Omawhaws
happy, by supplying their wants.
The white stranger has done his dutyI am satisfied.
Here a pause ensued, and these well-matched politicians gazed
along the line, which was now beginning to be again set in
motion
each
endeavouring stealthily to catch a glance at the
countenance
of the other. The young merchant was the first to renew
the conversation.
In making my presents to the chiefs, he said, I have
endeavoured
to distinguish who were the most worthy, and who stood
highest in the estimation of the Mahas, by the value of the gifts
which I made them. But I fear that I did not sufficiently
recollect
the high claims of Blackbird, who is elevated above all others
by his wisdom, his many victories, and his friendship for the
white people. I am a young man, and the Great Spirit has not
been pleased to give me that wisdom which he reserves for great
chiefs, whose business is to govern tribes.
As he said this he drew from his bosom an elegantly mounted
dirk, a favourite ornament and weapon of the Indian, and as he
presented it added:
Will the head man of the Omawhaws accept this as a small
part of the atonement which my negligence imposes upon me,
and depend upon my word that in future I shall not forget the
distance between a great chief and his inferiors?
The white stranger has been very properly called
wise
, said
the crafty chief, and the head man of the Maha people knows
how to value his friends. I have looked back at our pathit is
all whitethere is no cloud upon it. The white trader may
depend
hereafter, that I am his friend.
Thus saying, he eyed with complacency the beautiful weapon
that he had received, drew it, and examined the bladepassing
his eye along it with the keen scrutiny of one intimately versed
in the mechanism and use of military implements; then having
arranged it upon his person, with the true savage love of finery,
in the most conspicuous manner, he rode away, muttering to
himself
,
What does the trader want in return for so fine a present?
He did dream that it was his daughter that was wanted.
In a few days they arrived at the pastures of the buffalo, and
beheld the plains covered with herds of wild cattle as far as the
eye could reach in every direction. It would seem that here
were
the cattle upon a thousand hills
, that were shadowed out
to the mind of the inspired poet. The animating scenes of the
hunt commenced. Parties of hunters mounted upon fleet horses
well trained to this sport, dashed in among the grazing herds. At
their approach the buffaloes fled in alarm; the hunters pursued at
full speed, each horseman selecting his victim. The swiftness of
the horse soon outstripped the speed of the buffalo, and placed the
hunter by the side of his noble game; when dropping the bridle,
while his trained steed, continued to bear him gallantly along,
maintaining his position side by side, with the buffalo, he
discharged
his arrows, or his bullets, into the panting animal until
it fell mortally wounded. Then the hunter, quitting his prey,
dashed again into the affrighted herd to select another object of
pursuit.
It was an inspiring sight to behold the wide plain,an immense
meadow, studded with ornamental groves, covered with
numerous
herds, quietly grazing like droves of domestic cattle; then to
see the Omawhaw bands, under the cover of some copse or swelling
ground, covertly approaching from the leeward, so that the timid
animals might not scent their approach in the tained breeze; and,
at last, to view the confusion occasioned by their sudden onset.
On discovering their enemies, the alarmed herd, following its
leaders, would attempt to move away rapidly in a solid phalanx;
but the hunters, penetrating boldly into the heart of the retreating
body, dispersed it in every directionand the maddened animals
were seen flying towards all points of the compass, followed by
the fierce wild hunters. The vicissitudes of the chase were
numerous
and diversified. Sometimes a horse fell, and the prostrate
rider was saluted with loud shouts of derision; sometimes a large
bull turned suddenly upon his pursuer; and burying his horns
deep in the flanks of the steed, hurled him upon the plain; and
more than once the hunter, thus thrown, with difficulty escaped
being trodden to death by the furious herd.
Bolingbroke engaged with ardour in this sport. He was a
skilful and daring horseman; and though at first awkward, from
his ignorance of the artifices of the chase, he soon became
sufficiently
expert to be considered as an useful auxiliary by his
companions
.
The warriors began to treat him with increased
respect
;
and even the squaws, whose favour he had heretofore
conciliated
by timely presents, looked upon him with more
complacency
,
after witnessing these displays of his activity and courage.
A daring horseman gallops rapidly into a lady's affections.
The sex admire intrepidity, and give their suffrages decidedly in
favour of a dashing fellow who combines boldness with grace and
skill. Bolingbroke found favour in the eyes of the New Moon;
and, though she carefully concealed her sentiments in her own
bosom, he soon ceased to be an object of indifference. He was
her father's friend, and she began to discover that it was her duty
to admire his exploits, and approve his conduct. One day, as he
was returning to camp alone from a successful hunt, he overtook
the fair Menae, who was also separated accidentally from the
company. It was an opportunity too favourable to be lost. As
he joined her she threw her eyes upon the ground, and walked
silently forward. He dismounted, and throwing his bridle over
his arm, placed himself at the side of the Omawhaw beauty.
How awkward it is to begin a conversation under such
circumstances
!
Among us, a remark on the weather would have
furnished
a theme for the lovers to begin upon; but these
meteorological
discussions were not fashionable at the Omawhaw village.
One of Miss Edgeworth's heroes pulled a flower to pieces on a
similar occasion, before he could open his mouth; but Bolingbroke
was a man of business, and came at once to the point.
The daughter of Blackbird looks upon the ground, said he;
she does not seem pleased to see the white friend of her father.
The white stranger is glad because he has had a good hunt,
replied the maiden, and others seem to him to be sad, because
they are not so joyful as himself.
When I look at the New Moon, rejoined the lover, my
heart is always filled with gladness, for she is very beautiful.
I have often heard, replied Menae, that the white men
have forked tongues, and do not mean what they say.
Others may have lying lips, but mine are true. I have
never deceived the Omawhaws. I speak truth, when I say that
I love the beautiful Menae, for she is handsomer than all the other
daughters of her tribe. If she will be my wife I will build a
wigwam in the village of the Omawhaws, and quit forever the
graves of my fathers, and the council-fires of the white people.
The wise stranger would send a cloud over his father's house.
How many of the girls of the pale faces are looking up the great
river, to see him return, as he promised them? inquired she
archly.
Not one! Not one! You are the only woman I have ever
lovedI will never love another. Become my wife, and I
promise
you, here in the presence of the Master of Life, that I will
never seek the love of any other. Menae shall be the sole
companion
,
and dearest friend, of my life.
I am the daughter of a great chief, replied the Indian maid.
Ah! I understand youyou are too proud to marry one who
is not of your nation.
The roaring of the buffalo has made the ear of the white
hunter dull. I am the daughter of a chief, and I may not give
myself away.
Lovely Menae! exclaimed the trader, as he attempted to
seize her hand; but she quietly folded her arms, and looked at
him with composure, assuming a dignity which effectually
repelled
any further advance. She then addressed him with a
touching softness of voice.
There is a path to my heart which is right; it is a straight
path. She paused; but her eye, which beamed softly upon her
lover, expressed all that he could have wished. She added, If
the white trader is wise, as men say he is, he will not attempt to
gain a young maiden's affections by any crooked way.
So saying, she walked quietly away, while the politic trader,
who understood her meaning, respectfully withdrew, satisfied that
the lady would interpose no objection to his suit, if the consent of
a higher authority could be secured.
Having taken his resolution, he proceeded to the lodge of the
Blackbird, and endeavoured to conciliate the favour of both the
parents of Menae by liberal presents. He adverted artfully to
the advantages which would accrue to both parties by an alliance
between the chief and himself, avowed his love for their daughter,
and his decided wish to marry one of the Omawhaw tribe. He
promised, if they would transfer their daughter to him in
marriage
,
to treat her kindly, and to introduce no other wife into his
lodge. He suggested that he had now established a permanent
trading house at their village, where he should reside during the
greater part of the year, and where he would be fully able to
protect and support, both his proposed wife, and her kindred, if
necessary. In return, he hoped the nation would give him the
preference in their trade, and consider him as one allied to them
in affection and interest.
To this very business-like harangue, which was sufficiently
sentimental for the ears to which it was addressed, the parents
made a suitable reply. They thanked him for his liberal offers,
and were gratified that he had taken pity on their daughter; they
would not object to the connection, and hoped their daughter
would accept him. The mother added that Menae was stronger
than she looked, and could carry a great many skins; and,
though she was not very expert at hoeing corn, she was young
enough to learn. The chief gave him the comfortable assurance
that it was quite indifferent to them how many wives he might
choose to have, provided he could support and govern themfor
his part, he had had his own trouble with one; but he commended
the prudence of his young friend in confining himself to a single
squaw for the present, until he should become experienced in the
inequalities of the female temper, and have learned the difficult
art of ruling a household.
The parents retired, and opened the subject to their daughter,
to whom they magnified the advantages of the proposed alliance,
with one who was, in their opinion, a greater man than any of
the Omawhaws. His wealth exceeded that of all the tribe; his
store of guns, ammunition, trinkets, and clothing, seemed to be
inexhaustible; and they earnestly requested her to secure her
own happiness, and advance the interests of her family, by
accepting
an offer so tempting.
The New Moon, though delighted with her conquest, thought
it proper, as young ladies are apt to think on such occasions, to
support her dignity by affecting some reluctance. In the first
place, the gentleman's complexion was against him, and she
would have given any thingexcept himselfif it had been a
shade or two darker. Then his taste in dress was by no means
such as accorded with her ideas of manly beauty; and she
regretted that he did not paint his handsome face, decorate his
hair with the feathers of the eagle, ornament his nasal
protuberance
with rings, and cover his shoulders with the ample folds of a
Makinaw blanket. Above all, he had never struck an enemy in
battle; not a single scalp attested his prowess as a warrior; and
although he managed a horse with skill, and had wielded the rifle
successfully in the chase, he was as ignorant as a woman of the
use of a tomahawk, or a scalping knife. Notwithstanding all
this, she admitted that the white trader was wisehe was young,
had a good eye, and a stout arm, and might, in time, with proper
tuition, become worthy to be ranked among the head men of the
Omawhaws. Upon the whole, she expressed her own
unworthiness
,
her ignorance of what would be right on such an occasion,
her willingness to obey the wishes of her parents, and to advance
the interests of her nation; and as it seemed to be their desire,
and her duty, she would marry the trader.
They were united accordingly, and the beautiful Menae
entered
upon a new existence. Marriage always effects a decided
change upon the sentiments of those, who come within its sacred
pale under a proper sense of the responsibilities of the married
state. However delightful the intercourse of wedded hearts,
there is, to a well-regulated mind, something extremely solemn in
the duties imposed by this interesting relation. The reflection
that an existence which was separate and independent is ended,
and that all its hopes and interests are blended with those of
another
soul, is deeply affecting, as it imposes the conviction that
every act which shall influence the happiness of the one, will
colour the destiny of the other. But when the union is that of
love, this feeling of dependance is one of the most delightful that
can be imagined. It annihilates the habit of selfish enjoyment,
and teaches the heart to delight in that which gives pleasure to
another. The affections become gradually enlarged, expanding
as the ties of relationship, and the duties of life, accumulate
around, until the individual, ceasing to know an isolated existence,
lives entirely for others, and for society.
But it is the generous and the virtuous alone, who thus enjoy
this agreeable relation. Some hearts there are too callous to
give nurture to a delicate sentiment. There are minds too
narrow
to give play to an expansive benevolence. A certain degree
of magnanimity is necessary to the existence of disinterested love
or friendship.
The beautiful Menae was of a noble, generous nature. She
had never been selfish; and now that her affections had an
object
on which to concentrate their warmth, her heart glowed with
disinterested emotion. With a native ingenuousness of soul that
had always induced her, even without reflection, to consult the
happiness of others in preference to her own, she had now an
object
whose interests were so dear, that it was as delightful as it
was natural, to sacrifice to them all her own inclinations. From
the moment of her marriage, she began to adapt her conduct to
the taste of her husband. She adopted his opinions, imitated his
manners, and gradually exchanged the ornaments of her tribe for
those which accorded better with his fancy. It cost her not a
pang, nor a regret, to throw aside the costume which she had
considered
graceful, and had worn with pride in the meridian of her
beauty, and to invest her charms in a foreign drapery, which was
far less becoming in her own eyes. Whatever her husband
admired
became graceful in her estimation; and that which
rendered
her attractive to him, she wore with more than youthful
delight. A similar change took place in her domestic
arrangements
.
Instead of the rude wigwam of the Indian, Bolingbroke
had built a small, but neat cottage, and had furnished it with
some of the comforts, though few of the luxuries of his country;
and his wife eagerly endeavoured to gratify his wishes, by
adapting
herself to his habits of living. She learned to sit upon a
chair, to eat from a table, and to treat her husband as a companion,
rather than as a master. Hour after hour did she listen
attentively
to his descriptions of the habits of his countrywomen; and
carefully did she treasure up in her memory every hint which
might serve as a guide in her endeavour to render her own
deportment
pleasing to him to whom she had given an unreserved
affection. From him she had learned to attach a name, and an
endearing value, to the spot which he called his home; and for
his sake she sought to throw every enchantment around the scene
of their domestic enjoyments. With all that wonderful facility
with which the female heart, when stimulated by the desire of
pleasing, can mould itself to the wishes of another, she caught his
opinions, and learned to understand his tastesentwining her own
existence around his, as the ivy clings to the oak. Her cottage
soon became conspicuous for its neatness and beauty. She
transplanted
the wild rose and the honeysuckle from the woods, and
trained them over her door, in imitation of the bowers that he had
described to her. Her table was spread with the dainties which
he had taught her to prepare; her furniture arranged in the
order
which he dictated, and all her household duties directed with
the nicest regard to his feelings or prejudices.
And had she no prejudices to be respectedno habits to be
indulgedno wishes to be gratified? None. She loved with the
pure devotion of a generous woman. She had a heart which
could sacrifice every selfish wish upon the altar of affectiona
mind so resolute in the performance of duty, that it could
magnanimously
stifle every desire that ran counter to its own high
standard
of rectitude. She possessed talent and feeling; and to those
ideas of implicit obedience and profound respect for her husband,
which constitute nearly the whole code of ethics of an Indian
female
,
she added a nice perception of propriety, and a tenderness
that filled her whole heart. She had no reserved rights. In
giving
herself to her husband she severed all other ties, and merged
her whole existence in his; and the language of her heart was,
thy people shall be my people, and thy God my God. Such
is the hallowed principle of woman's lovesuch the pure
sentiment
,
the deep devotion, the high-minded elevation of that passion,
when sanctioned by duty, in the bosom of a well-principled and
delicate female!
The New Moon of the Omawhaws was a proud and happy wife.
Her young affections reposed sweetly in the luxury of a
blameless
attachment. She had married the man of her choice, who
had freely selected her from all her tribe. That man was greater
than those around him, and in her eyes, superior to most of his
sex. He had distinguished and honoured her. He had taken
her to his bosom, given her his confidence, surrounded her with
luxuries and marks of kindness.
Yet there were some thorns in her path; and, in the midst of
all the brightness of her sunniest days, her dream of bliss was
sometimes chilled by clouds that threw their dim shadows over it.
Almost unconsciously to herself a sadness would rest for a
moment
upon her heart, and fly before she had time to inquire whence
it came. There was a dark spot in her destiny, of the existence
of which she was scarcely sensible, because she turned her eyes
away from it in fear or in pride. A chill sometimes crept over
her heart; but without waiting to inquire its cause, she chased
it away, gazed again upon the bright vision of her wedded joy,
and forgot that an unpleasant image had been present. Was it
the occasional coldness of Bolingbroke, who, immersed in the
cares of business, or abstracted in the anticipations of a future
affluence
,
received the endearments of his wife with indifference?
Or was it the estranged deportment of her tribe, who began to
regard
her as an alien? She knew notshe never permitted
herself
to doubt the love of her husband, and she prized the affection
of others too little in comparison, to inquire into the ebb and flow
of its tide.
The time, however, arrived when Menae began to discover that
she had a difficult task to perform. Her husband was a trader,
bent on the accumulation of wealth, by catching every gale of
fortune that might chance to blowher relatives and those by
whom she was surrounded, were fierce and crafty savages,
ignorant
of the principles of justice, and destitute of any fixed
standard
of moral right. His interests and theirs were often opposed;
and while he was always prepared to reap the spoil of their
labours
,
they were as ready to crush or to plunder him, whenever he
happened to cross their purposes, or to awaken their suspicion.
His popularity rose and fell with the changes of the season. A
new supply of goods rendered him the idol of the tribean
exhausted
stock exposed him to insult and injustice. Previous to
the annual hunt, or to a warlike expedition, he was flattered and
obeyed by those improvident warriors, who, having made no
preparations
for such an occasion, were dependent upon him for the
outfit which was necessary to enable them to take the field; but
when the spoils of the chase or of battle came to be divided, and
the largest portion was claimed by the trader in payment of his
debts, he became for the moment an object of hatred; and it
required
all the power of the chiefs, and all the cunning of his own
politic brain, to secure him from their vengeance. On such
occasions
he found his wife an invaluable counsellor, and an efficient
friend. Her influence with the tribe was by no means
contemptible
.
Her own popularity, and her ready access to the ear of her
father, whom all others feared to approach, gave her a degree of
authority among the warriors which she seldom used, and never
exerted in vain.
But her influence was gradually diminishing. As Bolingbroke
grew rich, he became more and more rapacious. The other
traders
were practising every popular art to recommend themselves,
to destroy him, and to rise upon the ruins of his prosperity; and
his vigilant wife more than once protected his life and property,
by discovering the designs of his enemies, and secretly appealing
to her father for protection. These things, however, did not
disturb
her peace. Vigilant by natureaccustomed to danger from
childhood, and inured to all the vicissitudes of the savage mode
of lifeshe could watch with composure over a husband's safety,
and expose her own existence without fear. Perhaps, to one of
her habits, the excitement of such a life was agreeable; and she
certainly felt a pride in becoming thus important to him who was
the sole object of her love.
But while she despised the machinations of her husband's foes,
with all the disdain of a proud woman, it was not without
uneasiness
that she discovered a sensible diminution in the cordiality of
her own friends. She had married one who was an alien to her
tribe, and such marriages always produce estrangement. They
saw her abandoning the customs of her country, and throwing
aside the dress of her people. She mingled but little with the
women of the Omawhaws; and while she tacitly condemned some
of their practices by her own deportment, she withdrew her
sanction
from some of their ancient rites by her absence. Her
improvements
in domestic economy were regarded with ridicule and
jealousy. The young braves no longer regarded her with pride,
as the beauty of their nation, but considered her as one who had
apostatized from the customs of her fathers, and degraded herself
by linking her destiny with that of a stranger from a foreign land.
She felt that she, who had been the idol of the tribe, was
sustained
by the wealth of her husband and the power of her father, and
not by the affection of those around her.
It was the custom of Bolingbroke to descend the river annually
to St. Louis, for the purpose of renewing his stock of merchandise
and he had been married but a few months when the first
absence
,
of this kind occurred. On his return, his young wife
received
him with the utmost tenderness. He was charmed to hear
of the discretion with which she had conducted herself in his
absence
,
and to perceive the many evidences of the manner in which
she had spent her time. He learned that she had lived a retired
life, engaging in none of the public festivals, and receiving few
visiters at her house. She had laboured incessantly in decorating
their dwelling, or in fabricating such articles of dress for her
husband
as she thought would please his fancy; while she had
noticed
with careful attention the movements of the tribe, and
gathered
up every rumour, the intelligence of which might be useful
to him in his mercantile concerns.
Another year came, and again he left her. His absence was
protracted during several months, and within this period she
became
the mother of a daughter, which she nursed with the fondest
solicitude. Her love for her husband, and her anxiety for his
return
,
seemed to increase after this event. With her infant in her
arms, she wandered out daily to a secluded spot on the bank of
the river, where she would sit for hours, following the downward
course of the river with eager eyes, to gain the earliest notice of
5
his approach. Estimating his feelings by her own, she was
impatient
for the moment when she could place the interesting
stranger in his arms, and see him gaze with delight at that
beautiful
miniature in which each might see the features of the other.
Nor was she disappointed. Bolingbroke caressed his child with
fondness, and she was the happiest of mothersthe produest of
wives.
We must touch briefly upon the subsequent events of this
narrative
.
Another and another year rolled away, and Menae was
still the devoted wife, while Bolingbroke was become a cold,
though a civil husband: he bending all his energies to the
acquisition
of wealth, she bringing in her diurnal tribute of love, and
living only to promote his happiness. They had now two
children
,
and when the time approached for his annual visit to the
settlements of the white people, he proposed to carry the eldest
with him. The wife, always obedient, reluctantly consented, and
commanded her feelings so far as to behold their departure in
mute, suppressed affliction. But, although one charge remained,
upon which she might lavish her caresses, no sooner had her
husband commenced his voyage, than her maternal fondness
overpowered
her, and she ran screaming along the shore of the river,
in pursuit of the boat, tearing out her long glossy tresses, and
appearing
almost bereft of reason. Unable to overtake the boat, she
returned disconsolate, and assumed the deepest mourning which
the customs of her tribe impose on the state of widowhood. She
cut off her beautiful raven locks, gave away her ornaments, and
every thing that she had worn in her day of pride, and clothed
herself in humble attire. Confining herself to her own dwelling,
she refused the visits of her friends, and repelled their offers of
consolation. She said that she well knew that her daughter
would be better treated among the whites than she could be at
home, but she could not avoid regarding her own situation to be
the same as if the Wahcondah had taken away her offspring
forever
.
By degrees her remaining child began to absorb the entire
current of her affections, and, on his account, she resumed the
performance of her household duties, though she would not throw
aside her mourning. One day, she had gone in company with
some other females to the corn-fields, adjoining the village, and
was engaged in agricultural labours, her infant boy being secured,
after the Indian fashion, to a board, which she had carefully
leaned against a tree. They were discovered by a lurking war
party of the Sioux, who rushed upon them suddenly, in the
expectation
of gratifying their vengeance by the massacre of the
whole party. An exclamation of terror, uttered by one of the
females, on discovering the enemy, caused the alarmed women
to fly precipitately; and Menae, in the first moment of affright,
was in the act of retreating with the others, when she recollected
her child. To save a life more precious than her own, she
swiftly
returned in the face of the Sioux warriors, snatched her child
from the tree, and bore him rapidly away. She was closely
pursued
by one of the savages, who had nearly overtaken her, when
she arrived at a fence which separated the field from the
enclosure
surrounding the trading-house. A moment's hesitation
would have been fatalbut, with a presence of mind which
always
distinguished her above other women, she gathered all her
strength, threw the child, with its board, into the enclosure, and
then, placing her hands on the fence, leaped nimbly over.
Several
of her companions were murdered, while she escaped, with
her child, unhurt.
[12]
[12]
See Appendix, No. XII.
After a longer absence than usual, Bolingbroke returned,
bringing
with him an accomplished lady, of his own people, whom he
had married, but unaccompanied by his Indian daughter, whom
he had placed at school. Menae heard this intelligence with the
deepest sorrow, but with less surprise than such an event would
have occasioned a wife in a civilized land; as the practice of
polygamy
,
which prevails among the Omawhaws, had perhaps
prepared
her to regard such an occurrence as not improbable. She
was stung to the heart, by the conviction that she had lost the
love of him, who was dearer to her than all the world, and for
whom she had sacrificed so much; and mortified that another
should be preferred to herself. But the legality of the
transaction
,
and its frequency among the people of her tribe, lulled, in
some degree, the sense of degradation, and blunted the sharpness
of her resentment. She considered the act lawful, while she
condemned
the actor as faithless and ungrateful. In secresy she
wept bitterly over her disappointed pride, and blighted joy; but
professed in public a cheerful acquiescence in the decision of her
husband. The Blackbird was now dead; and the keen-sighted
Menae could not blind herself to the conviction, that the decease
of her father had rendered her of less importance to the
mercenary
trader.
Previous to the arrival of Bolingbroke at the Omawhaw
village
,
he despatched a message to the trading-house, announcing
his marriage, and forbidding his Indian wife from appearing in
the presence of her rival. To this cruel mandate she submitted,
with that implicit obedience which the females of her race are
accustomed to pay to the commands of their husbands, and
departed
to a distant village of her nation. But what woman can
trust the weakness of her heart? Conjugal love, and maternal
fondness, both allured her to the presence of him who had so long
been the master of her affections. Which of these was the
prevailing
inducement, it is difficult to conjecture; she longed to see
Bolingbroke, and her heart yearned for tidings from her absent
child, but without this plea, her pride would probably have
forbidden
her from seeking an interview with the destroyer of her
peace. Unable to remain in banishment, she returned to her
native
village, with her little boy on her back, and encamped in the
neighbourhood of her husband's residencein sight of that
cottage
which her own hands had embellished, in which she had
spent years of domestic felicity, and where another now reigned
in her place. She sent her son to the trader, who treated him
affectionately. On the following day he commanded her presence,
and she stood before him, in the house which had been her own,
with her arms meekly folded upon her breast, gazing calmly on
the cold but handsome features of him, who was the lord of her
destiny. Suppressing every other feeling, and avoiding all other
topics, she enquired for her daughter, and listened with interest
to such information as he was pleased to give her. She then,
with much composure, desired to know his intentions in relation
to the future disposition of both her children. To this question
he gave an evasive manner; and directed her to accompany her
friends, who were on the way to the hunting grounds. She
departed
without a murmur.
Two months afterwards, she was recalled. She lost no time in
presenting herself before the husband whom she still tenderly
loved, notwithstanding his unprincipled desertion. Her
resentment
had in a great measure subsided, and rather than be
banished
entirely from his affection, she was content to share it with
another, according to the usages of her tribe. Such she supposed
to be his intention in sending for her, and she freely forgave the
temporary aberration of his love, under the supposition that she
would be to him hereafter, if not his sole favourite, at least a
respected
wife, that her children would find a home under his roof,
and that he would be to her and them a faithful protector. Alas!
how the heart, given up to the illusions of love, cheats itself with
visions of future bliss! How often does the young wife build up a
fabric of happiness, which like the icy palace of the Russian
potentate
,
is splendid to the eye in the hour of its illumination, but
melts away with the first change of the season! The New Moon
hastened to her husband, full of hope, and newly-kindled
affection
;
but bitter was her disappointment, when, after an austere
reception, he demanded the surrender of her son, and renounced
any future association with herself, directing her to return to her
people, and to provide for her own support as she might see
proper.
Indignant at being thus repudiated, overcome by feelings which
she could not control, and alarmed at the proposed separation from
her child, she rushed from the house with the infant in her arms,
and finding a canoe on the river shore, paddled over to the
opposite
side, and made her escape into the forest. The weather was
cold and stormy, the snow was falling, and the wretched mother
had no shelter to protect her. Thoughout the whole night she
wandered about in the wilderness, hugging her babe to her bosom,
and keeping it alive by the warmth of her own breast. But, worn
down with fatigue and exposure, and discouraged by her
disconsolate
condition, she determined in the morning to return, and,
with the feelings of a wife and mother, to plead her cause before
the arbiter of her fate.
Early in the morning, the wretched woman, faint, hungry, and
shivering with cold, presented herself before him, who, in the hour
of her beauty, had sued for her favour. She, who had loved, and
cherished, and counselled, and protected him, and who had higher
claims upon him than any other living individual, stood a
trembling
suppliant at his door.
Here is our child, said she; I do not question your
fondness
for himbut he is still more dear to me. You cannot love
him with a mother's love, nor keep him with a mother's care.
You say that you will keep him for yourself, and drive me far
from you. But, noI will remain with him. You may spurn
me from your own society, but you cannot drive me from my
child. Take him and feed him. I can find some corner into
which I may creep, in order to be near him, and hear him when
he cries for his mother, and sometimes see him. If you will not
give me food, I will remain until I starve, and die before your
eyes.
There are those who have no feeling. The trader had none.
Not a chord in his bosom vibrated to this eloquent appeal. A
young and beautiful woman reduced to penurya mother folding
her infant in her armshis own wife, the mother of his children
she who had cherished his interest and honour more dearly than
her own life, and who would have endured any anguish to have
saved
him from a momentary pang;with all these, and a thousand
other claims upon his sympathy and justice, she was an
unsuccessful
suppliant.
He offered her money, and desired her to leave the child. Her
blood rushed to her heart at the base proposal, and she
indignantly
repliedIs my child a dog, that I should sell him for
merchandise
?
You cannot drive me away; you may beat me, you
may taunt me with insults, but I will remain. When you
married
me, you promised to use me kindly as long as I should be
faithful to you; that I have always been so, no one can deny.
I have loved you with tenderness, and served you with fidelity.
Ours was not a marriage contracted for a seasonit was to
terminate
only with our lives. I was then a young girl, the daughter
of the head man of the Omawhaws, and might have been united to
a chief of my nation; but now I am an old woman, the mother
of two children, and what Omawhaw will regard me? Is not
my right superior to that of your other wife? She had heard of
me before you possessed her. It is true, her skin is whiter than
mine, but her heart cannot be more pure towards you, nor her
fidelity more rigid. Do not take the child from my breastI
cannot bear to hear it cry, and not be present to relieve it;
permit
me to retain it until the spring, when it will be able to eat,
and then, if it must be so, take it from my sight, that I may part
with it but once.
The trader remained inexorable; he listened, with apathy, to
the feeling appeal of his wife; but, finding her inflexible, and
knowing her high spirit, he attempted no replycoolly remarking
that she might remain there if she pleased, but that the child
should immediately be sent down to the settlements.
The affectionate mother had thus far sustained herself, during
the interview, with the firmness of conscious right, and had
successfully
curbed the impulse of her feelings; but nature now
yielded, the tears burst from her eyesand clasping her hands,
and bowing her head, she gave way to her grief, exclaiming
Why did the Master of Life hate me so much, as to induce me
to put my child again into your power?
But, no, she continued, after a momentary pause, we are
not in your poweryou have renounced my obedienceI no
longer owe you any duty. I belong to a free wild race, that has
never submitted to oppression. The pale face shall learn that the
blood of an Omawhaw chief runs in the veins of his discarded
wife. For herself, she has no wrongs to resentbut for her child
she can strike the death-blow with as firm an arm as that of the
warrior. My son shall not go to the fires of the white people,
to be their servant, and to be insulted for his descent from an
Indian mother. He shall not be trained up in the corn-fields like
a squaw, or be taught to sell his honour for money, like the trader
of the white Americans. I shall take him with me. He is mine,
and shall never be taken alive from my arms. Attempt to
separate
us, and I will strike this knife to his heart, and then put an
end to my own wretched existence!
So saying, she darted away with a swiftness which announced
that the resolution of her mind had imparted new vigour to her
limbs; while the trader, alarmed by her threats, abandoned his
purpose, and suffered her to retire without pursuit.
Two weeks afterwards, a haggard female was seen slowly
approaching
a distant hunting-camp of the Omawhaws, bearing an
emaciated child on her back. It was she who once had been the
pride of their nationthe daughter of that dreaded chief whose
word was law. She had wandered through the woods, thinly
clad, and almost without food, subsisting upon such small game
as she could entrap by artifice. At night she crept into a hollow
tree, or scraped the snow from the ground, and nestled in the
leaves. She had traversed the wide prairies, now desolate and
snow-clad, on whose broad expanse scarce a living animal was
seen, and over which the bleak wind swept with unbroken power.
The wolf had tracked her footsteps, and howled around the dreary
spot of her lonesome encampment. Without a path or a guide
ignorant of the intended movements of her tribe, and uncertain
where to find themexposed to imminent and constantly
impending
danger from cold, hunger, beasts of prey, and hostile savages
this intrepid female pursued her solitary way through the vast
wilderness with unbroken spirit, trusting to her native courage
and sagacity, and praying to the Great Master of Life for
assistance
.
And who doubts that such a prayer is heard? Who
can doubt that the same beneficient God who decks the wilderness
with matchless beauty, and stores it with abundance, listens to
the plaintive cry of the widowed mother and her innocent babe?
How often do the weak and helpless pass unhurt through perils
under which the bold and strong would sink, or endure
privations
for the support of which humanity seems unequal! And
can we see this without believing that the same unseen
influence
,
which tempers the wind to the shorn lamb, is ever ready
to listen to the petition of the afflicted? and that those who seem
most friendless and destitute are the favoured objects of the most
efficient protection? Yesthere is a prayer that is heard,
though it ascend not from the splendid edifices erected by pride
or piety, nor clothes itself in the rounded periods of polished
eloquence. There is a religion of the heart, and a language
of nature; and God, who so organized the flower that it turns
itself to the sun, to catch vigour from the life-giving ray, has
so framed the human bosom that it spontaneously expands itself
to Him in the hour of adversity. She prayed to the Great Spirit,
and he conducted her safely through the wilderness.
The Omawhaws had regarded the wife of Bolingbroke with
coldness, when they saw her surrounded with affluence superior
to their own, and considered her as an apostate from the ancient
customs of her people. Their love for her was turned to distrust,
while they beheld her in a foreign garb, and viewed her as the
ally of the white man. But when she came back to them a
destitute
,
houseless, deserted woman, they received her with
kindness
,
restored her to the place she had occupied in their confidence,
and poured out bitter curses upon her faithless husband. As she
repeated the story of her abandonment, even in the softened
language
of an unwilling accuser, their indignant comments showed
that they had made her cause their own. Bolingbroke was no
longer protected by the mysterious power of the dreaded chief, his
rivals had already supplanted him in the affections of the tribe,
and his last offence overturned the tottering fabric of his
popularity
.
The passions of the Indian know no mediumwhat they
condemn they hate, and whatever they hate they destroy. The
doom of the trader was deliberately fixed. It was unsparing and
irrevocable. Him, and his household, and all that he possessed,
were solemnly doomed to death and plunder.
The following morning Menae stood in a secluded spot, at some
distance from the encampment, in earnest conversation with a
young warrior of a bold and prepossessing appearance, whose
hand was twisted in the mane of a fiery steed.
You know the white trader? said she.
Yes, he gave me a blanket once.
Was that all?
The first time that I went to hunt, he filled my horn with
powder, and promised me good luck.
Think once more. You owe a larger debt than that to the
white trader.
When my father was killed by the Sioux, and I was badly
wounded, none of the Omawhaws took pity on me, for there was
a scarcity in the village. You took me into your wigwam, cured
my wounds, and fed me with the white man's provisions.
5*
You owe him your life.
I owe it to you.
To us both.
I am willing to pay the debt. I have often said that I would
die for the New Moon, and I am not unfriendly to the trader; I
have eaten his bread.
You can be secret?
The serpent, which has no voice, is not more secret than I.
Go to the white trader. Let none see you departlet none
but him see you at the principal village of the Omawhaws. Tell
him that Menae sent youthat she, who helped to build up his
fortune, who has for years watched over his safety, now warns
him of danger, and bids him fly to the settlements of his own
people
.
Say that the spirit of my father has whispered in my ear
that the Omawhaws have predicted the death of the trader. Tell
him that I shall never see him againI would not condescend to
be his wife, or his servant; I would starve rather than eat his
breadbut I should grieve to see the father of my children die
the death of a dog, or the pale girl, whom he has chosen for his
wife, suffering the penalty of his crime. He knows I would not
deceive him. I have but one tongueit has always spoken the
truth. We walked together for yearsI have looked back at
my path, and find that it is white. Bid them fly to the fires of
the white people, before another moon shall be seen in the place
of that which is now waning. And say to Bolingbroketo the
white traderthat if he feels any gratitude to her who has more
than once been a true friend in the hour of peril, and now saves
him, and his new wife, from the rage of the Maha braves, he will
restore her daughter to the arms of its mother. Let him do this,
and Menae will forgive his faithless treatment of herself, and
forget
all her sorrows.
The young Indian bent his head, and listened attentively, as
Menae pronounced these words with a rapid but distinct utterance.
He then said, respectfully,
It shall be donethough it grieves me to disappoint the
Omawhaw warriors of their just vengeance. But the daughter of
Blackbird was a mother to me, when I was a sick boy; I will be
a son to her now that I am a man. When I had no home, I slept
in the white man's house; it shall not be burned over his head.
He loosened his hand from the mane of the young horse, on
whose neck he leaned, and the liberated animal dashed away
over the plain, snuffing the keen air of the morning, and throwing
up the snow with his heels.
Why turn your horse loose, enquired his companion, when
you have immediate use for his services?
The Indian smiled, and said, No man rides on horseback
when his business is secret. My own feet will leave no track
upon the frozen snow. I have a store of dried meat hidden in
the woods, which I can easily find. Farewell. The grayest
head among the Omawhaws shall not find my trail, nor discover
my errand.
Shortly after this event, the Indians learned, to their great
disappointment
,
that Bolingbroke had suddenly abandoned the village,
with all his property, and announced his intention to return no
more; but they never discovered the cause of his abrupt
departure
.
On the next visit of the other traders to St. Louis, the
daughter of Menae was placed under their charge, to be
delivered
to her mother, who received her child with the joy of one who had
mourned over a first-born. She lived afterwards in retirement,
seldom appearing at the festivals of the nation, and observing the
decent gravity of a widowed matroncarefully bringing up her
children after the fashion of her own people, and continually
advising
them to avoid the society, the customs, and the vices of the
whites.
THE RED SKY OF THE MORNING.
A FEW years only have elapsed since the great lakes lying upon
the northern frontier of the United States, were surrounded by
vast tracts of silent wilderness, and navigated by the birch canoe
of the native Indian and the adventurous trader. Within the
memory of living men, the savage exercised dominion over nearly
the whole of that vast region, and the bold or inquisitive traveller
who explored those desert shores, endured the various fatigues
and perils incident to voyages of discovery into parts unknown to
civilized men. There was the solitude of nature as it reigns
undisturbed
by human enterprise; and there roamed, alike
untamed
,
the savage man and the wild beast. Beautiful to the eye,
and highly exciting to the imagination, were those broad lakes,
and their magnificent shoresthe bays, the islets, the headlands,
and all the attractive features of a blended woodland and water
scenery; but they were solitary and cheerless deserts.
The scene is now changed, as if by magic. Those inland seas
are covered with the fleets of commerce, their bays and inlets are
studded with villages, their rivers pour out a daily and hourly
tribute of rich freights, and their waters are cleft by steamboats,
whose ample size, beauty of model, and magnificence of interior
decoration, cause them to be justly described as floating palaces.
The hard hand of industry is at work there, and pleasure spreads
her glittering wing in the sunshine. Wealth is there with her
millions, and enterprise prolific of novel schemes, and daring
undertakings
.
Such are the wonderful changes which have taken place in all
the larger lakes, but one. Lake Superior alone, remains
surrounded
by the silent forest, and the abodes of savage hunters;
and there are permanent obstacles in the climate and topography
of this dreary region, which will long repel from it the footsteps
of civilization.
In ascending the chain of lakes, the voyager, after passing the
Sault de Sainte Mary, no longer sees the fertile lands, the rich
green forests, and the attractive scenery which delight the eye,
on the shores of the more southern and eastern of these
Mediterranean
seas. Around him are the rigours of a high latitude, and
the desolate features of a sterile country. The shores are bold
and rocky, presenting a series of naked precipices, which afford
but little for the subsistence of man or beast. The scenery is
often magnificent, and highly picturesque; but has no features of
repose, of softness, or of richness. Gigantic precipices are seen
towering upward from the water's edge, presenting the outlines of
gothic architecture. Huge ramparts, arches, and turretsshapes
innumerable and fantastic, worn by the elements from the solid
barriers of rock that skirt the shore, appear continually, to seduce
the imagination, and surprise the mind, of the traveller. The
general character is cold and cheerless, inhospitable and
appalling
.
The wave beats angrily against a dangerous coast, whose
scanty verdure offers little to please the eye. Now and then, the
voyager is deluded by the appearance of a valley whose deep
recess
protects a rich growth of green foliage, but on steering his
canoe towards it, he finds a narrow channel communicating with
a small lake, or with a swamp. As he meanders the numerous
bays, and the perilous capes, he finds a succession of the same
grand and imposing landscape; the broad lake, the bleak
precipice
,
and the dreary swamp varied by situation and outline,
compose
the elements of every scene.
Leaving the great lake, and proceeding still farther to the north
and west, a boundless region is presented, of sterile, broken, and
rocky country, intersected by rivers, channels, swamps, and small
lakesa savage wilderness of land and water. So numerous are
the communications which connect these lakes, that the whole
region
may be traversed by canoes, in almost every direction; and
the stranger, who follows his guide through the labyrinth, becomes
bewildered by its intricacies, while he is awed by its vast extent,
and dreary sameness.
The gloomy desert to which we have attempted to conduct the
reader, is greatly elevated above the level of the larger lakes, and
the water courses which are navigated to approach it, are
interrupted
by numerous rapids and cataracts, some of which are said
to rival the falls of Niagara in magnitude and sublimity. The
navigation is therefore performed by means only of the light birch
canoe, which is taken from the water, and transported on the
shoulders of men, around such obstructions.
Here, at the summit level, and in the heart of this great
continent
,
lie the sources of the St. Lawrence and the Mississippi,
which thus rising together, twin offspring of a common fountain,
flow off in different directions, and after roaming, each its
thousand
leagues, fall into the ocean at points separated by thirty
degrees
of latitude.
The winter, lingering in this high latitude, throughout more
than half the year, covers the whole surface of land and water
with ice and snow, locks up all the sources of vegetation, and
drives the wild bird and beast to more genial climates.
The only human inhabitants of this inhospitable desert, are the
Ojibway Indians, more commonly called the Chippeways, and to
whom, for the sake of perspicuity, we shall apply the latter name.
No branch of the human family lead a more precarious life than
this wretched people. Relying entirely upon the chase, and the
wild products of the soil, for subsistence, they have no
agriculture
,
nor any settled places of abode. They feast to excess when
game is abundant, but make so little provision for the future, that
a short season of scarcity reduces them to absolute want. Their
most important supply of food is derived from the wild rice, which
grows spontaneously in the swamps, and is gathered by the women
in large quantities, but this bounty of Nature, so wisely provided
to supply the population with food during the inclement season, is
so improvidently used as to be quickly exhausted. The long
winter
finds them destitute; the animals constituting game have fled
to more fruitful lands, and famine scowls over the desolated
wilderness
.
The wretched inhabitants are now reduced to the
most dreadful expedientslong and painful journeys are
undertaken
in pursuit of foodtheir dogs and horses are devoured
their moccasins and buffalo robes are chewedand at last many
sink exhausted by famine, or perish wretchedly in the great snow
drifts. Even these miserable wanderings are confined within the
same inclement region; the more sunny plains lying to the south,
to which the buffalo and deer retire, being inhabited by hostile
tribes.
Although numerous, and scattered over a wide expanse of
territory
,
the Chippeways have no national organization, and scarcely
a semblance of local government. Here and there a few families
are found collected into a band, ruled by chiefs; but the
temporary
bond which unites them is dissolved whenever food becomes
scarce, when they scatter to the four winds like the leaves in
autumn, each family relying upon its own exertions. The chief
retains his office; an empty honour during the greater portion of
his life, which is spent like that of the humblest individual of his
people, in solitary and painful wanderings in search of the means
to satisfy the eravings of hunger. But in the short and joyful
season of plenty, when the rice harvest is ripe, when game is
food in the woods, and the lakes are covered with water-fowl, the
bands reassemble, and the chiefs taste the sweets, and the cares,
of authority.
The numbers composing these bands depend much on caprice
and accident. If a chief is successful in war or hunting,
individuals
seek his banner and adhere to him so long as fortune
smiles; defeat in battle, or a scarcity of game breaks asunder
the feeble ties which bind these communities together, and
disperses them throughout the whole length and breadth of the
Chippeway country. The chiefs retain the name and the respect
attached to that station, and take their seats as such in the councils
which occasionally assemble to celebrate feasts, or religious
ceremonies
,
or to consider of the general interests of the people, while
their actual power, as we have seen, depends on their personal
good fortune and popularity. Unless, however, a chief be utterly
imbecile or worthless, he is never entirely abandoned. A few
relatives, friends, and zealous adherents who cling to their clan
under the worst aspect of its fortune, usually reunite after a forced
separation, and keep the name of the band. But there is a
floating
mass, who are Chippeways at large, and who are ready to
march at any moment, under any banner of their nation which
may be in the ascendant.
There was a chief
[13]
[13]
See Appendix, No. XIII.
of the Chippeways, whose name was
Notin, or The Wind, and who was descended from a chief of the
same name, and perhaps from a long line of equally illustrious
ancestors; for it seems to be a time-honoured maxim among all
savages, that greatness is inheritable, and that talents for
governing
especially, are transmitted without alloy from father to son.
We have never heard it asserted that the skill of the lawyer or
physician, passed with his goods and chattels, to his heirs, but it
is certainly held by a majority of mankind, that the son of a ruler
is better fitted to bear rule, than a person of plebeian descent;
and it is not until nations reach a high degree of refinement that
this ancient fallacy, if it be one, becomes exploded.
Among the Indians, however, the rule of legitimacy is
admirably
qualified in practice, for whenever the next heir of a deceased
chief happens to be a pacific or indolent person, some daring
leader conducts the braves to battle, and rules the tribe in the
name of the proper head man. Something of the same kind
prevails in the best regulated monarchies, where, if the king
happens to be an infant, an idiot, a sot, or a woman, the
business
is done by a substitute. But the Indians carry it a little
farther, and if the heir be deficient in moral or physical
qualifications
,
he is passed over, and the next of kin after him is selected;
and if no suitable person is found in the family, then some
successful
warrior succeeds to the chieftaincy.
Our friend Notin held his sovereignty in the regular way. He
had good blood in his veins and could recount the exploits of his
forefathers, in their wars against the Dacotas, for several
generations
.
He was married, moreover, to the daughter of the chief
of another band of the great Ojibway stock; thus, with
commendable
prudence, securing to his own descendants, the
advantages
of a pure regal descent.
Neither was this leader destitute of pretensions on the score of
personal merit. He wore a necklace composed of the claws of
an enormous grisly bear, that he had slain in single combat; he
had stolen horses from the British, the Americans, and the Sioux
bands of the Mississippi; the scalps of his enemies graced his
lodge, and when dressed in full costume, he decked his hair with
seven feathers of the war eagle, indicating the number of
warriors
he had slain in battle. He rode well, fished patiently, and
smoked the great pipe with dignity and composure. He was
expert in tracing out the lurking places of the otter and beaver in
the small streams and secluded valleys; and when in summer he
announced an intention to travel southward to the great plains to
hunt the buffalo, the braves flocked to his banner, eager to engage
in the chase under a leader of such repute; for in these
expeditions
they encroached upon the hunting-grounds of the warlike
Dacotas, who often attacked them, and they desired to serve
under one who could marshal them in battle.
Such was Notin, chief of the Thunder Lake band of the
Chippeways
,
whose sway extended over twenty lodges, and who on
one occasion had conducted a hundred horsemen upon a hunting
expedition on the prairies of the Mississippi. He was, moreover,
like the present king of the French, a careful man in his
domestic
economy, and was master of seven horses, ten dogs, three
guns, and several steel traps to take beaver withal, which made
him the wealthiest person of his clan; and he seldom appeared in
public without a train of five or six young men, who followed his
steps that they might learn the arts of the chase by his counsel
and example, in return for which advantage, they always brought
the game they took, to his lodge, and were ready to stand by him
in his private quarrels.
In one particular, this distinguished chief was singular; and to
the remarkable circumstance which we are about to disclose, does
he owe the honour of figuring as the prominent personage of our
legend; for, had he lived like the mass of his countrymen, like
them he would have gone to an obscure grave, and his name
have been preserved for a few generations only, in the ephemeral
traditions of his people. But Notin was not like other men. He
was one of the few who follow not with slavish subserviency the
dictates of fashion, but take the rare and somewhat perilous
responsibility
of thinking for themselves. In most things he
pursued
the beaten track in which his ancestors had trodden, time
out of mind. As a chief, he violated no law nor usage of his
tribe; he smoked the same pipe which his father had used before
himheld it in the same position, and blew the smoke through his
nostrils in the same way; so that the old men, struck with the
resemblance, and with the filial piety, as well as the respect for
public opinion which it indicated, were affected almost to tears,
when they beheld him thus employed. It is by such concessions
to the wisdom of past ages, that kings and rulers reign in the
hearts of their people.
Some casuists would insist that a single departure from the
settled usages of his race, by one who in all other respects
conformed
strictly with custom and public opinion, should be set
down as a mere eccentricity, and not as an evidence of moral
firmness, or originality of thought. We think differently; and
without stopping to argue the question, maintain that Notin
showed
good sense as well as boldness, in taking the stand he
occupied
,
in regard to a question of great importance to himself, and
of no little delicacy as it respected his social and political
relations
.
The matter was this: Notin had but one wife. No other
instance
of the kind had ever occurred in his family, all the chiefs
of the Thunder Lake band having maintained a plurality of
wives, and practised a generous hospitality. Not only the head
men, but every individual in the tribe, married as many women
as he could support; and to have but one, was as indisputable a
proof of being a poor creature, as it would be for one of our
merchants
to have no credit in bank. It seemed strange, therefore,
that Notin, who was an excellent hunter, and as we have already
specified, a very opulent personage, should content himself with
a single partner.
It is not pretended that the Indians cherish the social virtues
and affections to a degree so far superior to other men, as to
require
a numerous family circle, in order to afford them full
scope; for fashion, always heartless and artificial in its decrees,
may demand that which nature may repudiate. There are other
reasons, no doubt, for the discrepancy between their notions and
ours, on this very interesting subject, which it may be well to
investigate
.
If marriage be honourable among men, who shall
blame them for desiring to reap its blessings to the greatest
practicable
extent? And who shall say that an institution which
might be very inconvenient to us, may not be an exceedingly
rational
and pleasant thing at Thunder Lake?
Society has not reached a high state of refinement at Thunder
Lake. Morning visits, promenades and soirees, are not in vogue
there; nor do the ladies indulge in the expensive luxury of
shopping
.
There are no auctions in that benighted regionno old
picturessecond-hand furniture, nor cast-off jewellery, offered
very low
, to tempt the vanity and avarice of very economical and
ambitious, and would-be very fine ladies. Silks and satins,
Leghorn
bonnets, and merino shawls, are wholly unknown even in
the best circles of Thunder Lake. There are neither music
masters, nor French masters, nor Italian singers, nor imported
dancing girls, to be supported by the hard earnings of the indulgent
father and husband. There are no societies to coax from the
tenderhearted
matron the pittances of time and money remaining
unappropiated
,
from the more clamorous demands of dissipation and
extravagance; nor is it the fashion for indigent young men to be
educated by the contributions of indigent young women.
Marriage, therefore, in the pure and original state of that
blessed
institution, such as existed in the times of the ancient
patriarch
,
and such as now prevails among our red brethren, is a
very different affair from any thing which is known to more
civilized
communities. The aboriginal may marry once and again,
without incurring the fearful responsibilities which rest upon the
husband in our more artificial mode of life. A plurality of
tender
and beloved wives might enliven his fireside, by the manifold
joys of connubial love, without the danger of making him
bankrupt
by their extravagance.
Men naturally do that which they conceive will best secure
their happiness. All, except confirmed bachelors and
misanthropes
,
admit the felicity and blessedness of the holy state of
matrimony; and if this proposition be conceded, it follows, that
as we multiply the causes and agents of wedded bliss, we increase
the chances for happiness. If marriage be a source of comfort
and joy unspeakable, can we doubt the wisdom of frequently
adding new fuel to the genial flame, and keeping up a
comfortable
fire upon the altar of domestic love? In short, if the husband
of one wife be a happy man, would not he be thrice blessed, who
should be honoured with the plighted faith of three?
The wife of Notin was beautiful. She was taller than other
women of her race; her form was noble and commanding, and
her countenance very pleasing. Instead of the vacant and
sullen
expression exhibited in the features of most of the Indian
women
,
she wore a satisfied and cheerful aspect, and had an air of
smartness which showed that she considered herself of some
importance
.
Notin was very fond of her, and was strongly
suspected
of giving her more of his confidence than was usually
conceded
to the wives of the Chippewayshad such a thing been
imagined
possible among that manly race, he would have been
considered
a henpecked husband.
This couple had an only child, a daughter, who was called
Misquabunokwa, or, The Red Sky of the Morning, who inherited
her mother's beauty, spirit, and quickness of intellect. They
who decry female beauty as mere vanity, are but superficially
versed in the movements of the human heart. To speak of it
lightly as an outwnrd show, as an ephemeral possession that
blooms and is blighted with the passing season, may be very
plausible, but is also very fallacious. The beauty of a woman
is a substantial quality of such value, that there is scarcely a
doubt whether it be not the pearl of price, the most precious gift
of nature. It is the talisman of her power, the agent and the
symbol of her sovereignty. Men not only admire, but do homage
to it; they not merely love, but worship it. Wealth, intellect,
and attainments sink into nothing in comparison with this power,
which outshines, while it adorns and vivifies them all. It is so
irresistibly attractive as to produce a powerful reactive influence
on the character of its possessor. The beautiful girl soon
becomes
conscious of a power that elevates her above her
companions
.
The love of admiration plants itself deeply in her mind;
and the desire to deserve and win that tribute inspires her thoughts
and polishes her manners. The ambition to please becomes a
ruling passion; and no woman of superior personal attractions
ever made that attempt in vain. Politeness and gracefulness grow
out of the continual effort to gain approbation; unless, indeed,
where the defect of mind is so great as to substitute arrogance and
self-conceit. Even the savage is unable to resist the fascination;
and whenever a woman possessing to a high degree, the peculiar
graces of her sex, rises above the mere drudge, and aspires to be
the companion, the idol, or even the sovereign of man, she
usually
succeeds to a certain extent, and only fails of complete success
from the want of the support of her own sex. One swallow does
not make a summer, nor can one fair woman inspire a whole
people.
The handsome wife and daughter of Notin were ambitious;
and it was probably through their influence that no other female
was admitted to their family circle, while their cheerfulness and
assiduity threw around their fireside so many unwonted charms
and comforts, that Notin, yielding to the natural indolence of the
savage character, grew every year less active in hunting, and
more reluctant to lead his braves to the war path. His people,
while they still respected his person and office, began to follow
younger and more enterprising leaders; and the women of the
village failed not to throw out hints, in season and out of season,
against the bad practice of having but one wife, and the sinister
influence of handsome women over brave chiefs.
From the causes we have mentioned, or some other, the
popularity
of Notin declined, and as the season approached, when it
became necessary to provide for the winter, the tribe began
gradually
to disperse, either singly or in small parties, until not more
than a dozen families remained at Thunder Lake. These were
the personal friends of the chief, who still lingered around him,
though participating in some degree in the coolness which had
infected
the band. At last it became necessary that they also
should seek a more suitable wintering place, and a meeting of all
the men was called, to debate on the subject. After the pipe had
been passed round, they sat some time in perfect silence. Then
an old man arose and addressed the meeting:
Brothers! In the winter the wind comes from the North,
and is very cold; it goes to the South and gets warm, and comes
back in the summer, melting the ice, and causing the grass and
trees to grow. Thus we know that one end of this great island
is very cold, and the other very hot. There is no place that is
pleasant all the year round, except that happy land to which the
spirits of good men go after death.
Brothers, listen! We do not know why the Master of Life
made it so, but we know that summer is gone and winter is
coming
.
The Great Spirit has taught the brutes to fly from the North
wind, and to hide themselves when the storm spirits are let loose
upon the earth.
Brothers, look around! The water fowl have left the lakes
and islands where they hatched their young. They have risen
up in great flocks, and fill the air like clouds. They are
screaming
for joy because they see a bright land, far off, where they can
get plenty to eat, for the waters there will not be frozen in the
winter
.
Let us be wise like the buffaloes, that have gone to the green
pastures of the Missouri, and the water fowl that have fled to the
quiet lakes of a sunny land. Let us take pity on our women and
little children, and carry them to the great plains, where there is
game to feed upon.
Brothers! I have spoken.
This speech was well received. A grunt of approbation
followed
each sentence, and at the close they all drew a long breath,
as if each felt relieved of his own doubts.
Then Notin took the pipe slowly from his mouth, letting the
bowl of it fall quietly into his left hand, and blowing the smoke
out deliberately through his nostrils, like one who was in deep
thought. He raised his eyes and looked around upon the
company
.
All were silent, for they knew the chief was about to
speak. He laid aside the pipe and arose, threw the blanket from
his right shoulder, so as to leave his right arm bare, and then
drew it closely around him. His attitude was graceful and
commanding
,
and his figure such as an artist would have chosen to
study. He spoke in a loud, clear voice, looking round upon the
whole assemblage, as if addressing himself to each in turn. He
said:
My children! I have listened to my brother who has just sat
down. He is an old man. The snow has fallen so often on his
head, that it has turned white. He is like a tree covered with
frost. He is wiser than I am; listen to his words. I would not
thrust my fingers in the ears of my people to stop them against
the counsels of that aged brave.
Children and brothers! Let every one think for himself;
the Great Spirit whispers to the heart of every man, and tells
him what he should do. Let us all obey Him.
My friends! The Great Spirit does not often visit his red
children in the daytime; he comes in the night and whispers to
us while we sleep. Foolish men do not know his voice. They
do not know when the Master of Life speaks to them, because
they do not see him.
Listen to me! Last night as I slept in my lodge I had a
dream. I heard a sound like the tramping of a great herd of
buffalo, and I was troubled to know what it meant. I tried to rise,
but could not. Then I heard a voice which said, `Go not to the
buffalo plains; your band is scattered, and there are not enough
left to make battle against the Dacotas. They are watching for
you in great numbers, and if you go to their hunting grounds
they will slay your wives and children.'
The voice ceased. Again, I heard a loud noise, like the
roaring of the north wind, and the dashing of waves against the
rocks. That sound died away like the first. I listened to hear
the voice speak again. I did not hear that voice any more; but
I saw a place on the shore of the great lakea cove sheltered
from the winds, where the water was deep and still. I saw the
fish playing in the water. They were very large fish, and were
so many that they had scarcely room to turn. I knew the place,
for I had been there.
Listen! I know it is not right to tell our dreams. The
Master of Life is angry when we repeat what he has whispered
into our hearts in our sleeping moments, and therefore our fathers
have admonished us that if we repeat our dreams they will not
come to pass. But I have told mine, because it was given me as
a chief for the use of my children, and I hope the Good Spirit
will not be angry, for the voice said, `Tell your people not to go
to the land of the Dacotasthey are numerous as the leaves on
the trees, and are now painted for war, and looking with angry
eyes towards the North.'
Children and Friends! I am not afraid of the Dacotas. I
have struck four of their best bravestheir scalps hang in my
lodge. When they hear the war-whoop of Notin they tremble;
even their horses scent me afar off, and snort when they discover
me coming. But I dare not disobey the Great Spirit. Let every
man do as he thinks best. If any choose to go with me, I shall be
glad to have them in my company.
I have said all I have to say.
The chief resumed his seat, and for some time they all sat in
silence. Notin then threw the ashes from his pipe, arose, and
gathered his blanket around him. The braves also arose, and
retired
.
When the council was broken up, the braves collected in little
groups, and seemed to be consulting what to do; but their
exchange
of opinions was more by looks and hints than by
conversation
.
One said, It is better to live on deer and bear meat than
fish.
Another responded, If one has a dream it is right for him to
go by itfor my part, I have not had any dream.
A third exclaimed, A man who has but one wife is easily
provided for; I have three wives, and cannot depend on catching
fish.
Others said, It is very unlucky for men to tell their dreams.
So they separated and went to their lodges.
The next day the whole band was in motion, and it was evident
that no community of feeling or purpose prevailed among them.
They moved off in small parties in a southwardly direction, but
apparently by different paths; and at the close of the day, the
lodges were all deserted, and not a living thing was seen to stir
in the village.
Notin with his wife and daughter embarked in a birch canoe,
taking with them all their moveables, and proceeded towards
Lake Superior. The weather was already cold, and they were
much exposed to its inclemency, but they persevered, and at
length reached that noble inland sea, upon whose banks they
sought a resting place. Slowly meandering the sinuosities of the
northern shore, they kept on their way, sometimes stopping to
catch fish, or to seek food on the land, but more frequently
compelled
by the fierce blasts to shelter themselves from its violence.
Once when the storm raged violently, they steered their frail bark
into the mouth of a small river, where they found a harbour
surrounded
by cliffs which protected it on all sides from the winds,
while a grove of large trees, which grew upon a strip of rich
alluvion
that margined the water, added a further shelter. The
storm raged for several days, and while the lake was white with
foam and the surges beat angrily against the shore, our
weather-bound
travellers found a secure retreat, by the margin of a deep
and unruffled pool, abounding in the finest fish, and affording
ample
means of subsistence.
Delighted with this spot, and wearied with the laborious and
perilous navigation of the lake shore, the wife of Notin insisted
on taking up their residence here for the winter. Notin urged
his dream, and spoke sadly of the evil consequences which never
failed to result from disobedience of the Great Spirit, who sent
good birds to whisper into the ears of his children, and gave them
dreams to fill their hearts with right thoughts. His wife and
daughter
considered the dream already fulfilled, and were certain they
had found the very spot indicated. If our worthy chief had been
blessed with a plurality of wives, they would have differed in
opinion, and he would have pursued the dictates of his own
judgment
,
but as he had but one, her influence shook the convictions
of his mind. Meanwhile the storm continued; it was impossible
to navigate the lake, and equally so to traverse the rocky and
broken shore, covered with snow, which was not yet frozen
sufficiently
to bear the weight of a man. The women began to
build a lodge, which was soon completed, and when at last the
winds lulled, the family were so snugly housed, that they were
all alike unwilling to move. They were secure of a present
subsistence, and this is no small matter to the Indian, whose
precarious
life is a succession of feasting and want, and who is often
driven to such dreadful extremity of hunger, that the prospect of
famine, though familiar, is very appalling. To him the
possession
of food brings relief from every care, for when not engaged
in war, eating and sleep are the business and amusement of his
life. Various causes therefore combined to induce Notin to
remain
at the spot thus accidentally chosen.
6
Weeks rolled away without any material change in the
circumstances
of the family. The supply of fish continued
abundant
,
and the remains of the jerked meat and wild rice which had
been preserved for winter, added an occasional variety to their
simple meals. Notin occasionally went out to hunt, with little
success, except that once he accidentally found a moose, and at
another time a bear.
Winter was now completely set in. The lake, as far as the
eye could reach, was covered with masses of ice, jammed and
heaped up by the wind, and then covered with snow. The snow
clothed the precipices and lay deep in the valleys. Nothing else
was seen except the leafless trees, and the bare sides of the tall
cliffs. When the sun shone it lighted up a magnificent scenery,
gorgeous and gigantic in its proportions and effecta wide and
vast landscape embracing mountains of snow, parapets of ice,
and cliffs of towering height, all white and shining with
resplendent
brightness. After a night of intense cold, the forest trees
were often seen loaded with crystals of frost, incrusting every
bough and twig; and the whole landscape, as the first beams of
the morning sun fell upon it, glowed with refulgent splendour.
But all that beauty and magnificence faded away when the
glorious
light of the sun, which brightened it into existence, was
obscured by clouds, and the fierce wind came howling over the
bleak and dreary wilderness. Then the bright hues that
gladdened
the eye, and spread out a thousand fanciful and illusive
shapes, were all melted away; the huge barriers of rock whose
bold outlines and gorgeous livery of light and shade threw out the
shapes of arches, spires, and battlements, were sobered down into
the realities of cliff and chasm. But under all changes, these
wild scenes were cold and terrific. They were the dwelling place
of winter. The storm-clouds brooded upon the savage desert;
the winds gathered here as if to collect their powers, and swept
hence upon their errand of destruction.
The scenic beauties of this inhospitable region are, however,
but little known, as they are seldom beheld except by the
unimaginative
Indian, who has neither heart nor eye for the sublime
and beautiful of Nature, except in a few rare instances, when
natural phenomena become connected with his wants, his perils,
or his superstitions. At the spot under our contemplation, three
of these lonely beings, protected only from the intense cold of the
46th degree of northern latitude, by a frail lodge composed of
bark, and separated from all their species by immeasurable and
impassable tracts of wilderness, dragged out a cheerless existence,
destitute of every social and intellectual enjoyment, and
possessing
barely the scanty means of sustaining animal life.
But they did not remain the sole tenants of this wild retreat.
One day they were surprised by the appearance of three squalid
men at the entrance of their lodge, who, according to the Indian
custom, seated themselves before the fire. The parties exchanged
glances, but not a word was spoken. The women placed food
before the strangers, who devoured it with the rapacity of
persons
who had long fasted. Famine and exhaustion were painfully
stamped upon their features. Their limbs were attenuated, their
forms wasted and bent, their eyes sunk and heavy. The forlorn
wanderers were recognized to be a distinguished Chippeway brave
and his sons, all men of athletic frame and high spirit, though
now emaciated by extreme suffering, into mere skeletons.
Having
eaten, salutations were exchanged, and they recited their
adventures. They were the remains of a small party, who had
improvidently lingered about their summer haunts until the
winter
overtook them. When their small store of provision was
exhausted, and the game in their vicinity destroyed, they attempted
to fly from famine. No permanent relief could be expected short
of several hundred miles, and this fearful journey was undertaken,
in the depth of winter, through a pathless wilderness.
Credulity would be startled, and humanity shocked, by a
recital
of all the painful vicissitudes endured by these unhappy
travellers. Relying upon the chance supplies of food afforded
by a barren district, covered with snow, they were reduced to
the most piteous straits. They devoured their worn-out horses
and famished dogs, and then sought to glean a subsistence from
berries, and the bark of trees. Now and then a lost and
half-starved
animal, thrown like themselves into a false position,
afforded them a chance repast, and again days were passed in
abstinence. In some exposures they found the snow not
sufficiently
frozen to bear them, and then they trudged heavily on
snow shoes. Cold, rain, snow, and piercing blasts alternately
assailed them. Under all these appalling difficulties, these
Indians
,
naturally indolent and fickle, proverbially deficient in
enterprise and industry, pressed onward with patience and
fortitude
,
in moody silence.
There was a point, however, beyond which exhausted Nature
could no longer struggle. One after another sunk under the
accumulated pressure of hunger and fatigue, until at last, of
twelve souls, the leader of the party and his two sons only
survived
;
and when these helpless wanderers espied the smoke rising
from Notin's camp, it was with difficulty that they rallied
sufficient
strength to reach it.
After the new comers were somewhat recruited, they
constructed
a lodge for themselves, and made their arrangements to
spend the winter at this spot. For a while, things went on
smoothly, but at length the supply of fish became short; the
fishing sometimes yielded but one meal a day, and often not so
much. The hunters extended their excursions to considerable
distances, but usually returned without any gamefor what
living thing could endure the rigours of such a winter! All, all
had fled to a more genial clime, or were hybernating in caves and
secret hiding places; and as these isolated human beings
wandered
through the dreary waste, eagerly searching every den and
covert, they became more and more convinced that they were the
only living tenants of this vast solitude.
At last, the dreadful signs of famine, known by sad experience
to all of this devoted little party, began to become manifest, and
those expedients for sustaining life which are only adopted as a
last resort, were reluctantly employed. They chewed their
moccasins
,
they boiled their dried skins, the bones that had been cast
away were carefully collectedevery atom that contained
nutrition
was sedulously gathered.
In this new emergency, Notin lost his self-possession. A
despondency
crept imperceptibly over him. This feeling, which
sometimes assails the most vigorous minds, is not uncommon among
the savages, whose crude and misty superstition, looking to no
natural system of causes and effects, but referring events to good
or bad luck, or to the agency of friendly or malign spirits, they
easily imagine themselves doomed to destruction, and shrink from
a contest with unseen influences, which they dread, but know not
how to propitiate. Often without any apparent cause, without
the consciousness of having given offence to the Great Spirit, or
to any of the numerous manitoes who watch over mankind for
good or evil, the Indian finds his exertions palsied by some
invisible
hand, and every effort of courage, or of wisdom, rendered
abortive. His arm becomes powerless, and the bold heart of the
warrior no longer beats in his bosom. The fickle breath of a
woman is in his nostrils. If he goes out to hunt, the game scent
him afar off, and fly at his approach. If he sets his traps for
beaver
,
a foul spirit sits down beside them, to warn those sagacious
animals of their danger. Believing himself engaged in a fruitless
war, against an adverse destiny, yet stripped of the ordinary
powers
of manhood, he sinks into that hopeless apathy with which all
of his race meet the approach of deaththe apathy of the
Heathen
,
unconscious of sin, ignorant of redemption, and viewing the
dissolution of the body as a painful change, which like other pains
he is taught to bear with indifference.
Under the influence of such prejudices, Notin was at no loss
to discover causes for his ill fortune. He fancied that he had
offended
the Great Spirit, by disclosing a dream, which should have
been kept sacred in his own breast, and by not following out the
indications of the vision, according to his own convictions. He
looked back with contrition to the dispersion of his band, which,
though not an uncommon occurrence, he attributed in this
instance
to his own departure from the customs of his people, and
neglect of the will of the good spirits. To all the remonstrances
therefore of his wife, who alone ventured to touch upon a subject
so delicate and serious, he replied: Trouble me not. The
Master of Life is angry at Notin. When he smiles the trees
become
green, and the grass grows upon the plains; when he shuts
his eyes and blows his cold breath upon the earth, the leaves fall,
and living things die. He is mad at Notin. He has taken the
man's heart out of my breast and given me the heart of a little
child. He will soon take the breath out of my body, and send
my spirit away to some other land, I know not where.
The wife of Notin, being a woman of bold spirit, was not
easily discouraged. Departing from the lodge, one evening,
[14]
[14]
See Appendix, No. XIV.
she
repaired to a thicket hard by, where she spent the greater part
of the night in prayer. No one followed her: and if any
surprise
was excited by her absence, her family were either induced
by confidence in her sagacity to suppose she was engaged in some
effort for their relief, or were withheld by superstition from
intruding
on her privacy.
In the morning she had crawled back, and sat, emaciated with
long fasting and chilled with cold, over the embers that glowed
in the centre of the lodge; on the opposite side, couched in an
abject posture, was the dejected chief, while the daughter sat
between
them. There was nothing to eat, no employment to
engage
their attention, no instant danger to arouse them to exertion.
A wretched family they were; but no tears were shed, no
complaint
was uttered; theirs was not the acute grief that breaks up
the fountains of life, and pours itself out in a flood of lamentations,
but the patient sorrow that congeals the vital energies into torpor.
The chief, a gloomy hypochondriac, and the women exhausted
by fatigue of body and mind, they were all pinched with cold, and
perishing of famine. Their eyes, half closed, were bent stupidly
on the feeble light that seemed expiring as rapidly as their own
lives. The wife at length spoke to her husband, thus: Listen
to my words. The Great Spirit is not angry with us any more.
Last night I prayed to him to take pity on us. I told him we
were dying for want of food, and asked him to give us something
to eat. As I prayed, sleep fell on my eyes, and I beheld a place
not far distant, where there is a hole in the earth, filled with
brushwood, and covered over with snow. Under that brush I
saw a large bear. Then I thanked the Great Spirit, and said I
will go and tell Notin. He will be glad to hear that the Great
Spirit is not angry with him any longer.
The chief supposed his wife to be raving, and cast an inquiring
glance towards her. Her countenance was calm; he knew she
had been absent for several hours; and he had confidence in her
sagacity, as well as in her attachment. There is no faith so strong
as that of the husband, in a wife whose actions and thoughts have
been known to him through a series of years, whose virtues have
been tried by many vicissitudes, and whose love has stood the test
of every ordeal to which it could be brought in the endless circle
of human depravity, passion, suffering, and temptation. For
twenty years she had been the companion of his prosperous and
adverse fortunes; had followed his footsteps through perilous
wanderings, through hostile lands, through pestilence, war, and
famine, and had never faltered; wherever he led the way she
walked with the courage of one who knew no fear; whatever he
commanded, that she did with the devotion of one who knew no
law but his will, no impulse but love for him.
Such was the being whose voice now came over the withering
spirit of the chief like the breath of spring upon the chilled earth.
He raised his head languidly and said,
Woman, are you jesting? Or has any one given you the
strong water of the white man?
She replied, When did I ever tell you a lie? I am in
earnest
.
An evil manito has pursued and would have destroyed us;
but the Master of Life has heard my cry and taken pity on us.
Take your gun, and let us go to the place where food is provided
for us.
Notin, like a wise man, followed the advice of his wife. He
took his gun, tomahawk, and hunting knife, and went with her,
their daughter accompanying them in silent wonder. The spot
was readily found, but it cost them much labour, weak as they all
were, to remove the snow and brush. At length Notin stooped
down, and having examined the spot, exclaimed, It is true! I
smell a bear! The Great Spirit has not deceived us! Upon a
further search, they found the animal, imbedded in his lair, in a
state of torpidity; and we need scarcely add that it was soon
despatched
,
and carried in triumph to the camp.
From what source the wife of Notin derived the information on
which she acted with such promptitude and success, we shall not
pretend to decide. Whether, having accidentally discovered the
hidden treasure, she used the information in the manner best
calculated
to relieve the diseased mind of her husband, as well as to
sustain
her own influence; whether the prayers which she
addressed
to the unknown God, ignorantly, but in a believing spirit, found
acceptance at the Throne of Grace; or whether, imposed upon
herself, by a supposed vision, she was led to use the means which
were successful through a happy coincidence,are points on
which others may speculate; it is enough for us to relate the
facts.
Delivered from the distemper of the mind, which had
benumbed
his faculties, Notin became comparatively a happy man. The
temporary supply of food, so unexpectedly procured, invigorated
and inspirited the whole party, and gave renewed activity to their
fishing and hunting excursions; and these efforts, with a few
fortuitous
supplies, carried them through the winter. In the spring
they repaired their canoes, and previously to joining the band at
Thunder Lake, proceeded to the trading establishment at Fond
du Lac, where they purchased guns, ammunition and other
necessaries
,
for which they agreed to pay with the proceeds of the
summer and autumn hunting.
We return now upon the thread of our story, to speak of the three
persons who last became members of this little band. The father
was a Chippeway brave, who had so well proved his courage and
address, that he was often chosen to lead parties of his people in
their war or hunting expeditions. Both of his sons were tall and
finely formed; they were well trained in manly exercises, and
had already been tried upon the war path. They were alike
excellent
models of savage beauty, exhibiting in their persons those
prominent and exquisitely moulded features, well-turned limbs,
and graceful attitudes, of which so many instances are seen
among this singular race; but the elder, who was called Ka-kaik,
the Hawk, had a stern and vindictive expression of countenance,
while the younger, Mehkenauk, the Turtle, had a face which
indicated
cheerfulness and candour.
These young men became mutually smitten with the charms
of the Red Sky of the Morning; and each, jealous of the other,
endeavoured to conceal his attachment from all except its object,
with whom he lost no opportunity of secretly ingratiating
himself
.
The solecism of a Chippeway courtship will no doubt startle
some of our readers. Those who know this people only through
the medium of books, will object, that the Indians are callous to
the passion and the sentiment of love, and that their marriages
are contracted by the parents, without any volition on the part of
those who are chiefly interested. Such is the general fact, but
the exceptions are sufficiently numerous, not only, according to
the paradox of the grammarians, to prove the rule, but to
vindicate
the truth of our narrative. The laws of nature cannot be
abrogated. Their action may be modified by national policy or
supersition, by educational bias, or by the necessity that knows
no law. But the passion implanted in the human bosom for
beneficent
purposes, remains immutable there; although, like a seed
buried deeply in the earth, it may not germinate. It is
surrounded
by circumstances unfriendly to its development. A cold and
unnatural fabric of society, forbids its expansion. It is still a
constituent element of the soul, indestructible and co-existent with
it; and like the imprisoned fountain, it will testify its existence
by bursting out, or like the germ, when a genial ray penetrates
to its cold and dark place of interment, it will expand and shoot
into life, and bloom into fragrance and beauty.
The brothers became aware that they were the rivals of each
other, and each began to use all his cunning, to conceal as well
as to advance his suit, and to throw obstacles in the way of his
competitor. Taught from infancy to suppress their feelings, to
persevere in the pursuit of any desired object, and to spurn as
unmanly every passion and affection that should stand in the way
of any purpose of ambition or of honour, the contest soon became
one of highly-wrought excitement. Both were high-spirited
young men, just commencing the career of life, with exorbitant
notions of their own qualifications, and full of that youthful pride
which dreads a failure in any attempt, however unimportant.
Panting for action and achievement, the love for that dark-eyed
maiden, the fairest of her race, afforded the only outlet for their
pent-up desires which their isolated condition presented. A fierce
passion for victory animated their bosoms; each marked the
footsteps of the other, and watched every glance with untiring
vigilance
,
while the fires of jealousy and hatred were studiously
concealed.
The usual forms of courtship were avoided by both the
brothers
,
who, in their eagerness to attain their object, sought to reach
it by hidden ways. The elder applied secretly to the mother, to
6*
whom he made liberal promises of reward, in the event of his
success
,
while he hinted darkly at evils that might befall all who
should cross his path. They younger sought the ear of his
mistress
,
and finding a propitious moment, pressed his suit, and had
the satisfaction of learning that the Red Sky of the Morning was
not averse to his success.
It was not long before the mother and daughter compared
notes, and Notin was apprized by his wife of the whole matter.
That sagacious chief, comprehending at once the mischief
threatened
to the peace of his family by the contest between the young
men, determined to avert the present fury of the storm, by
temporising
with both parties. He sought an interview with each
separately, and with an air in which kindness was mingled with
reproof, addressed them both alike, somewhat as follows:
Why have you secretly hovered round my lodge, to steal
away my daughterlike the wolf who creeps into a camp when
the hunters are absent? Why have you not asked her in
marriage
in the usual way? Is this the respect with which you treat
a chief, who is also your friend? You came to my camp hungry,
and I received you as one of my children, but you would treat
me as if I was a false Dacota, or a trading white man. Are you
so poor, that you have no present to offerhow then can you
support
a wife? I know you are very pooryour gun is worn out,
your powder and lead exhaustedyou have no horse to ride, nor
even a dog to follow you. Are you not ashamed to approach the
daughter of a chief in so wretched a condition? Go, then, to the
war path, and take spoils from our enemies, or go and hunt, and
sell your skins to the traders. Let me see what you can do, and
I will determine whether you are worthy of my daughter.
Such was the position in which the parties stood on their
arrival
at Fond du Lac, where several days were consumed in
procuring
the supplies which they required; and they were about to
depart, when it was discovered that both the brothers were
missing
.
Under other circumstances, this abrupt departure would
not have afforded any cause for remark; for among the Indians
the social bond is so slightly drawn as to impose little restraint
upon the movements of individuals, who wander off upon any
sudden
caprice, without thinking it necessary to consult those who
are most nearly interested in their conduct. Their unsettled
habits of life, and constant exposure to danger, render them
familiar
with these hasty separations, while their suspicious and
jealous
dispositions lead them to concealment. Fully equipped for
war or hunting, they had left the camp separately, and, as was
supposed, in different directions. The father of the young men
made no comment on the occurrence, and the family of Notin
had their own reasons for observing silence, so that nothing was
said of the disappearance of the rival brothers. The remainder
of the party returned to the haunt of the tribe at Thunder Lake,
where Notin intended to pass the summer in collecting the
scattered
members of his tribe.
The wanderers had not been long at home, when others of the
tribe, who had passed the winter at different places, and
encountered
a variety of suffering and adventure, collected around them,
to spend a short season in comparative repose, before the
commencement
of the autumn hunt. The Turtle, the younger of the
absent brothers, after an absence of a few weeks, rejoined his
friends, rich in plunder, the avails of his own boldness and
address
.
He had proceeded alone to the country of the Dacotas,
where he had seized several fine horses, and other spoil, which
he now brought in triumph to the village, and the larger portion
of which he immediately tendered to the parents of the Red Sky
of the Morning, as a marriage present. So tempting an offer was
not to be refused; and the maiden, as is usually the case when
the wooer is wealthy, yielded her assent to the wishes of her
parents
,
with a filial piety which cannot be too highly commended.
The happy lover led his bride to the lodge he had prepared for
her reception; and on the following morning set out on a hunting
expedition, followed by her who was to be hereafter the companion
of his toils and dangers. Whether fear of the vengeance of the
elder brother, the Hawk, or simply a taste for that luxury of
unsophisticated
minds, the enjoyment of each other's society,
dictated
this journey, we are unable to determine.
Shortly after the departure of the lovers, the Hawk made his
appearance. He too had been successful, and the inhabitants of
the village were thrown into a state of high excitement by a
signal
which announced that he bore the bloody trophies of the
victor
.
He had stolen upon a little camp of the Siouxhad rushed
in upon them in the hour of slumberhad slain two men, and
then massacred the remainder of the family, whose scalps he
exhibited
in evidence of this atrocious deed of daring. To the ears
of those who have enjoyed the endearments of social life, it may
sound strange that the murderer of women and children should be
received with welcome. Yet such was the reception of the
midnight
prowler, who came reeking with the blood of the innocent
and helpless. He was welcomed as one who had conferred
honour
upon his people. Their natural love of vengeance and hatred
of their enemies were gratified by the bloody exploit. He was
conducted into the village by the whole band, the warriors
dancing
around him, and singing their war-songs, while the women
and children followed the procession uttering shouts of joy and
triumph. On reaching the war-pole which stood in the centre of
the village, the scalps were suspended upon it, and a solemn dance
was performed; after which the successful brave withdrew to
one of the lodges, and seated himself on the ground before it in
silence. No one saluted him, nor asked him any questions, until
food was placed before him, and his hunger was satisfied. He
ate with the ravenous appetite of one who had fasted long; for in
the prosecution of his tedious journey homeward, he had eluded
pursuit by rapid marches, seldom halting except to sleep, nor
venturing to deviate far from his path in pursuit of game. When
sated with food he raised his headthe braves began to collect,
seating themselves quietly around himthe pipe was lighted, and
the lazy volumes of smoke began to curl over the heads of the
quiet assemblage. The Hawk recognised his friends, and they
gradually slid into a conversation which led to a recital of his
adventures. It is popularly supposed that curiosity appertains
especially to the female sex, and the Indian, above all men, is
thought to hold in supreme contempt this feminine propensity;
yet strange as it may seem, no tea-party or other collection of
the softer sex, ever followed up the tangled thread of a
scandalous
rumour with more assiduity than was shown by these lordly
savages, in drawing out all the details of a massacre so congenial
to their tastes.
Having passed several hours pleasantly in such improving
converse, the company dispersed, highly delighted with their
comrade, and more than ever convinced that the Chippeway
nation
,
and particularly that portion of it comprised in the band at
Thunder Lake, were the bravest people on the face of the earth.
As for the Hawk, being well gorged with food, and disburthened
of the tale of his prowess, his mind was at ease, and his body
comfortable; so that, gathering his blanket about him, and
throwing
his heroic form on the ground, he slept soundly for the next
fifteen hours. This luxurious state of repose would probably
have lasted for several days, had not an evil bird whispered bad
tidings in his ears.
It is not known with precision how the Hawk first heard of
the marriage of his brother with the Red Sky of the Morning.
The Indians say it was told him by a bad bird; but this phrase
includes all mischief-makers and tale-bearers, as well as the
malevolent
spirits who assume the shapes of the feathered tribes to
work their evil purposes upon men. He made no remark; but
the disappointment and rage depicted upon his countenance,
indicated
the storm of passion that raged within. He stalked
moodily
about during the remainder of the day; and this hero, who
wore in triumph the scalps of two families, and was universally
envied and admired as the most expert cut-throat in the band,
was to all appearance as unhappy as any common man. So true
it is that genius and great actions, while they win applause, do
not afford any protection against the ordinary griefs of humanity.
To sum all in one word, he was crossed in love. The night was
spent in angry and revengeful thought, and before the day
dawned
he had departed from the village.
Long and gloomy was the pilgrimage of the disappointed lover.
His first intention was to separate himself from his tribe, and to
abjure for ever all connection with his kindred. The wounded
pride that results from disappointment in a darling object,
impelled
him to avoid the society of those who knew the tale of his
discomfiture. The success of a rival galled his vanity; and
revenge
,
the darling passion of the savage, began to coil itself about
his heart. Almost unconsciously he sought the trail of the
objects
of his hourly thought, and having discovered the direction
of their journey, found an intense, though undefinable, interest in
tracing their footsteps. Curiosity, perhaps, at first, and then the
strange gratification which a diseased spirit finds in that which
chafes its wound, impelled him forward; but every day and
every
hour nourished within him the demon of revenge.
The solitary being who had thus given himself up to the
indulgence
of a single passion, now devoted all his energies to the task
of searching out and studying those sings by which the Indian
derives intelligence that would be sealed to any other eye, and
that enable him to pursue the track of a retreating foe with
astonishing
success. The footprints impressed upon the earththe
relics of an extinguished firea thousand particulars too minute
to attract attention, except from a mind trained to seek and weigh
them, all afford him information; and having a clue, however
slight, his sagacity, his knowledge of the country, and his
familiar
acquaintance with the habits of his people, enable him to
follow
it out with wonderful acuteness. Thus he proceeded on his
tedious adventure for several weeks, often losing the track, and
again finding it accidentally, or by means of diligent research
sometimes, when at fault, retracing his own footsteps until he
regained
the track, and sometimes striking at a venture for some
distant point ahead, at which he supposed the travellers would
touch. At length he discovered newly-made signs, which
showed
that those he sought were near at hand.
The sun had sunk below the horizon, and the shadows of night
were gathering around, when the Hawk made the discovery
which suddenly arrested his footsteps. He paused upon the brink
of a beautiful river, whose clear waters flowed calmly by; the
air was still, and not a sound disturbed the harmony of the quiet
scene. On the opposite shore a thin column of smoke rose from
a thicket which concealed the fire from which it issued. He sat
down and gazed upon it, as the tiger watches the prey that is
unconsciously approaching his lair.
As long as the twilight lasted, he watched the object which had
thus riveted his attention, absorbed in thought, and lashing
himself
into fury, by giving full scope to the passions that had long
been pent up in his bosom. Wearied, at last, he threw himself
on the ground to sleep, when suddenly the hooting of an owl
attracted
his notice. The note was low, melancholy, and
prolonged
,
such as a traveller in the wilderness often hears in the night
a dismal screeching, so like the wail of human misery, that
many listen to it with superstitious dread. It now fell on the ear
of one who heard it with intense emotion. The bird of night was
the badge of his own family; and the very cry that now broke
so mournfully upon the stillness of the night, was used as a secret
signal between its members. Often, when lying in ambush, or
creeping stealthily upon a foe, had that wailing note conveyed
intelligence
to his ear, and he heard it now with a thrill which
caused his whole frame to tremble. His sensations partook of
joy, uncertainty, and terror. He doubted whether the sound he
heard was the voice of the natural bird, which it resembled so
nearly, that even his practised ear could detect no difference
whether it was the croaking of a spirit to warn him of danger,
or allure him to destruction, or whether it was the night signal
of a living member of his own family. Again and again it was
repeated, and then a response faintly heard from a distance,
across the water, ended his conjectures by the conviction that the
voices he heard were those of the objects of his intense hatred!
Creeping upon his hands and knees to the water's edge, the
Hawk listened: the splashing of a paddle was heard, and then a
birch canoe came gliding swiftly and silently over the still
surface
of the river. It was guided by a single person, who plied
the paddle with expertness, but with the caution of extreme
vigilance
,
dipping it so gently as to create the least possible noise,
yet urging the skiff rapidly on its way. As it touched the beach,
the Hawk, losing all self-command, rushed forward, and stepped
into the little bark, shoving it at the same moment into the stream.
The woman who guided it resumed her labour; but in the next
instant a loud exclamation from the shore discovered to her that
a stranger had taken the place of him she sought; and a third
party, plunging in the water, soon reached the canoe, and
grappled
it with a lusty hand. A fierce struggle ensued, and the
slight vessel being overturned, the combatants, locked in each
other's grim embrace, were cast into the water. The battle
there, though desperate, was brief. For a few minutes there was
a fearful strugglethen a deep groan from the Hawk, and a loud,
triumphant yell from his adversary announced the result.
The next morning's sun revealed a mournful spectacle. On
the shore lay the stiff and bloody corpse of that vindictive man
whose sad journey we have pursued to its tragic close. Beside
him sat the brother, the rival and foeman, whose hand had dealt
the fatal blow, and the beautiful woman, whose attractions had
kindled the feud which led to this fatal catastrophe. They shed
no tear, for it was not their nature to weep. They wailed not,
for the fallen was not a beloved object. But they gazed in terror
upon the dead man, and trembled at the dreadful thought that a
brother had shed a brother's blood.
Years have rolled away since that event. The Turtle
returned
to his tribe, and lived long to enjoy the love of the Red Sky of
the Morning. A curse remained upon the place of the battle, which
became haunted by spirits, and was ever after avoided by men.
The Indians, in passing it, steer their canoes silently along the
opposite shore, and shudder as they point out to the stranger the
spot which, in their expressive language, they have named The
Place of the Fratricide.
[15]
[15]
See Appendix, No. XV.
THE CAPUCHIN.
[There is a tradition preserved among the French of a
celebrated
missionary of their nation, who was one of the earliest of
the explorers of the Mississippi and its tributaries, and who died
at some spot which is now unknown. We have endeavoured to
preserve some of the circumstances, which are related as having
attended his death, in the following lines.]
There
is a wild and lonely dell,
Far in the wooded west,
Where never summer's sunbeam fell
To break its long lone rest;
Where never blast of winter swept,
To ruffle, or to chill,
The calm pellucid lake, that slept
O'erhung with rock and hill.
A woodland scene by hills enclosed,
By rocky barriers curbed,
Where shade and silence have reposed
For ages undisturbed,
Unless when some dark Indian maid,
Or prophet old and grey,
Have hied them to the solemn shade
To weep alone, or pray.
For holy rite and gentle love
Are still so near akin,
They ever choose the sweetest grove
To pay their homage in.
One morn the boatman's bugle note
Was heard within the dell,
And o'er the blue wave seemed to float
Like some unearthly swell.
The boatman's song, the plash of oar,
The gush of parting wave,
Are faintly heard along the shore,
And echoed from each cave.
A skiff appears, by rowers stout
Urged swiftly o'er the tide;
An aged man sat wrapt in thought,
Who seemed the helm to guide.
He was a holy capuchin,
Thin locks were on his brow;
His eye, that bright and bold had been,
With age was darkened now.
From distant lands, beyond the sea,
The hoary pilgrim came
To combat base idolatry,
And spread the Holy Name.
From tribe to tribe the good man went,
The sacred cross he bore;
And savage men, on slaughter bent,
Would listen and adore.
But worn with age, his mission done,
Earth had for him no tie,
He had no further wish, save one
To hie him home and die.
Good father, let us not delay
Within this gloomy dell;
'Tis here that savage legends say
Their sinless spirits dwell.
In every cool sequestered cave
Of this romantic shore,
The spirits of the fair and brave
Unite, to part no more.
Invisible, the light canoe
They paddle o'er the lake,
Or track the deer in the morning dew,
Among the tangled brake.
'Tis said their forms, by moonlight seen,
Float gently on the air;
But mortal eye has seldom been
The fearful sight could bear.
Then, holy father, venture not
To linger in the dell;
It is a pure and blessed spot,
Where only spirits dwell.
The hallowed foot of prophet seer,
Or pure and spotless maid,
May only dare to wander here
When night has spread her shade!
Dispel, my son, thy groundless fear,
And let thy heart be bold;
For see, upon my breast I bear
The consecrated gold.
The blessed cross! that long hath been
Companion of my path
Preserved me in the tempest's din,
Or stayed the heathen's wrath
Shall guard us still from threatened harm,
What form soe'er it take:
The hurricane, the savage arm,
Or spirit of the lake.
But, father, shall we never cease
Through savage wilds to roam?
My heart is yearning for the peace
That smiles for us at home.
We've traced the river of the west,
From sea to fountain head,
And sailed o'er broad Superior's breast,
By wild adventure led.
We've slept beneath the cypress' shade,
Where noisome reptiles lay;
We've chased the panther to his bed,
And heard the grim wolf bay.
And now for sunny France we sigh,
For quiet, and for home;
Then bid us pass the valley by
Where only spirits roam.
Repine not, son! old age is slow,
And feeble feet are mine;
This moment to my home I go,
And thou shalt go to thine.
But ere I quit this vale of death,
For realms more bright and fair,
On yon green shore my feeble breath
Shall rise to Heaven in prayer.
Then high on yonder headland's brow
The holy altar raise;
Uprear the cross and let us bow,
With humble heart, in praise.
Thus said, the cross was soon uprear'd
On that lone heathen shore,
Where never Christian voice was heard
In prayer to God before.
The old man knelthis head was bare,
His arms crossed on his breast;
He prayed, but none could hear the prayer
His withered lips expressed.
He ceasedthey raised the holy man,
Then gazed in silent dread;
Chill through each vein the life-blood ran
The pilgrim's soul was fled!
In silence prayed each voyager,
Their beads they counted o'er,
Then made a hasty sepulchre
Upon that fatal shore.
Beside the altar where he knelt,
And where the Lord released
His spirit from its pilgrimage,
They laid the holy priest.
In fear, in haste, a brief adieu
The wondering boatmen take,
Then rapidly their course pursue
Across the haunted lake.
In after years, when bolder men
The vale of spirits sought,
O'er many a wild and wooded glen
They roamed, but found it not.
We only know that such a priest
There was, and thus he fell;
But where his saintly relics rest,
No living man can tell.
The red man, when he tells the tale,
Speaks of the wrath that fell
On him that dared an altar raise,
In the Indian's spirit-dell.
THE DARK MAID OF ILLINOIS.
The
French, who first explored the wild shores and prolific
plains that margin the Mississippi river, and extend along its
tributary streams, believed that they had found a terrestrial
paradise
.
Never before was such a desert of flowers presented to the
astonished eye of mannever before was there exhibited an
expanse
so wide, so fertile, so splendidly adorned. If the beauty
of this region delighted them, its immensity filled them with
astonishment
,
and awakened the most extravagant expectations.
Their warm and sprightly imaginations were easily excited to
lively admiration, by scenes so grand, so lovely, and so wild, as
those presented in this boundless wilderness of woods and flowers.
The great length of the magnificent rivers filled them with
amazement
;
while the reputed wealth, and fancied productions of the
country, awakened both avarice and curiosity.
We can scarcely realize the sensations with which they must
have wandered over a country so different from any they had
ever seen, and have contemplated a landscape so unexpectedly
majestic and attractive. The freshness and verdure of new
lands, unspoiled and unimpoverished by the hand of cultivation,
is in itself delightful. It is pleasing to see the works of nature
in their original character, as they came from the creative hand;
and that pleasure was here greatly enhanced by the infinite
variety
,
and magnificent extent, of the romantic scenery. The plains
seemed as boundless as they were beautiful, and the splendid
groves, which diversified the surface of these exquisitely graceful
lawns, invested them with a peculiar air of rural elegance.
Delighted with this extensive and fertile region, they roamed
far and wide over its boundless prairies, and pushed their little
barks into every navigable stream. Their inoffensive manners
procured them a favourable reception; their cheerfulness and
suavity conciliated even the savage warrior, whose suspicious
nature discovered no cause of alarm in the visits of these gay
strangers. Divided into small parties, having different objects
in view, they pursued their several designs without collision and
with little concert. One sought fame, another searched for mines
of gold as opulent as those which had enriched the Spaniards in
a more southern part of the same continent. One aspired simply
to the honour of discovering new lands, another came to collect
rare and nondescript specimens of natural curiosities; one
travelled
to see man in a state of nature, another brought the Gospel
to the heathen; while, perhaps, a great number roved carelessly
among these interesting scenes, indulging an idle curiosity or a
mere love of adventure, and seeking no higher gratification than
that which the novelty and excitement of the present moment
afforded.
Whatever might be their respective views, they were
certainly
,
in one respect, the most successful of adventurers. They
traversed
these wide plains with impunity. They penetrated far
into the interior of the trackless wilderness. Their canoes were
seen tracing the meanders of the longest rivers; and these
fearless
explorers had already found their way into the heart of this
immense continent, while other Europeans obtained, with
difficulty
,
a footing upon the sea coast.
Among the earliest who thus came was Pierre Blondo, who,
having served a regular apprenticeship to an eminent barber at
Paris, had recently commenced the world on his own account, in
the character of valet to an excellent Dominican priest, who was
about to visit America. The proverb, like master like man,
had little application to this pairfor never were two human
beings more unlike than they. The worthy Dominican was a
gentlemanly and priest-like personage, and Pierre a very
unassuming
plebeian. The master was learned and benevolent,
grave, austere, and self-denying; the valet was a jolly, rattling
madcap, who, as he never hesitated to grant a favour or a civility
to any human being who asked or needed it, thought it right to
be equally obliging to himself; and neither mortified his own
flesh nor his neighbour's feelings. The priest mourned over the
depravity of the human race, and especially deprecated the
frivolous
habits of his countrymen; the valet not only believed this
to be the best of all possible worlds, but prided himself
particularly
in being a native of a country which produces the best
fiddlers
,
cooks, and barbers, on the habitable globe. In short, the
master was a priest and the man a hair-dresser; they both loved
and endeavoured to improve their species; but the one dealt with
the inner, the other with the outer man;one sought to enlighten
the dark abyss of the ignorant heart, while the other sedulously
scraped the superfluities of the visage. Father Francis was a
mysterious, silent, ascetic man; Pierre was as mercurial and as
merry a lad as ever flourished a pair of scissors.
However they might differ in other respects, there was one
particular in which Father Francis and his man, Pierre, exactly
agreed; namely, in an ardent desire to explore the streams, the
forests, and the prairies of Louisiana. They were allured, it is
true, by very different motives. The priest came to spread the
Gospel among the heathen, to arrest their vices, and to explode
their human sacrifices; the valet travelled to see the lion with
one horn, the fountain of rejuvenescence, the white-breasted
swans, and the dark-skinned girls of Illinois. Pierre's
researches
into American history had been considerable, and his
opportunities
for acquiring a knowledge of the new world singularly
felicitous. He had shaved gentlemen who had been therehad
scraped the very cheeks which were embrowned by the sun of
the western Indies, and had held, with secret delight, betwixt his
thumb and finger, the identical nostrils that had inhaled the
delicious
odours of Florida, the land of flowers. He had listened
with admiration to their wonderful stories, some of which almost
staggered his credulity. He did not doubt the existence of gold
mines, in which the pure metal was found in solid massesthe
only objection to which was, that they were too large for
transportation
,nor
of that wonderful pool, in which, if an old man
bathed, he lost the decrepitude of age, and regained the bloom
of childhood. These things seemed proper enough, and were
vouched for by gentlemen who could not be mistaken; yet it
seemed to him marvellous, that the birds should be snowy white,
and the ladies black; that the men should be beardless, and the
lions have horns; and that gold-dust, grapes, and oranges, should
grow and glitter in a wilderness, where there were none but
wolves and wild men to gather them.
It is proper to state here, in order to prevent any
misunderstanding
in a matter of so much importance, that, although Pierre
was a barber, he was by no means an insignificant person. He
was of honest parentagethe son of a very reputable peasant,
who lived decently, and brought up his offspring in habits of
industry
.
He had a fine figure and a very prepossessing
countenance
.
His eye was good, his teeth white, and his smile
agreeable
.
He was, in short, a gentlemanon a small scale, and a
most excellent personin his way. A pleasant young man, with
a light purse, and liberal feelings.
During the passage, Pierre became a favourite with his fellow
voyagers. He played the flute, sang merry songs, shaved the
sailors gratis, and on Sundays brushed up the captain as fine as
a grenadier. He felt so happy himself, that he could not be easy
without trying to make every body happy around him. At odd
times, when he was unemployed, he amused himself in fancying
the adventures that awaited him, the fine sights he should see,
and the heaps upon heaps of gold and jewels that he should pick
up in the new world. He thought himself a second Columbus,
and had no doubt that high honours would be conferred upon him
on his returnthe king would make him a count or a marquis;
and M. Corneille, who was then in the meridian of his fame, would
write a play, and tell his exploits in poetry. The prime minister
would probably offer him his daughter in marriageand a cloud
passed over the brow of the merry Frenchman as he reflected that
it would be proper to make the lady miserable, by refusing the
honour of the alliance. I shall certainly be very much obliged
to him, said Pierre, as he sat musing on the forecastle, gazing
at a long stream of moonlight that sparkled on the undulating
waves; very much obliged: and I shall never be wanting in
gratitude to a nobleman who shall do me so much honour,but
I must decline it; for there is pretty little Annette, that I have
promised to marry, and who shall never have reason to weep for
my inconstancy. Annette is a very pretty girl, and she loves
me dearly. I really think she would break her heart if I should
7
not marry her. Poor girl! she thinks there is no body in the
world equal to Pierreand I have no reason to dispute her
judgment
.
She is neither rich nor noble, but what of that? When
I am master of a gold mine, and a marquis of France, I can
elevate
her to my own rank; and I will hang strings of pearl, and
ornaments of solid gold, about her pretty neck, and her slender
waist, in such profusion, that the meanness of her birth will be
forgotten in the glitter of her attire. Thus did Pierre enjoy the
luxury of hope, and revel in anticipation upon the bright
prospects
that beamed upon his delighted fancy. The vessel flew
rapidly over the waves; and, after a prosperous voyage, the new
world spread its illimitable shores, its gigantic mountains, and
its wooded vales, before the enraptured eyes of the weary
voyagers
.
Pierre was in the new world. It was very much unlike the
old one. Yet its great superiority did not strike him so forcibly
as he had expected. The St. Lawrence was a noble river; its
shores were green, and the trees were larger than any he had
seen in France; but the sunny clime, and the rich vineyards of
his native land were not there, nor was there the least sign of a
gold mine, or a pearl fishery. Our adventurer, however, was of
a sanguine temperament, and determined to suspend his judgment,
and hope on for a season.
Shortly after their arrival at Montreal, an expedition was
concerted
to the newly discovered region of the Upper Mississippi,
and Father Francis made his arrangements to accompany the
party. Pierre, who, in the long voyage across the Atlantic,
comparatively
agreeable as it was, had become wearied of the
confinement
and privations incident to this mode of travelling, looked
at the little boats launched on the St. Lawrence, for the
transportation
of the party, with some distrust, and evinced a considerable
deal of reluctance against embarking in a new adventure. In
Montreal he had found some of the luxuries which he enjoyed at
home, and had been deprived of on shipboard. There were
barbers
and cooks, to shave and feed people; and, new as the city
was, there was a monastery and a ball room, in the first of which,
he could be seated in a snug confessional, when he went to
confess
his sins to the priest, and in the other he could dance without
knocking his head against a spar, or running the risk of jumping
overboard. Other considerations, however, weighed against his
indolence and love of pleasure. He longed to discover the
fountain
of rejuvenescence, to bathe in its renovating waters, and
secure
the miraculous gift of perpetual youth. He panted for the
dignity and advantage of being sole proprietor of a gold mine,
and returning to merry France with a ship load of treasure,for
the honour of nobility, the pleasure of refusing the prime
minister's
daughter, and the pride of making Annette a peeress.
Incited
by hopes so brilliant, and so remarkably reasonable, the
spirit of adventure was re-animated in his bosom, and he
embarked
with newly invigorated alacrity.
They ascended, with much toil, the rapid current of the noble
St. Lawrence, meandering among its thousand isles, and gazing
with delight on its rocky and luxuriant shores. They coasted the
grand and beautiful lakes of the north, enraptured with the
freshness
and variety of the scenery; and surveyed with amazement,
the great cataract, which has been the wonder of succeeding
generations. Every night they encamped upon the banks, and
the forest rang with the cheerful sounds of merriment.
Sometimes
they met the Indians, who gazed upon them as superior
beings
,
and either fled in terror, or endeavoured to conciliate them
by kindness and hospitality. It was thus that the Europeans
were usually received by the natives of this continent, before
little
jealousies, and occasional aggressions, were fomented, by
hasty retaliation, into lasting hatred. Happy would it have been
for our country, and for human nature, had the civilized
adventurers
to the new world conducted themselves in such a manner
as to have deepened, and indelibly engraved upon the savage
mind, the feelings of profound respect which their first
appearance
excited.
When they reached the southern end of Lake Michigan, the
waters were high, and they floated over the inundated lands,
pushing their boats among the trees of the forest, and over the
rank herbage of the low prairies of that region, until they found
the current, which had set towards the north, began to flow off in
the opposite direction, and floated them into a small stream,
running
towards the south. Here they halted for some days to hunt,
and repair their boats; and when they reached the Illinois, a
large, but placid river, one of the noblest tributaries of the
Mississippi
,
the flood had subsided, and the waters were flowing
quietly
within their natural channel, through the silent forest.
With what emotions of wonder must those adventurous
travellers
have gazed upon these wild scenes! How singular must
have been their sensations, when they reflected on their distance
from the civilized world, and thought of the immensity of that
immeasurable waste that was spread around them. They had
never imagined, far less witnessed, a desert so blooming or so
extensive
.
There was a magnificence of beauty in its prolific
vegetation
and gorgeous verdure, and a grandeur in the idea of the
boundless extent of this splendid wilderness, that must have
excited the imagination to speculations of intense interest.
Pierre seemed to awaken to a new existence when the boats
entered upon this beautiful river; and he felt a thrill of pleasure
as he surveyed the placid stream and its lovely shores. The
river, deep, unobstructed, and clear as crystal, flows with a
current
so gentle as to be almost imperceptible, while the
overhanging
trees protect it from the winds, keeping it as still and
inviolate
as the fountain that sleeps in its native cave. The stately
swan sailed upon the mirror that reflected her downy plumage,
and the gaudy paroquet, rich in green and golden hues, sported
among the tall trees. The tangled grape vines hung in heavy
masses from the boughs, and the wild fruit trees dipped their limbs
in the water. Here and there the tall bluffs jutted in upon the
river, impressing their gracefully curved outlines upon the clear
blue ground of the sky, and throwing their long dark shadows
upon the water; but most usually, a rich border of noble forest
trees, springing from a low shore, hung in graceful beauty over
the stream. Sometimes they saw herds of buffalo, wading in
the tide, sometimes the lazy bear wallowing in the mire, and,
occasionally
,
the slender deer, standing in the timid attitude of
attention
;
while every secluded inlet, or shaded cove, was filled
with screaming wild fowl, of an infinite variety of plumage.
The travellers arrived, at length, at an Indian village, where
they were entertained with great hospitality. The chief,
surrounded
by his wise men, and his warriors, painted in gay colours,
and decked with feathers, symbolical of peace, received them
with public demonstrations of respect; and a great company, of
different ages, and both sexes, was assemhled to gaze at them,
and to do them honour. The hump of the buffalo, the head of
the elk, and the marrowy tail of the beaver, were dressed for
them, with all the skill of aboriginal gourmandism; they were
feasted, besides, upon bear's oil, jerked venison, hominy, and
delicately
roasted puppies; and the juicy steams of these delicious
viands, unvitiated by the villanous artificial mixtures of
European
cookery, were pleasantly blended with the balmy odours of
the forest. Father Francis, among other monastic attainments,
had acquired a very competent knowledge of the art of good
eating
,
and did ample justice to the generous fare which spread the
board of his savage entertainers; but being a reformer of morals,
he determined to show his gratitude by delivering before his new
friends a homily against intemperance; resolving, at the same
time, to improve so favourable an opportunity of suggesting the
propriety of seasoning such gross meats with a few wholesome
condiments; for, to his taste, the devouring of flesh without salt,
pepper, or sauce, was mere cannibalism. Pierre was a reformer,
too, and he made up his mind to improve the gastronomic science
of his country, whenever he should become a marquis, by
adding
the buffalo's tongue and hump, and the elk's head, to the
luxuries
of a Parisian bill of fare. The cooking of puppies he
thought an unchristian and dangerous innovation, which might
lead to the destruction of some of the most harmless animals in
creation, while the addition which it brought to the list of solid
edibles, was not worthy of much commendation.
Having feasted the adventurers, the Indians presented them
with feathers, belts, moccasins, and dressed skins; and the chief,
in the profusion of his generosity, offered to Father Francis
fifteen
beautiful young girls, but the good man, as any prudent
man would have done, wisely declined the acceptance of a
present
that might prove so troublesome. Pierre thought he would
have ordered things differently: he winked, shrugged, hinted,
and at last ventured to beg that he might take one of them, at
least, to Paris with him, as a curiosity; but the inexorable priest
advised him to carry a swan, a paroquet, a pet buffalo, or a
rattlesnake
,
in preference. Finally, when that worthy and highly
honoured ecclesiastic had been feasted to repletion, and loaded to
weariness with deferential civilities, a soft couch of buffalo robes
was spread for him, and a number of young girls stood round
him, as he reposed, fanning him with the snowy wings of the
swan, and driving away the musquitoes with bunches of gaudy
feathers. Pierre thought this a very grand ceremony, and quite
comfortable withal; and determined, that, whenever he should
become
proprietor of a gold mine, he would enjoy the luxury of
slumber with similar attendance.
It would be a question worthy the attention of the curious in
matters relating to the philosophy of the human mind, whether
that love of foreigners which has ever distinguished the American
people, and made them the sport of every idle traveller who has
chanced to linger on our shores, was not derived from the
aborigines
.
The vanity of showing off a travelled lion at our
parties
is certainly not original. If it be not an inherent passion in
the human breast, it has, at least, prevailed throughout many
ages. The desire to behold the exotic production of a distant
climeto entertain one who has roamed through latitudes
different
from our own, and had hair breadth 'scapes, has long been a
distinguishing trait in the domestic manners of our countrymen;
and we are happy to be able to trace the propensity back to a
period anterior to our existence as a nation. For we do not set
it down among our virtues. Hospitality may have much to do
with keeping it alive, and a generous love of knowledge may
afford
it some nourishment. But we fear that, after all, it rests
upon a solid substratum of vanity, and is cherished by the oozings
of an inquisitive curiosity. The Illini, however, fared much
better
in the result of their attentions to distinguished strangers, than
we who have succeeded and imitated them. They received the
French, with confiding kindness, into the bosom of their society,
and fed them upon the fat of their land; and the worthy visiters
of that primitive people recorded their hospitality in terms of
grateful acknowledgment. We have pursued a similar course
of conduct towards other Europeans, and have been sadly
traduced
and ridiculed for our pains.
Father Francis took an early occasion to say a word in season
to the savages on the great business of his mission. They heard
him with grave respect, and promised to take the matter into
consideration
;
but, as their intercourse was conducted entirely by
signs, it is not likely that they were greatly edified. He showed
them a telescope, a mariner's compass, and a watch, and
endeavoured
to explain their several properties; they listened with
attention
,
offered food to the watch, which they supposed to be a
living animal, looked with fear at the telescope, and picked the
old man's pocket, while he was lecturing upon natural philosophy.
Upon the whole, the savages showed great capabilities for the
pursuits of civilized life. Pierre, in the meanwhile, remained an
inactive spectator of these proceedings. The Indians, with their
usual tact, discovered that he occupied a subordinate place in the
mission, which released them from the necessity of paying public
honours. But his fine figure, his elastic step, and his open
countenance
,
won their regard, and obtained for him the most cordial
attention. Though he was not, as they supposed, a chief, or a
prophet, they imagined that he was a young brave of promise, and
perhaps of distinction, in his tribe.
The next morning, the young warriors dispersed themselves in
the neighbouring groves, to paint their bodies and decorate their
heads. This is one of the most important employments of an
Indian's
life. No beau, nor dandy, nor exquisite, in any part of
the world, expends more time in the laborious duties of the toilet,
than is consumed by the savage in decorating his person. Pierre
went among them, bowing and smiling, in his usual obliging
manner
,
with his razors, combs, scissors, and pomatums; and, after
exhibiting specimens of his skill upon himself, prevailed upon some
of his new acquaintances to place themselves under his hands.
He was not only a complete adept in his own art, but a man of
genius, who could adapt its principles to the circumstances of a
new case; and, directed by the slight observations he had been
enabled to make, painted up some of the savages, after their own
fashion, with peculiar elegance, and to their entire satisfaction.
They were delighted with his clever and obliging talents. He
exhibited his lancet and tooth-drawers, and explained their use by
significant gestures; and the Indians, supposing them to be
delicate
instruments for torturing prisoners of war, patted him on the
head as a valuable auxiliary. He produced a pair of foils, and,
while he convinced them that he was a great warrior, caused an
infinite deal of merriment by the contrast of his own dexterity
with the awkwardness of those who were prevailed upon to
oppose
him. A pocket mirror, and some trinkets, which he
displayed
,
won their admiration, and they soon determined, that, although
Father Francis might be highest in rank, Pierre was by far the
greatest man, and most valuable acquaintance. Such are the
triumphs of genius! Pierre had ventured upon a delicate
experiment
,
in which ninety-nine of the most consummately skilled
artists
might have failed, where one would have been successful.
There is a tide in the affairs of men,
Which, taken at the flood, leads on to fortune;
he had touched a fortunate spring, and found the talisman which
commanded a brilliant destiny. In the fulness of his heart he
opened a small package of looking-glasses, which he had brought
for traffic, and distributed them gratuitously among the warriors,
presenting the largest and most elegant to the chief, who was so
much delighted, that he instantly, with princely liberality, offered
him his daughter in marriage. Happy Pierre! he was that day
the proudest of men, and the most blissful of barbers.
Pierre had serious scruples whether he should accept this
generous
offer; not that he considered it above his meritson the
contrary, he gave the chief great credit for having had the
acuteness
to discover his genius, and the magnanimity to know how to
appreciate it. It was a proposal worthy of both the parties
concerned
.
But it touched his honour, while it flattered his pride.
He had not forgotten his obligations to Annettethe merry
dark-eyed
girl who had given him the first offering of her young
affections
.
Poor little Annette, what would she think of it, if he should
marry another lady. He was sure she would never stand it.
The blight of disappointment would fall upon the warm heart that
throbbed so sincerely for him. No, said he to himself, I will
be true to Annette, be the consequences what they may; I have
promised her my hand, and a share in my gold mine; and
nothing
shall ever induce me to act in a manner unbecoming a French
gentleman. Having formed this heroic resolution, he put his hat
on one side of his head, and strutted through the village, with the
independent air of a man who chooses to do as he pleases, and the
self-satisfied countenance of one who has adopted a virtuous
determination
.
But Pierre knew little of the frailty of his own heart. Few of
us are aware of the backslidings of which we may be guilty when
there is a lady in the case. He began to reflect, that the partner
so liberally tendered to his acceptance, was the daughter of a king,
and that such an alliance was not to be picked up every day in
the woods of the new world. He might grow gray before another
sovereign would condescend to invite him into his family; and,
reasoning in his own mind, that the proposed marriage would
make him a prince, and heir apparent, he began to entertain strong
doubts whether patriotism, and the honour of the French nation,
did not require him to sacrifice his affections to the glory and
advantage
of giving a king to the Illini. Napoleon has since been
called upon to decide a similar question; and Pierre, though not
a great warrior, loved his country and himself as well as
Napoleon
.
He reflected further, that the possession of the sovereign
power would be the readiest way to the discovery of the fountain
of rejuvenescence; the gold mines would all be his own, and he
could send Annette a shipload of the precious metal. Moreover,
he had already discovered, that in the new world it was the
custom
for great men to have a plurality of wivesa custom that
seemed to him to be founded in good senseand he saw no reason
why he should not comply with it, and, with the first cargo of
gold he should send to France, despatch an invitation to Annette
to share his prosperity and the happiness of his tawny bride.
When our inclinations prompt us strongly to a particular line
of conduct, it is easy to find reasons enough to turn the scale.
Indeed, it is most usual to adopt a theory first, and then to seek
out arguments to support it. Pierre could now find a host of
reasons urging him to instant wedlock with the Illinois maiden.
And not the least were the advantages which would accrue to
Father Francis, to the church, and to the cause of civilization.
When he should become a prince, he could take the venerable
priest under his patronage, encourage the spread of the true faith,
cause his subjects to be civilized, and induce them to dress like
7*
Christians and feed like rational beings. He longed, with all the
zeal of a reformer, to see them powder their hair, and abstain
from the savage practice of eating roasted puppies.
So he determined to marry the lady; and, having thus
definitely
settled the question, thought it would be proper to take the
advice
of his spiritual guide. Father Francis was shocked at the
bare mention of the affair. He admonished Pierre of the sin of
marrying a heathen, and of the wickedness of breaking his
plighted
faith; and assured him, in advance, that such misconduct
would bring down upon him the severe displeasure of the church.
Pierre thanked him with the most humble appearance of
conviction
,
and forthwith proceeded to gratify his own inclination
believing
that, in the affair of wedlock, he knew what was for his
own good quite as well as a holy monk, who, to the best of his
judgment, could know very little about the matter.
On the following morning the marriage took place, with no
other ceremony than the delivery of the bride into the hands of
her future husband. Pierre was as happy as bridegrooms usually
arefor his companion was a slender, pretty girl, with a mild
black eye and an agreeable countenance. They were conducted
to a wigwam, and installed at once into the offices of husband and
wife, and into the possession of their future mansion. The
females
of the village assembled, and practised a good many jokes
at the expense of the young couple: and Pierre, as well to get rid
of these as to improve the earliest opportunity of examining into
the mineral treasures of the country, endeavoured, by signs, to
invite
his partner to a strollintimating, at the same time, that he
would be infinitely obliged to her if she would have the politeness
to show him a gold mine or two. The girl signified her
acquiescence
,
and presently stole away through the forest, followed by
the enamoured hair-dresser.
As soon as they were out of sight of the village, Pierre offered
her his arm, but the arch girl darted away, laughing, and shaking
her black tresses, which streamed in the air behind her, as she
leaped over the logs and glided through the thickets. Pierre liked
her none the less for this evidence of coquetry, but gaily pursued
his beautiful bride, for whom he began to feel the highest
admiration
.
Her figure was exquisitely moulded, and the exercise in
which she was now engaged displayed its gracefulness to the
greatest advantage. There was a novelty, too, in the adventure,
which pleased the gay-hearted Frenchman; and away they ran,
mutually amused and mutually satisfied with each other.
Pierre was an active young fellow, and, for a while, followed
the beautiful savage with a creditable degree of speed; but,
unaccustomed
to the obstacles which impeded the way, he soon
became
fatigued. His companion slackened her pace when she
found him lingering behind; and, when the thicket was more than
usually intricate, kindly guided him through the most practicable
places,always, however, keeping out of his reach; and
whenever
he mended his pace, or showed an inclination to overtake
her, she would dart away, looking back over her shoulder,
laughing
,
and coquetting, and inviting him to follow. For a time this
was amusing enough, and quite to the taste of the merry barber;
but the afternoon was hot, the perspiration flowed copiously, and
he began to doubt the expediency of having to catch a wife, or win
even a gold mine, by the sweat of his browespecially in a new
country. Adventurers to newly discovered regions expect to get
things easily; the fruits of labour may be found at home.
On they went in this manner, until Pierre, wearied out, was
about to give up the pursuit of his light-heeled bride, when they
reached a spot where the ground gradually ascended, until, all at
once, they stood upon the edge of an elevated and extensive plain.
Our traveller had heretofore obtained partial glimpses of the
prairies
,
but now saw one of these vast plains, for the first time, in its
breadth and grandeur. Its surface was gently uneven; and, as
he happened to be placed on one of the highest swells, he looked
over a boundless expanse, where not a single tree intercepted the
prospect or relieved the monotony. He strained his vision
forward
,
but the plain was boundlessmarking the curved line of
its profile on the far distant horizon. The effect was rendered
more striking by the appearance of the setting sun, which had sunk
to the level of the farthest edge of the prairie, and seemed like a
globe of fire resting upon the ground. Pierre looked around him
with admiration. The vast expansedestitute of trees, covered
with tall grass, now dried by the summer's heat, and extending,
as it seemed to him, to the western verge of the continent
excited
his special wonder. Little versed in geography, he
persuaded
himself that he had reached the western boundary of the
world, and beheld the very spot where the sun passed over the
edge of the great terrestrial plane. There was no mistake. He
had achieved an adventure worthy the greatest captain of the age.
His form dilated, and his eye kindled, with a consciousness of his
own importance. Columbus had discovered a continent, but
he
had travelled to the extreme verge of the earth's surface, beyond
which nothing remained to be discovered. Yes, he solemnly
exclaimed, there is the end of the world! How fortunate am I
to have approached it by daylight, and with a guide; otherwise,
I might have stepped over in the dark, and have fallenI know
not where!
The Indian girl had seated herself on the grass, and was
composedly
waiting his pleasure, when he discovered large masses of
smoke rolling upward in the west. He pointed towards this new
phenomenon, and endeavoured to obtain some explanation of its
meaning; but the bride, if she understood his enquiry, had no
means of reply. There is a language of looks which is sufficient
for the purposes of love. The glance of approving affection beams
expressively from the eye, and finds its way in silent eloquence
to the heart. No doubt that the pair, whose bridal day we have
described, had already learned, from each other's looks, the
confession
which they had no other common language to convey; but
the intercourse of signs can go no further. It is perfectly
inadequate
to the interpretation of natural phenomena: and the Indian
maid was unable to explain that singular appearance which so
puzzled her lover. But discovering, from the direction to which
he pointed, that his curiosity was strongly excited, the obliging
girl rose, and led the way towards the west. They walked for
more than an hour. Pierre insensibly became grave and silent,
and his sympathizing companion unconsciously fell into the same
mood. He had taken her hand, which she now yielded without
reluctance, and they moved slowly, side by side, over the plain
she with a submissive and demure air, and he alternately admiring
his beautiful bride, and throwing suspicious glances at the novel
scene around him. The sun had gone down, the breeze had
subsided
,
and the stillness of death was hanging over the prairie.
Pierre began to have awful sensations. Though bold and
volatile
,
a something like fear crept over him, and he would have
turned back; but the pride of a French gentleman, and a
marquis
in anticipation, prevented him. He felt meanfor no man
of spirit ever becomes seriously alarmed without feeling a sense
of degradation. There is something so unmanly in fear, that,
although
no bosom is entirely proof against it, we feel ashamed to
acknowledge its influence even to ourselves. Our hero looked
forward in terror, yet was too proud to turn back. Superstition
was beginning to throw its misty visions about his fancy. He
had taken a step contrary to the advice of his father confessor,
and was in open rebellion against the church; and he began to
fear that some evil spirit, under the guise of an Indian maid, was
seducing him away to destruction. At all events, he determined
not to go much further.
The shades of night had begun to close, when they again
ascended one of those elevations which swells so gradually that
the traveller scarcely remarks them until he reaches the summit,
and beholds, from a commanding eminence, a boundless landscape
spread before him. The veil of night, without concealing the
scene, rendered it indistinct; the undulations of the surface were
no longer perceptible; and the prairie seemed a perfect plain.
One phenomenon astonished and perplexed him: before him the
prairie was lighted up with a dim but supernatural brilliancy,
like that of a distant fire, while behind was the blackness of
darkness
.
An air of solitude reigned over that wild plain, and not a
sound relieved the desolation of the scene. A chill crept over
him as he gazed around, and not an object met his eye but that
dark maid, who stood in mute patience by his side, as waiting his
pleasure; but on whose features, as displayed by the uncertain
light that glimmered on them, a smile of triumph seemed to play.
He looked again, and the horizon gleamed brighter and
brighter
,
until a fiery redness rose above its dark outline, while heavy,
slow moving, masses of cloud curled upward above it. It was
evidently the intense reflection, and the voluminous smoke, of a
vast fire. In another moment the blaze itself appeared, first
shooting
up at one spot, and then at another, and advancing, until the
whole line of horizon was clothed with flames, that rolled around,
and curled, and dashed upward, like the angry waves of a
burning
ocean. The simple Frenchman had never heard of the fires
that sweep over our wide prairies in the autumn, nor did it enter
into his head that a natural cause could produce an effect so
terrific
.
The whole western horizon was clad in fire, and, as far as
the eye could see, to the right and left, was one vast
conflagration
,
having the appearance of angry billows of a fiery liquid,
dashing against each other, and foaming, and throwing flakes of
burning spray into the air. There was a roaring sound like that
caused by the conflict of waves. A more terrific sight could
scarcely be conceived; nor was it singular that an unpractised
eye should behold in that scene a wide sea of flame, lashed into
fury by some internal commotion.
Pierre could gaze no longer. A sudden horror thrilled his
soul. His worse fears were realized in the tremendous landscape.
He saw before him the lake of fire prepared for the devil and his
angels. The existence of such a place of punishment he had
never doubted; but, heretofore, it had been a mere dogma of
faith, while now it appeared before him in its terrible reality. He
thought he could plainly distinguish gigantic black forms dancing
in the flames, throwing up their long misshapen arms, and
writhing
their bodies into fantastic shapes. Uttering a piercing shriek,
he turned and fled with the swiftness of an arrow. Fear gave
new vigour to the muscles which had before been relaxed with
fatigue, and his feet, so lately heavy, now touched the ground with
the light and springy tread of the antelope. Yet, to himself, his
steps seemed to linger, as if his heels were lead.
The Indian girl clapped her hands and laughed aloud as she
pursued him. That laugh, which, at an earlier hour of this
eventful day, had enlivened his heart by its joyous tones, now
filled him with terror. It seemed the yell of a demonthe
triumphant
scream of hellish delight over the downfall of his soul.
The dark maid of Illinois, so lately an object of love, became, to
his distempered fancy, a minister of vengeancea fallen angel
sent to tempt him to destruction. A supernatural strength and
swiftness gave wings to his flight, as he bounded away with the
speed of the ostrich of the desert; but he seemed, to himself, to
crawl sluggishly, and, whenever he cast a glance behind, that
mysterious girl of the prairie was laughing at his heels. He
tried to invoke the saints, but, alas! in the confusion of his mind,
he could not recollect the names of more than half a dozen, nor
determine which was the most suitable one to be called upon in
such an anomalous case. Arrived at the forest, he dashed
head-long
through its tangled thickets. Neither the darkness, nor any
obstacle, checked his career; but scrambling over fallen timber,
tearing through copse and briar, he held his way, bruised and
bleeding, through the forest. At last he reached the village,
staggered into a lodge which happened to be unoccupied, and
sunk down insensible.
The sun was just rising above the eastern horizon when Pierre
awoke. The Indian maid was bending over him with looks of
tender solicitude. She had nursed him through the silent watches
of the night, had pillowed his head upon the soft plumage of the
swan, and covered him with robes of the finest fur. She had
watched his dreamy sleep through the long hours, when all
others were sleeping, and no eye witnessed her assiduous care
had bathed his throbbing temples with water from the spring, and
passed her slender fingers through his ringlets, with the fondness
of a young and growing affection, until she had soothed the
unconscious
object of her tenderness into a calm repose. It was her
first love, and she had given her heart up to its influence with all
the strength, and all the weakness, of female passion. Under
other circumstances it might long have remained concealed in her
own bosom, and have gradually become disclosed by the
attentions
of her lover, as the flower opens slowly to the sun. But
she had been suddenly called to the discharge of the duties of a
wife; and woman, when appealed to by the charities of life,
gives full play to her affections, pouring out the treasures of her
love in liberal profusion.
But her tenderness was thrown away upon the slumbering
bridegroom, whose unusual excitement, both of body and mind,
had been succeeded by a profound lethargy. No sooner did he
open his eyes, than the dreadful images of the night became again
pictured upon his imagination. Even that anxious girl, who had
hung over him with sleepless solicitude, throughout the night, and
still watched, dejected, by his side, seemed to wear a malignant
aspect, and to triumph in his anguish. He shrunk from the glance
of her eye, as if its mild lustre would have withered him. She
laid her hand upon his brow, and he writhed as if a serpent had
crawled over his visage. The hope of escape suddenly presented
itself to his mind. He rose, and rushed wildly to the shore. The
boats were just leaving the bank; his companions had been
grieved at his marriage, and were alarmed when they found he
had left the village; but Father Francis, a rigid moralist, and a
stern man, determined not to wait for him a moment, and the
little
barks were already shoved into the stream, when the haggard
barber appeared, and plunged into the water. As he climbed the
side of the nearest boat, he conjured his comrades, in tones of
agony, to fly. Imagining he had discovered some treachery in
their new allies, they obeyed; the oars were plied with vigour,
and the vessels of the white strangers rapidly disappeared from
the eyes of the astonished Illini, who were as much perplexed by
the abrupt departure, as they had been by the unexpected visit of
their eccentric guests.
Pierre took to his bed, and remained an invalid during the rest
of the voyage. Nor did he set his foot on shore again in the new
world. One glance at the lake of fire was enough for him, and
he did not, like Orpheus, look back at the infernal regions from
which he had escaped. The party descended the Mississippi to
the gulf of Mexico, where, finding a ship destined for France, he
took leave of his companions, from whom he had carefully
concealed
the true cause of his alarm. During the passage across
the Atlantic he recovered his health, and, in some measure, his
spirits; but he never regained his thirst for adventure, his
ambition
to be a marquis, or his desire to seek for gold. The fountain
of rejuvenescence itself had no charms to allure him back to the
dangerous wildernesses of the far west. On all these subjects he
remained silent as the grave. One would have supposed that he
had escaped the dominions of Satan under a pledge of secresy.
A new misfortune awaited him at home, where, to his infinite
mortification, he found Annette married to a lank, snivelling
pastry cook, dispensing smiles, and pies, and sugar plums, from
behind a counter, and enjoying as much happiness as she could
have tasted in the rank to which he had once destined her. It
was not kind in her to have jilted Pierre for a pastry cook, when
he would not have jilted her for any thing less than a princess.
Our hero had stuck to his integrity like a gentleman, until strong
temptation overmastered him, while she had listened to the
sugared
compliments of the confectioner, as soon as the back of her
generous lover was turned, and became mistress of a cake shop,
while he was laying plans to make her a peeress of France, and
a princess of Illinois. Short-sighted Annette! to value so
slightly
the sincere passion of so munificent a lover! Pierre received
the news of her defection with the composure of a philosopher
shrugged his shoulders, snapped his fingers, and resumed his
humble occupation. He was not the man to break his heart for a
trifle; and, after bearing with fortitude the loss of a gold mine, a
throne, and lovely princess, the infidelity of a light-hearted maiden
was not a thing to grieve over. He lived a barber, and died a
bachelor. When the bloom of youth began to fade from his
cheek, and the acuteness of his sensibilities became a little
blunted
when
he saw his rival, the confectioner, prospering and
growing fat, and the prospect of Annette's becoming a widow
more and more remote, his reserve wore away, and he began to
relate his adventures to his customers. He became quite
celebrated
as
all Europeans are, who have travelled in America
many flocked to his shop to hear his interesting recitals, and the
burning lake was added, by common fame, to the other wonders
of the new world.
The Indian maid followed the white stranger to the shore, and
saw him depart, with grief. She gazed at the receding boats
until
they turned an angle of the river, where they vanished for
ever from her view, and then she sat down, and buried her face
in her hands. Her companions, in sympathy for her feelings,
left her alone, and when all eyes were withdrawn, she gave vent
to her feelings, and wept bitterly over her shame. She had been
betrothed in the face of the whole tribe, and had been publicly
deserted by her lover. He had fled from her with every
appearance
of terror and loathing. She was repudiated under
circumstances
of notoriety, which deeply wounded her pride; while a
tenderness
newly awakened, and evinced to the full extent that maiden
delicacy permitted, was cruelly repaid by insult. Nor was the
acuteness of these feelings at all blunted by the suspicion that she
had been herself an accessory in producing the melancholy
result
.
Pierre had followed her to the prairie in all the joyous
hilarity
of an ardent lover, he had fled from her in fear, and,
although
the cause of his terror was unknown, she imputed it to
something in her own person or deportment. There is no
anguish
which a woman feels so keenly as the pang of mortified
affection
the
conviction that her offered love is spurnedthe
virgin
shame of having betrayed a preference for one who does not
requite itthe mortification of attempting and failing to kindle
the flame of love. Woman can bear, and thousands have borne,
the pain of loving without being beloved, when the secret remains
hidden in her own bosom; but when the husband, or the accepted
lover, repels, or coldly estimates, the warm and frank avowal of
a virtuous passion, he inflicts a wound which no surgery can heal,
he touches one of the master springs of the heart, with a
rudeness
that reaches its vitality and withers it for ever. Woman
can bear pain, or misfortune, with a fortitude that man may in
vain attempt to emulate; but she has a heart whose sensibilities
require a delicate observance;she submits to power with
humility
,
to oppression with patience, to the ordinary calamities of
human nature with resignationnothing breaks her heart but
insulted
love.
For whole days did the Indian maid wander through the
solitary
forest, ashamed to return to the encampment of her tribe.
When led back to her father's lodge, she avoided the society of
the maiden throng, and fled from the young warriors who would
have courted her smiles. She ceased to be numbered among the
dark-eyed beauties of her tribe; and but a few moons had passed
away since the visit of the white strangers from the land of the
rising sun, when a little hillock, on the summit of a lonely
mound in the prairie, covered the remains of the beautiful and
love stricken
Maid of Illinois
.
THE INDIAN HATER.
Some
years ago, I had occasion to travel over the beautiful
prairies of Illinois, then a frontier state, containing but few
inhabitants
,
and those chiefly of the class called backwoodsmen.
In the course of my journey, I stopped one day at a village to
rest; and while my horse was eating his corn, and mine hostess
was picking the chicken that was to be broiled for my dinner, I
stepped into a neighbouring store to purchase some small article
of which I stood in need. I found a number of persons there,
engaged
,
some in buying merchandise, some in talking politics, and
others in reading the manuscript advertisements of stray horses
and constable's sales, that were pasted on the walls. There were
a bottle of whiskey and a pitcher of water on the counter, free
for all comers, as was the hospitable fashion of those days, before
temperance had got to be a tip-top virtue, or Father Mathew the
greatest of modern reformers. Being not unwilling to observe
a scene which might afford amusement, and to while away a few
minutes in conversation, I leaned my back against the counter,
and addressed myself to a person having the appearance of a
substantial farmer, who answered my inquiries respecting the
country with intelligence and civility.
While thus engaged, my attention was drawn to a person who
stood near. He was a man who might have been about fifty
years of age. His height did not exceed the ordinary stature,
and his person was rather slender than otherwise; but there was
something in his air and features which distinguished him from
common men. The expression of his countenance was keen and
daring. His forehead was elevated, his cheek bones high, his
lips thin and compressed. Long exposure to the climate had
tanned his complexion to a deep brown, and had hardened his
skin and muscles, so as to give him the appearance of a living
petrifaction. He seemed to have lived in the open air, exposed
to the elements, and to every extreme of temperature.
There was nothing in the dress of this individual to attract
attention
;
he was accosted occasionally by others, and seemed
familiar with all who were present. Yet there was an air of
abstraction
,
and standing aloof about him, so different from the noisy
mirth and thoughtless deportment of those around him, that I
could not help observing him. In his eye there was something
peculiar, yet I could not tell in what that peculiarity consisted.
It was a small grey orb, whose calm, bold, direct glances, seemed
to vouch that it had not cowered with shame, or quailed in
danger
.
There was blended in that eye a searching keenness,
with a quiet vigilancea watchful, sagacious self-possessionso
often observable in the physiognomy of those who are in the
habit of expecting, meeting, and overcoming peril. His heavy
eyebrows had been black, but time had touched them with his
pencil. He was dressed in a coarse grey hunting shirt, of
homespun
cotton, girded round the waist with a broad leathern belt,
tightly drawn, in which rested the long knife, with which the
western hunter despatches his game, cuts his food, picks his flint
and his teeth, and whittles sticks for amusement.
Upon the whole, there was about this man an expression of
quiet determination, of grim and gloomy sternness, of intense but
smothered passion, which stamped him as something out of the
ordinary view of character; yet there were indications of
openness
and honesty, that forbade distrust. He was rough, but not a
ruffian. His was not the unblushing front of hardy guilt, nor the
lurking glance of underhanded villany. A stranger would not
have hesitated to confide in his faith or courage, but would have
been extremely reluctant to provoke his hostility.
I had barely time to make these observations, when several
Indians
,
who had strolled into the village, entered the store.
The effect of their presence upon the backwoodsman, whom I
have described, was instantaneous and remarkable. His eyes
rolled wildly, as if he had been suddenly stung to madness,
gleaming with a strange fiercenessan intense lustre, like that
which flashes from the eyeballs of the panther, when crouched
in a dark covert, ready to dart upon his prey. His sallow cheek
was flushed; the muscles, that but a moment before seemed so
rigid, became flexible, and twitched convulsively. His hand
sliding
quietly to the hilt of his large knife, as if by an involutary
impulse, grasped it firmly; and it was easy to perceive that a
smothered fire had been disturbed, and that a single breath would
be sufficient to light up a blaze. But, except these indications, he
remained motionless as a statue, gazing with a look of intense
ferocity at the intruders. The Indians halted when their eyes
met his, and exchanged glances of intelligence with each other.
Whether it was from instinct, or that they knew the man, or
whether the natural sagacity of their race enabled them to read
the signs of danger in his scowling visage, they seemed willing to
avoid him, and retired. The backwoodsman made a motion, as
if to follow; but several of the company, who had watched this
silent, though momentary scene, with interest, gently withheld
him, and after conversing with him a few moments in an earnest,
but under tone, led him off in one direction, while the Indians
rode away in another.
Having understood from the farmer, with whom I had been
talking, that he was about to return home, and that my route led
through his neighbourhood, I accepted the offer of his company
and guidance, and we set out together. It was a pleasant
afternoon
in the fall, and as our horses trotted quietly over the smooth
prairie road, the discourse naturally fell upon the scene we had
just witnessed, and I expressed a curiosity to learn something of
the history and character of the man, whose image had impressed
itself so forcibly on my mind. I was young and romantic then,
and singular as this being certainly was, his peculiarities were
probably magnified to my excited fancy.
He is a strange, mysterious-looking being, said I, and I
should think he must be better, or worse, than other men.
Samuel Monson is a very good neighbour, replied the
farmer
,
cautiously.
You say that in a tone, rejoined I, which seems to imply,
that in some other respects he may not be so good.
Wellas to that, I cannot say, of my own knowledge, that I
know any harm of the man.
And what do other people say of him?
The farmer hesitated, and then, with a caution very common
among people of this description, replied:
People often say more than they can prove. It's not good,
no how, to be talking of one's neighbours; and Monson, as I said
before, is a good neighbour.
But a bad man, as I understand.
Nofar from itthe man's well enough
My companion hesitated here, as gossips of both sexes are apt
to do, when conscious of a strong inclination to tell all they know
on a delicate subject; but my laudable thirst for useful
knowledge
had, I suppose, awakened a benevolent desire to gratify it,
and the worthy man added, in a low tone, and looking cautiously
around:
ExceptThe folks do say he are rather too keen with
his rifle.
How so? does he shoot his neighbour's cattle?
No, sirSamuel Monson is as much above a mean action as
any other man.
What then, is he quarrelsome?
Oh, bless you, no! There's not a peaceabler man in the
settlement; but he used to be a great Indian fighter in the last
war, and he got sort o' haunted to the woods; and folks do say
that he's still rather too keen on the track of a moccasin.
I do not exactly understand you, my dear sir.The Indians
are now quiet, I believe, and at peace with us?
Why yes, they are very peaceable. They never come near
us, except now and then a little party comes in to trade. There's
not many of them in these parts, and they live a good piece off.
They are civil and harmless, are they not?
Yes, sir, quite agreeablebating the killing of a hog once in
a whilebut that we don't vallyit is but just nateral to the
poor savage to shoot anything that runs in the woods. They
have a honing in that way, and you can't stop them, no way you
can fix it.
In what way, then, does this Monson interfere with them?
I did not say, stranger, that Monson done it. No, no; I
would'n't hurt no man's character; but the fact and the truth
are about this: now and then an Indian are missing; and now
and then one are found dead in the range;and folks will have
their notions, and their talk, and their suspicious about itand
some talk hard of Monson.
But why charge it upon him?
Well, if you must have it out, stranger,in this country we
all know the bore of every man's rifle. Monson's gun carries
just fifty to the pound. Now the bullet holes in all these Indians
that have been shot are the same, and we know whose rifle they
suit. Besides this, horse tracks have been seen on the trail of
the moccasin. They were very particular tracks, and just suited
the hoof of a certain horse. Then a certain man was known to
be lying out in the range, about that same time; and when all
these things are put together, it don't take a Philadelphia lawyer
to tell who done the deed. No mistake in Sam Monson. He
likes a skrimmage with them. He goes off sometimes, and is
gone for weeks, and people reckon that he goes to their own
hunting grounds to lie in wait for them. They do say, he can
scent a red-skin like a hound, and never lets a chance slipno
how.
But is it possible, that in a civilized country, within the reach
of our laws, a wretch is permitted to hunt down his
fellow-creatures
like wild beasts; to murder a defenceless Indian, who
comes into our territory in good faith, believing us to be what we
profess, as a Christian people!
Well, stranger,as to the matter of thatit is not exactly
permitted; we don't know for certain who does it, and it's not any
particular man's business to inquire into it, more than another.
There's no love for the Indians among us, no how. Many of the
people have had their kin murdered by the savages in early
times; and all who have been raised in the back woods, have
been learned to dislike them, and fear them. Then Monson is an
honest fellow, works hard, pays his debts, and is always willing
to do a good turn, and it would seem hard to break neighbourhood
with him for the matter of a few Indians. People don't think the
Indians of much account, no how!
But the wickedness of such unprovoked murderthe shame
the breach of law, the violation of hospitality!
Well, so it is. It are a sin; and sorry would I be to have it
on my conscience. But, then, some think an Indian or so will
never be missed; others, again, hate to create an interruption in
the settlement; others, who pretend to know the law, say that the
general government has the care of the business of the Indians,
and that our state laws won't kiver the caseso they allow it's
none of our business. Some folks, you know, go in heavy for
state rights, and don't believe in meddling with any thing that
belongs
to Uncle Sam; and withal Monson keeps his own counsel,
and so among hands he goes his own road, and no questions
asked.
All this seemed very strange to me. Border wars, we all
know, are productive of feuds, which are implacable and lasting.
Predatory incursions, which hardly attract the notice of the
government
,
bring carnage and devastation, ruin and sorrow, to the
fireside
.
Private property is wasted, and the war is against
individuals
,
rather than the public. The actors in each scene are
identified; men and families feel the sense of personal injury,
and hatred and revenge are the consequence. But I was not
aware that such a state of feeling existed on our own frontier.
While these thoughts passed through my mind, we rode forward
in silence, which was broken by my inquiring what injury this
individual had suffered from the Indians, which could justify him
in thus destroying them with impunity.
Injury enough! replied my companion: to tell the plain
sentimental truth, he has cause enough to hate them; and many
a man that would not dip his own hand in the blood of an Indian,
would as soon die as betray him; for few of us could lay our
hands upon our hearts and say we would not do the same in his
situation.
At this point of the conversation we were joined by several
horsemen, who were pursuing the same road with ourselves, and
joined us, in accordance with the gregarious habits of the
country
,
which induce men to prefer a larger company to a smaller,
on all occasions; and my companion being unwilling to pursue
the subject in their hearing, I was unable to learn from him what
injury the Indian hater had received, to provoke his sanguinary
career of vengeance. Nor did another opportunity occur; for
we soon came to a point where the roads diverging, obliged us to
separate, and although my friendly fellow-traveller, with the
usual hospitality of the country, invited me to take up my
lodgings
at his house for the night, I was obliged to decline the
invitation
,
and we parted.
I continued my journey into the northwestern part of Illinois,
which was then just beginning to attract the attention of settlers,
and contained but few inhabitants. Delighted with this beautiful
wilderness, unspoiled by art, and retaining all its native loveliness,
and wishing to explore the lands lying between this tract and the
Wabash, I determined, on my return, to strike directly across,
through a district of country in which there were as yet no
settlements
,
of about one hundred and fifty miles in extent. I hired
an Indian guide, who was highly recommended to me, and set out
under his protection.
It is not easy to describe the sensations of a traveller,
unaccustomed
to such scenery, on first beholding the vast prairies, which
I was about to explore. Those I had heretofore seen were
comparatively
small; both are unique, and highly attractive, but as
they differ in their features and scenic effect, I shall endeavour to
describe them separately.
The smaller prairies, or those in which the plain and woodland
alternate frequently, are the most beautiful. The points of
woodland
which make into them like so many capes or promontories,
and the groves which are interspersed like islands, are in these
lesser prairies always sufficiently near to be clearly defined to
the eye, and to give the scene an interesting variety. We see
plains, varying from a few hundred acres to several miles in
extent
,
not perfectly level, but gently rolling or undulating, like the
swelling of the ocean when nearly calm. The graceful curve of
the surface is seldom broken, except when, here and there, the
eye rests upon one of those huge mounds, which are so pleasing
to the poet, and so perplexing to the antiquarian. The whole is
overspread with grass and flowers, constituting a rich and varied
carpet, in which a ground of lively green is ornamented with a
profusion of the gaudiest hues, and fringed with a rich border of
forest and thicket. Deep recesses in the edge of the timber
resemble
the bays and inlets of a lake; while occasionally a long
8
vista, opening far back into the forest, invites the eye to roam off
and refresh itself, with the calm beauty of a distant perspective.
The traveller, as he rides along over these smaller prairies,
finds his eye continually attracted to the edges of the forest, and
his imagination employed in tracing the beautiful outline, and in
finding out resemblances between these wild scenes and the most
tastefully embellished productions of art. The fairest
pleasure-grounds
,
the noblest parks of European noblemen and princes,
where millions have been expended to captivate the senses with
Elysian scenes, are but mimic representations, on a reduced
scale, of the beauties which are here spread by nature; for here
are clumps and lawns, groves and avenues, the tangled thicket,
and the solitary tree, the lengthened vista, and the secluded nook,
and all the varieties of scenic attraction, but on a plan so
extensive
,
as to offer a wide scope, and an endless succession of
changes, to the eye.
There is an air of refinement here, that wins the heart,even
here, where no human residence is seen, where no foot of man
intrudes, and where not an axe has ever trespassed on the
beautiful
domain. It is a wilderness shorn of every savage
association
,
a desert that blossoms as the rose. So different is the
feeling awakened from anything inspired by mountain or
woodland
scenery, that the instant the traveller emerges from the
forest into the prairie, he feels no longer solitary. The
consciousness
that he is travelling alone, and in a wilderness, escapes him;
and he indulges in the same pleasing sensations which are
enjoyed
by one who, having lost his way, and wandered bewildered
among the labyrinths of a savage mountain, suddenly descends
into rich and highly cultivated plains, and sees around him the
delightful indications of taste and comfort. The gay landscape
charms him. He is encompassed by the refreshing sweetness and
graceful beauty of the rural scene; and recognises at every step
some well-remembered spot, or some ideal paradise in which the
fancy had loved to wander, enlarged and beautified, and, as it
were, retouched by nature's hand. The clusters of trees so
fancifully
arranged, the forest outline so gracefully curved, seem to
have been disposed by the hand of taste, for the enjoyment of
intelligent
beings; and so complete is the illusion, that it is difficult
to dispel the belief that each avenue leads to a village, and each
grove conceals a splendid mansion.
Widely different was the prospect exhibited by the more
northern
and central districts of the State. Vast in extent, the distant
forest was either beyond the reach of the eye, or was barely
discernible
in the shapeless outline of blue, faintly impressed on the
horizon. As the smaller prairies resembled a series of larger and
lesser lakes, so these boundless plains remind one of the ocean
waste. Here and there a solitary tree, torn by the wind, stood
alone like a dismantled mast in the ocean. As I followed my
guide through this lonely region, my sensations were similar to
those of the voyager, when his bark is launched upon the sea.
Alone, in a wide waste, with my faithful pilot only, I was
dependent
on him for support, guidance, and protection. With
little
to diversify the path, and nothing to please the eye but the
carpet of verdure, which began to pall upon the sense, a feeling
of dreariness crept over mea desolation of the spirit, such as
one feels when crossed in love, or when very drowsy on a hot
afternoon, after a full dinner. But these are feelings which, like
the sea-sickness of the young mariner, are soon dispelled. I
began
to find a pleasure in gazing over this immense, unbroken
waste, in watching the horizon under the vague hope of meeting
a traveller, and in following the deer with my eyes as they
galloped
offtheir agile forms growing smaller and smaller as they
receded, until they shrunk into nothing. Sometimes I descried a
dark spot at an immense distance, and pointed it out to my
companion
with a joy like that of the seaman who discovers a sail in
the distant speck which floats on the ocean. When such an object
happened to be in the direction of our path, I watched it with
interest
as it rose and enlarged upon the visionsupposing it at one
moment to be a solitary horseman, and wondering what manner
of man he would turn out to beat another supposing it might be
a wild animal, or a wagon, or a pedestrian; until, after it had
seemed to approach for hours, I found it to be a tree.
Nor was I entirely destitute of company; for my
Pottowottomie
guide proved to be both intelligent and good-humoured; and
although his stock of English was but slender, and his habit of
taciturnity somewhat confirmed, his conversational powers, when
exerted, were quite respectable. His knowledge of the country
was extensive and accurate, so that he was able, not only to choose
the best route, but to point out all the localities. When we
halted
he kindled a fire, spread my pallet, and formed a shelter to
protect me from the weather. When we came to a stream which
was too deep to ford, he framed a raft to cross me over, with my
baggage, while he mounted my horse and plunged into the water.
Throughout the journey, his assiduities were as kind and
unremitting
as all his arrangements were sagacious and considerate.
A higher motive than the mere pecuniary reward which he
expected
for his services governed his actions. He considered
himself
my companion; not only responsible for my safety, as a
matter
of contract, but kindly interested for my comfort. A genuine
integrity of purpose, a native politeness and manliness of
deportment
,
raised him above the ordinary savage, and rendered him
not only a respectable, but an interesting man.
After travelling nearly five days without beholding a human
habitation, we arrived at the verge of a settlement on the
Wabash
.
We passed along a rich bottom, covered with huge trees,
whose limbs were hung with immense grape vines, and whose
thick shade afforded a strong contrast to the scenes we had left
behind us, and then ascending a gentle rise, stood on a high bluff
bank of the Wabash. A more secluded and beautiful spot has
seldom been seen. A small river, with a clear stream, rippling
over a rocky bed, meandered round the point on which we stood,
and then turning abruptly to the left, was lost among the
trees. The opposite shore was low, thickly wooded, and
beautifully
rich in the variety of mellow hues painted by the autumn
sun.
The spot we occupied was a slip of table land, a little higher
than the surrounding country. It had once been cleared for
cultivation
,
but was now overgrown with hazel bushes, vines, and
briars, while a few tall, leafless trunks, once the proudest oaks
of the forest, weather-beaten and blackened by fire, still adhered
tenaciously to the soil. A heap of rubbish, intermingled with
logs half burnt and nearly rotten, showed the remains of what
had once been a chimney, and indicated the spot where a cabin
had stood, the residence of human beingsbut all else had been
destroyed by time or fire. We gazed on the ruins of a desolated
homestead, but many years seemed to have rolled away since it
had been inhabited. The clearing had been of small extent;
it was now covered with a rank vegetation, which was fast
restoring
it to the dominion of the wilderness. One spot only, which
had probably been the yard in front of the little dwelling, and
had been beaten hard, was covered with a smooth green sward.
unmixed with weeds or brush; and here we stood gazing at this
desolate spot, and that beautiful river. It was but a moment,
and neither of us had broken silence, when the crack of a rifle
was heard, and my guide, uttering a dismal yell, fell at my feet.
Recovering his senses for an instant, he grasped his gun, partly
raised his body, and cast upon me a look of reproach, which I
shall never forget; and then, as if satisfied by the concern and
alarm of my countenance, and my prompt movement to assist
him, he gave me one hand, and pointing with the other towards
the woods, exclaimedBadbad, white man!take care
and expired. The aim had been unerringthe bullet had
penetrated
deep in a vital spot, and life was extinguished in a
moment
.
I was so much surprised and shocked at this fatal catastrophe,
that I stood immoveable, thoughtless of my own safety, mourning
over the stout Indian, my kind and worthy guide, who lay
weltering
in his gore, when I was startled by a slight rustling in the
bushes close behind me, and as I turned with an involuntary
shudder, a backwoodsman, rifle in hand, issued from the covert.
Advancing hastily, without the least appearance of shame or fear,
until he came to the corpse, and paying not the slightest attention
to me, he stood and gazed sternly at the fallen warrior. It was
Monson! The fierce and gloomy picture, which had been
impressed
so indelibly upon my memory, stood before me in living
presentation, his hand imbrued in blood, and his soul freshly
steeped in murder.
There's another of the cursed crew gone to his last account!
he exclaimed. He is not the first, and he shall not be the last.
It's an old debt, but it shall be paid to the last drop!
As he spoke, he gnashed his teeth, and his eyes gleamed with
the malignity of gratified revenge. Then turning to me, and
observing
the deep abhorrence with which I shrunk back, he said
gruffly,
May be, stranger, you don't like this sort of business.
Wretch  miscreantmurderer! begone! Approach me
not, I exclaimed, shrinking back in disgust and terror, and
drawing a large pistol from my belt; but, before I was aware,
the backwoodsman, with a sudden spring, caught my arm, and
wrested the weapon from me; and then remaining perfectly
calm, while I was ready to burst with rage, he proceeded:
This is a poor shooting-iron for a man to have about himit
might do for young men to tote in a settlement, but it's of no use
in the woodsno more than a shot-gun.
Scoundrel! said I, you shall repent your violence
Young man! interrupted he, very coolly, I am no
scoundrel
,
no more than yourself; you mistake, you do not know me.
Murderer! repeated I, for such I know you to be. My
life is in your power, but I dread not your vengeance! If I live,
this bloody deed shall not go unpunished!
While I was thus exhausting myself, in the expression of my
rage and horror, the more politic Monson, having possessed himself
of the Indian's gun, dropped it, together with my unlucky pistol,
on the ground, and placing one foot on them, proceeded
deliberately
to load his rifle.
Don't be alarmed, young man, said he, in reply to my last
remark, I shall not hurt a hair of your head. You cannot
provoke me to it. I never harmed a Christian man, to my
knowledge!
But although his habitual command of his temper enabled him
to treat the matter thus coolly, he was evidently under high
excitement
,
and as he finished loading his piece, he exclaimed,
See here! Then pointing to the ruins of the cabin, he
proceeded
in a hurried tone.
This was my home. Here I built a house with my own
labour. With the sweat of my brow I opened this clearing.
Here I lived with my wife, my children, and my mother. We
worked hardlived welland were happy.
His voice became choked; he paused, as if overcome by the
recollections of the past; but after a moment's hesitation, he
proceeded
with the simple and vehement eloquence of passion:
I am a rough man, stranger, but I have feelings like other
men. My blood is up now, and I will tell you a tale that will
explain this deed. One nightit was in the falljust at this
seasonI had gathered my corn, ready for shucking, the labour
of the year was done, and I was sitting by the fire with my
family, with the prospect of plenty and comfort around mewhen
I heard the Indian yell! I never was a coward, but I knew that
sound too well; and when I looked round upon the women and
helpless babes, that depended on me for protection, a cold chill
ran over me, and my heart seemed to die. I ran to the door, and
beheld my stacks in a blaze. I caught up my gunbut in a
moment a gang of yelling savages came pouring in at my door,
like so many howling wolves. I fired, and one of them fellI
caught up an axe and rushed at them with such fury that I
cleared the cabin. The vile varments then set fire to the roof,
and we saw the flames spreading around us. What could I do?
Stranger, you never were in such a fix, and you don't know
how a man feels. Here was my poor old mother, and my wife,
and my little children, unable to fight, or to escape. I burst open
the door, and rushed madly out; but they pushed me back.
The yelling wretches were determined to burn us in our house.
The blazing timbers came falling among usmy wife hung on
my neck, and called on me to save our childrenour pious old
mother prayedthe savage butchers roared, and laughed, and
mocked us. They caught my dog, that we loved as one of the
family, hung him, and then threw his carcass among us.
I grasped my axe, and rushed out againhoping to beat
them back, until the neighbours could be alarmed, and come to
our assistance. I killed several of them; but they overpowered
me, bound me, and led me up to witness the ruin of all that was
dear to me. Wifechildrenmotherall, all perished here in
the flames before my eyes. They perished in lingering torments
screaming with terrorracked with pain. I saw their agonies
heard their criesthey called on my name. Tied hand and
foot, what could I do? Oh Heaven, can I ever forget it!
The man of sorrows paused in his tragical narrative, overcome
by the tender and terrible recollections that it called forth. He
looked wildly around. Tears came to his reliefthat hard,
ferocious
misanthrope, the fountains of whose tenderness seemed to
have been long since broken and dried up, melted at the recital
of his own griefs. Nature had resumed her sway over him.
The pause was but brief; when, brushing the tears from his
rough visage, he continued:
They carried me off a prisoner. I was badly wounded, and
so heart-broken, that for three days I was helpless as a child.
Then a desire of revenge grew up in my heart, and I got strong.
I gnawed the strings they had bound me with, and escaped from
them in the night. I thought that God had spared me to be a
scourge to the savage. The war with the Indians broke out soon
afterwards, and I joined every expeditionI was foremost in
every fight; but I could not quench my thirst for the blood of
the miscreants. I swore never to forgive them, and when peace
came, I continued to make war. I have made it a rule to kill
every red-skin that came in my way; my revenge is not yet
satisfied, and so long as I have strength to whet my knife on a
stone, or ram a ball into my rifle, I shall continue to slay the
savage!
As for this fellow, he continued, I would not have
troubled
him, any where else, if I had seen him in your company.
I would not harm nor trouble any christian man, especially a
stranger. But when he came
here
, setting his cursed feet on
this
soil
stepping over the ruins of my homestead, and the ashes of
my familywhen he intruded upon me as I sat here alone,
thinking
over the fate of my poor wife and children, it was not my
nater to spare himI couldn't do it.
Let us part friends, young man, I have done you no harm;
if I have hurt your feelings, I ask your pardon. Pursue your
own way, and leave me to mine. If you have a grey-headed
mother that prays for you, a wife and children that love you
they will welcome you, and you will be happy. I am alone;
there is none to mourn with me, no one to rejoice at my coming.
When all that you cherish is torn from you in one moment, by
hellish ruffians, condemn me if you can: but not till then.That
path will lead you to a house.
PETE FEATHERTON.
Every
country has its superstitions, and will continue to have
them, so long as men are blessed with lively imaginations, and
while any portion of mankind remain ignorant of the causes of
natural phenomena. That which cannot be reconciled with
experience
,
will always be attributed to supernatural influence;
and those who know little, will imagine much more to exist than
has ever been witnessed by their own senses. I am not
displeased
with this state of things, for the journey of life would be dull
indeed, if those who travel it were confined for ever to the beaten
highway, worn smooth by the sober feet of experience. To
turnpikes
,
for our beasts of burden, I have no objection; but I cannot
consent to the erection of railways for the mind, even though the
architect be wisdom, whose ways are pleasant, and whose paths
are peace. It is sometimes agreeable to stray off into the
wilderness
which fancy creates, to recline in fairy bowers, and to
listen to the murmurs of imaginary fountains. When the beaten
road becomes tiresome, there are many sunny spots where the
pilgrim may loiter with advantagemany shady paths, whose
labyrinths may be traced with delight. The mountain, and the
vale, on whose scenery we gaze enchanted, derive new charms,
when their deep caverns and gloomy recesses are peopled with
imaginary beings.
But above all, the enlivening influence of fancy is felt, when it
illumines our firesides, giving to the wings of time, when they
grow heavy, a brighter plumage, and a more sprightly motion.
There are seasons, when the spark of life within us seems to
burn with less than its wonted vigour; the blood crawls heavily
through the veins; the contagious chillness seizes on our
companions
,
and the sluggish hours roll painfully along. Something
8*
more than a common impulse is then required to awaken the
indolent
mind, and give a new tone to the flagging spirits. If
necromancy
draws her magic circle, we cheerfully enter the ring;
if folly shakes her cap and bells, we are amused; a witch
becomes
an interesting personage, and we are even agreeably
surprised
by the companionable qualities of a ghost.
We, who live on the frontier, have little acquaintance with
imaginary beings. These gentry never emigrate; they seem to
have strong local attachments, which not even the charms of a
new country can overcome. A few witches, indeed, were
imported
into New England by the Puritans; but were so badly
used, that the whole race seems to have been disgusted with new
settlements. With them, the spirit of adventure expired, and the
weird women of the present day wisely cling to the soil of the old
countries. That we have but few ghosts will not be deemed a
matter of surprise by those who have observed how miserably
destitute we are of accommodations for such inhabitants. We
have no baronial castles, nor ruined mansions;no turrets
crowned with ivy, nor ancient abbeys crumbling into decay;
and it would be a paltry spirit, who would be content to wander
in the forest, by silent rivers and solitary swamps.
It is even imputed to us as a reproach by enlightened
foreigners
,
that our land is altogether populated with the living
descendants
of Adamcreatures with thews and sinews, who eat when
they are hungry, laugh when they are tickled, and die when they
are done living. The creatures of romance, say they, exist not
in our territory. A witch, a ghost, or a brownie, perishes in
America, as a serpent is said to die the instant it touches the
uncongenial
soil of Ireland. This is true, only in part. If we have
no ghosts, we are not without miracles. Wonders have happened
in these United States. Mysteries have occurred in the valley
of the Mississippi. Supernatural events have transpired on the
borders of the beautiful stream; and in order to rescue my
country from undeserved reproach, I shall proceed to narrate an
authentic history, which I received from the lips of the party
principally concerned.
A clear morning had succeeded a stormy night in December;
the snow laid ankle-deep upon the ground, and glittered on the
boughs, while the bracing air, and the cheerful sunbeams,
invigorated
the animal creation, and called forth the tenants of the
forest from their warm lairs and hidden lurking-places.
The inmates of a small cabin on the margin of the Ohio were
commencing with the sun the business of the day. A stout,
rawboned
forester plied his keen axe, and, lugging log after log,
erected a pile on the ample hearth, sufficiently large to have
rendered
the last honours to the stateliest ox. A female was paying
her morning visit to the cow-yard, where a numerous herd of
cattle claimed her attention. The plentiful breakfast followed;
corn-bread, milk, and venison, crowned the oaken board, while a
tin coffee-pot of ample dimensions supplied the beverage which is
seldom wanting at the morning repast of the substantial American
farmer.
The breakfast over, Mr. Featherton reached down a long rifle
from the rafters, and commenced certain preparations, fraught
with danger to the brute inhabitants of the forest. The lock was
carefully examined, the screws tightened, the pan wiped, the flint
renewed, and the springs oiled; and the keen eye of the
backwoodsman
glittered with an ominous lustre, as its glance rested
on the destructive engine. His blue-eyed partner, leaning fondly
on her husband's shoulder, essayed those coaxing and captivating
blandishments, which every young wife so well understands, to
detain her husband from the contemplated sport. Every pretext
was urged with affectionate pertinacity, which female ingenuity
could supply:the wind whistled bleakly over the hills, the snow
lay deep in the valleys, the deer would surely not venture abroad
in such bitter cold weather, the adventurous hunter might get his
toes frost-bitten, and her own hours would be sadly lonesome in
his absence. He smiled in silence at the arguments of his bride,
for such she was, and continued his preparations, with the cool,
but good-natured determination of one who is not to be turned
from his purpose.
He was indeed a person with whom such arguments, except
the last, would not be very likely to prevail. Mr. Peter
Featherton
,
or as he was familiarly called by all who knew him, Pete
Featherton, was a bold, rattling Kentuckian, of twenty-five, who
possessed the characteristic peculiarities of his countrymengood
and evilin a striking degree. His red hair and sanguine
complexion
,
announced an ardent temperament; his tall form, and
bony limbs, indicated an active frame inured to hardships; his
piercing eye and high cheek bones, evinced the keenness and
resolution
of his mind. He was adventurous, frank, and social
boastful, credulous, illiterate, and at times wonderfully addicted
to the marvellous. His imagination was a warm and fruitful
soil, in which tall oaks from little acorns grew, and his
vocabulary
was overstocked with superlatives. He loved his wife
no mistake about thatbut next to her his affections entwined
themselves about his gun, and expanded over his horse; he was
true to his friends, never missed an election day, turned his back
upon a frolie, nor affected to dislike a social glass.
He believed that the best qualities of all countries were
combined
in Kentucky; and had the most whimsical manner of
expressing
his national attachments. He was firmly convinced that
the battle of the Thames was the most sanguinary conflict of the
agea raal reg'lar skrimmage,and extolled Colonel Dick
Johnson as a severe old colt. He would admit freely that
Napoleon was a great geniusMetternich, Castlereagh, and
them fellows knew a thing or two, but then they were no
part of a priming to Henry Clay.
When entirely at himselfto use his own languagethat
is to say, when duly sober, Pete was friendly and rational,
courteous
and considerate, and a better tempered fellow never
shouldered
a rifle. But he was a social man, who was liable to be
overtaken, and let him get a glass too much, and there was
no end to his extravagance. Then it was that his genius bloomed
and brought forth strange boasts, and strong oaths, his loyalty to
old Kentuck waxed warm, and his faith in his horse, his gun,
and his own manhood grew into idolatry. Always bold and
self-satisfied
,
and habitually energetic in the expression of his
predelictions
,
he now became invested with the agreeable properties of
the snapping-turtle, the alligator, and the steamboat, and gifted
with the most affable and affectionate spirit of auto-biography.
It was now that he would dwell upon his own bodily powers and
prowess, with the enthusiasm of a devotee, and as the climax of
this rhetorical display, would slap his hands together, spring
perpendicularly
into the air, and after uttering a yell worthy of the
stoutest Winnebago, swear that he was the best man in the
country, and could whip his weight in wild cats, no two
ways about ithe was not afraid of no man, no way you
could fix it; and finally, after many other extravagancies, he
would urge, with no gentle asseveration, his ability to ride
through a crab-apple orchard on a streak of lightning.
In addition to all this, which one would think was enough for
any reasonable man, Pete would sometimes brag that he had the
best gun, the prettiest wife, the best-looking sister, and the fastest
nag, in all Kentuck; and that no man dare say to the contrary.
It is but justice to remark, that there was more truth in this last
boast, than is usually found on such occasions, and that Pete
had good reason to be proud of his horse, his gun, and his lady
love.
These, however, were the happy moments, which are few and
far between; they were the brilliant inspirations, playing like
the lightning in an overheated atmosphere,gleaming over the
turbid stream of existence, as the meteor flashes through the
gloom of the night. When the fit was off, Pete was a quiet,
good-natured
,
listless soul, as one would see on a summer's day
strolling about with a grave aspect, a drawling, and a deliberate
gait, a stoop of the shoulders, and a kind of general relaxation
of the whole outward and inward manin a state of entire
freedom
from restraint, reflection, and want, and without any impulse
strong enough to call forth his latent manhoodas the panther,
with whom he often compared himself, when his appetite for food
is sated, sleeps calmly in his lair, or wanders harmlessly through
his native thickets.
Our hero was a farmer, or as the very appropriate phrase is,
made a
crap
on his own landfor besides making a crop he
performed but few of the labours of the husbandman. While
planting his corn, tending it, and gathering in the harvest, he
worked with a good will; but these, thanks to a prolific soil, and
a free country, were all his toils, and they occupied not half of
the year, the remainder of which was spent in the more manly
and gentlemanly employments of hunting, attending elections,
and officiating at horse races. He was a rare hand at a
shucking
,
a house raising, or a log rolling; merry and strong, he
worked like a young giant, and it was worth while to hear the
gladsome tones of his clear voice, and the inspiring sound of his
loud laugh; while the way he handled the axe, the beauty and
keenness of the implement, the weight and precision of the blows,
and the gracefulness of the action, were such as are not seen
except
in the wilderness, where chopping is an accomplishment
as well as the most useful of labours.
It will readily be perceived, that our hunter was not one who
could be turned from his purpose by the prospect of danger or
fatigue; and a few minutes sufficed to complete his
preparations
.
His feet were cased in moccasins, and his legs in
wrappers
of dressed deerskin; and he was soon accoutred with a
powder
horn, quaintly carved all over with curious devices,an
ample pouch with flints, patches, balls, and other fixensand
a hunter's knife,and throwing Brown Bess, for so he called
his rifle, over his shoulder, he sallied forth.
But in passing a store hard by, which supplied the country
with gunpowder, whiskey, and other necessaries, as well as with
the luxuries of tea, sugar, coffee, calico, calomel, and chandlery,
he was hailed by one of the neighbours, who invited him to light
off and take something. Pete said he had no occasion, but
rather than be nice, he dismounted, and joined a festive circle,
among whom the cup was circulating freely. Here he was soon
challenged to swap rifles, and being one of those who could not
stand a banter, he bantered back again, without the least
intention
of parting with his favourite weapon. Making offers, like
a skilful diplomatist, which he knew would not be accepted, and
feigning great eagerness to accede to any reasonable proposition,
while inwardly resolved to reject all, he magnified the perfections
of Brown Bess.
She can do any thing but talk, said he. If she had legs
she could hunt by herself. It is a pleasure to
tote
herI
naterrally
believe there is not a rifle south of Green river, that can
throw a ball so far, or so true. I can put a bullet in that tree,
down the road, a mile off.
You can't do it, PeteI'll bet a treat for the whole
company
.
Nosaid the hunter. I could do itbut I don't want to
strain my gun.
These discussions consumed much time and much whiskey
for the rule on such occasions is, that he who rejects an offer to
trade, must treat the company, and thus every point in the
negociation
costs a pint of spirits.
At length, bidding adieu to his companions, Pete struck into
the forestit was getting late, and he must look about pretty
peart, he said, to get a venison before night. Lightly crushing
the snow beneath his active feet, he beat up the coverts, and
traversed all the accustomed haunts of the deer. He mounted
every hill, and descended into every valleynot a thicket
escaped
the penetrating glance of his practised eye. Fruitless labour!
not a deer was to be seen. Pete marvelled at this unusual
circumstance
,
as the deer were very abundant in this
neighbourhood
,
and no one knew better where to look for them than
himself
.
But what surprised him still more, was, that the woods were
less familiar to him than formerly. He knew them like a book.
He thought he was acquainted with every tree within ten miles of
his cabin; but now, although he certainly had not wandered so
far, some of the objects around him seemed strange, while others
again were faintly recognized; and there was, altogether, a
singular
confusion in the character of the scenery, which was
partly
familiar, and partly new; or rather, in which many of the
component parts were separately well known, but were so mixed
up and changed in relation to each other, as to baffle even the
knowledge of an expert woodsman.
The more he looked, the more he was bewildered. Had such
a thing been possible, he would have thought himself a lost man.
He came to a stream which had heretofore rolled to the west, but
now its course pointed to the east; and the shadows of the tall
trees, which, according to Pete's experience and philosophy,
ought at noon to fall towards the north, all pointed to the south.
He looked at his right and his left hands, somewhat puzzled to
know which was which; then scratched his headbut scratching
the head, though a good thing in its way, will not always get a
man out of a scrape. He cast his eye upon his own shadow,
which had never deceived himwhen lo! a still more
extraordinary
phenomenon presented itself. It was travelling round him
like the shade on a dialonly a great deal faster, as it veered
round to all the points of the compass in the course of a single
minute. Mr. Peter Featherton was in a bad fix.
It was very evident too, from the dryness of the snow, and the
brittleness of the twigs, which snapped off as he brushed his way
through the thickets, that the weather was intensely cold; yet the
perspiration was rolling in large drops from his brow. He
stopped
at a clear spring, and thrusting his hands into the cold water,
attempted to carry a portion of it to his lips; but the element
recoiled
and hissed, as if his hands and lips had been composed of
red hot iron. Pete felt quite puzzled when he reflected on all
these contradictions in the aspect of nature; and began to
consider
what act of wickedness he had been guilty of, which could
have rendered him so hateful, that the deer fled at his approach,
the streams turned back, and the shadows fell the wrong way, or
danced round their centre.
He began to grow alarmed, and would have liked to turn back,
but was ashamed to betray such weakness, even to himself; and
being naturally bold, he resolutely kept on his way. At last, to
his great joy he espied the tracks of deer imprinted on the snow;
they were fresh signsand, dashing upon the trail, with the
alacrity
of a well-trained hound, he pursued, in hopes of soon
overtaking
the game. Presently he discovered the tracks of a man,
who had struck the same trail in advance of him, and supposing
it to be one of his neighbours, he quickened his pace, as well to
gain a companion, which in the present state of his feelings he so
much needed, as to share the spoil with his fellow hunter.
Indeed
,
in his present situation and condition of mind, Pete thought
he would be willing to give half of what he was worth, for the
sight of a human face.
I don't like the signs, no how, said he, casting a rapid glance
around him; and then throwing his eyes downwards at his own
shadow, which had ceased its rotatory motion, and was now
swinging backward and forward like a pendulumI don't like
the signs, no way they can be fixed.
You are not scared, are you, Pete? he continued, smiling
at the oddity of such a question.
Oh no, bless your heart, Mr. Featherton, I'm not scaredI'm
not of that breed of dogsthere's no back out in mebut then I
must sayto speak sentimentallythat I feel sort o' jubusI do
so. But I'll soon see whether other people's shadows act the fool
like mine.
Upon further observation, there appeared to be something
peculiar
in the human tracks before him, which were evidently made
by a pair of feet which were not fellowsor were
odd fellows
for one of them was larger than the other. As there was no
person
in the settlement who was thus deformed, Pete began to doubt
whether it might not be the devil, who in borrowing shoes to
conceal
his cloven hoofs might have got those that did not match.
He stopped, and scratched his head, as many a learned philosopher
has done, when placed between the horns of a dilemma less
perplexing
than that which now vexed the spirit of our hunter. It
was said long ago, that there is a tide in the affairs of men; and
although our good friend Pete had never seen this sentiment in black
and white, yet it is one of those truths, which are written in the
heart of every reasonable being, and was only copied by the poet,
from the great book of nature, a source from which he was a
great borrower. It readily occurred to Pete on this occasion;
and as he had enjoyed through life an uninterrupted tide of
success
,
he reflected whether the stream of fortune might not have
changed its course, like the brooks he had crossed, whose waters,
for some sinister reason, seemed to be crawling up-hill.
He stopped, drew out his handkerchief, and wiped the
perspiration
from his brow. This thing of being scared, said he,
makes a man feel mighty queerthe way it brings the sweat
out is curious! And again it occurred to him, that it was
incumbent
on him to see the end of the adventure, as otherwise he
would show a want of that courage, which he had been taught to
consider as the chief of the cardinal virtues.
I can't back out, said he, I never was raised to it, no how;
and if the devil's a mind to hunt in this range, he shan't have all
the game.
Then falling into the sentimental vein, as one naturally does
from the heroic: Here's this hankercher, that my Polly
hemmed
for me, and marked the two first letters of my name on it
P. for Pete and F. for Feathertonwould she do the like of that
for a coward? Could I ever look in her pretty face again, if I
was mean enough to be scared? NoI'll go aheadlet what
will come.
He soon overtook the person in advance of him, who, as he had
suspected, was a perfect stranger. He had halted and was
quietly
seated on a log, gazing at the sun, when our hunter
approached
,
and saluted him with the usual hearty, How are you,
stranger
?
The person addressed made no reply, but continued to
gaze at the sun, as if totally unconscious that any other
individual
was present. He was a small, thin, old man, with a grey
beard of about a month's growth, and a long sallow melancholy
visage, while a tarnished suit of snuff-coloured clothes, cut after
the quaint fashion of some religious sect, hung loosely about his
shrivelled person.
Our bold backwoodsman, somewhat awed, now coughed, threw
the butt end of his gun heavily upon the frozen ground, and, still
failing to elicit any attention, quietly seated himself on the other
end of the log occupied by the stranger. Both remained silent
for some minutesPete with open mouth, and glaring eyeballs,
observing his companion with mute astonishment, and the latter
looking at the sun.
It's a warm day, this, said Pete, at length, passing his hand
across his brow, as he spoke, and sweeping off the heavy drops
of perspiration that hung there. But receiving no answer, he
began to get nettled. He thought himself not civilly treated.
His native assurance, which had been damped by the mysterious
deportment of the person who sat before him, revived. One
man's as good as anotherthought he; and screwing up his
courage to the sticking point, he arose, approached the silent
man, and slapping him on the back, exclaimed
Well, stranger! don't the sun look mighty droll away out
there in the north?
As the heavy hand fell on his shoulder, the stranger slowly
turned his face towards Pete, who recoiled several paces,then
rising without paying the abashed hunter any further attention,
he began to pursue the trail of the deer. Pete prepared to
follow
,
when the other turning upon him with a stern glance,
enquired
:
Who are you tracking?
Not you, replied the hunter, whose alarm had subsided
when the enemy began to retreat; and whose pride, piqued by
the abruptness with which he had been treated, enabled him to
assume his usual boldness of manner.
Why do you follow this trail, then?
I trail deer.
You must not pursue them further, they are mine!
The sound of the stranger's voice broke the spell, which had
hung over Peter's natural impudence, and he now shouted
Your
deer! that's droll too! who ever heard of a man
claiming
the deer in the woods!
Provoke me not,I tell you they are mine.
Well, nowyou're a comical chap! Why stranger,the
deer are wild! They're jist nateral to the woods here, the same
the timber. You might as well say the wolves and the painters
are yours, and all the rest of the wild varments.
The tracks you behold here, are those of wild deer,
undoubtedly
but
they are mine. I routed them from their bed, and am
driving them home.
Homewhere is your home? inquired Pete, at the same
time casting an inquisitive glance at the stranger's feet.
To this home question no reply was given, and Pete, fancying
that he had got the best of the altercation, pushed his advantage,
adding sneeringly
Could'nt you take a pack or two of wolves along? We can
spare you a small gang. It is mighty wolfy about here.
If you follow any further it is at your peril, said the
stranger
.
You don't reckon I'm to be skeered, do you? If you do, you
are barking up the wrong tree. There's no back out in none of
my breed, no how. You must'nt come over them words agin,
stranger.
I repeat
You had best not repeatI allow no man to do that to me
interrupted the irritated woodsman, You must not imitate the
like of that. I'm Virginy born, and Kentucky raised, and drot
my skin, if I take the like of that from any manno, Sir!
Desist, rash man, from altercationI despise your threats!
The same to you, Sir!
I tell you what, stranger! continued Pete, endeavouring to
imitate the coolness of the other, as to the vally of a deer or
twoI don't vally them to the tantamount of this here cud of
tobacco
;
but I'm not to be backed out of my tracks. So keep off,
strangerdon't come fooling about me. I might hurt you. I
feel mighty wolfy about the head and shoulders. Keep off, I say,
or you might run agin a snag.
With this the hunter squared himself, and sot his triggers,
fully determined either to hunt the disputed game, or be
vanquished
in combat. To his surprise, the stranger, without
appearing
to notice his preparations, advanced and blew with his
breath upon his rifle.
Your gun is charmed! said he. From this day forward
you will kill no deer.
So saying, that mysterious old man, with the most provoking
coolness, resumed his way; while Pete remained bewildered;
and fancied that he smelt brimstone.
Pete Featherton remained a moment or two lost in confusion.
He then thought he would pursue the stranger, and punish him
as well for his threats, as for the insult intended to his gun; but
a little reflection induced him to change his decision. The
confident
manner in which that singular being had spoken, together
with a kind of vague assurance in his own mind, that the spell
had really taken effect, so unmanned and stupefied him, that he
quietly took the back track, and strode homewards. He had
not gone far, when he saw a fine buck, half concealed among the
hazel bushes which beset his path, and resolved to know at once
how matters stood between Brown Bess and the pretended
conjurer
,
he took a deliberate aim, fired,and away bounded the
buck unharmed!
With a heavy heart, our mortified forester re-entered his own
dwelling, and replaced his degraded weapon in its accustomed
berth under the rafters.
You have been long gone, said his wife, but where is the
venison you promised me?
Pete was constrained to confess that he had shot nothing.
That is strange! said the lady, I never knew you fail
before.
Pete framed twenty excuses. He had felt unwellhis gun
was out of fixit was a bad day for huntingthe moon was not
in the right placeand there were no deer stirring.
Had not Pete been a very young husband, he would have
known that the vigilant eye of a wife is not to be decived by
feigned apologies. Female curiosity never sleeps; and the love
of a devoted wife is the most sincere and the most absorbing of
human passions. Pretty Mrs. Featherton saw, at a glance, that
something had happened to her helpmate, more than he was
willing
to confess; and being quite as tenacious as himself, in her
reluctance against being backed out of her tracks, she
determined
to bring her inferior moiety to auricular confession, and
advanced firmly to her object, until Pete was compelled to
own, That he believed Brown Bess was, somehowsort o'
charmed.
Now, Mr. Featherton! remonstrated his sprightly bride,
leaning fondly on his shoulder, and parting the long red locks on
his foreheadare you not ashamed to tell me such a tale as
that? Charmed indeed! Ah well, I know how it is. You have
been down at the store, shooting for half pints!
No, indeed replied the husband emphatically, I wish I
may be kissed to death, if I've pulled a trigger for a drop of
liquor this day.
Ah, Peterwhat a sad evasion was that! Surely the
adversary
when he blew his breathsadly sulphureous of smellupon
thy favourite gun, breathed into thee the spirit of lying, of which
he is the father. Mrs. Featherton saw farther into a millstone
than he was aware ofbut she kept her own counsel.
I believe you, Peter,you did not
shoot
for itbut do now
that's a dear good soul!tell me where you have been, and what
has happened? You are not wellor something is wrongfor
never did Pete Featherton and Brown Bess fail to get a venison
any day in the year.
Soothed by this well-timed compliment, and not unwilling to
have the aid of counsel in this trying emergency, and to apply to
his excited spirit the balm of conjugal sympathy, Pete narrated
minutely to his wife all the particulars of his meeting with the
mysterious stranger. The lady was all attention; but was as
much wonder-struck as Pete himself. She had heard of spells
being cast upon guns, and so had Peteroftenbut then neither
of them had ever known such a case, in their own experience;
and although she had recipes for pickling fruit, and preserving
life, and preventing various maladies, she knew of no remedy
which would remove the spell from a rifle. As she could give no
sage advice, she prescribed sage tea, bathing the feet, and going
to bed, and Pete submitted passively to all thisnot perceiving,
however, how it could possibly affect his gun.
When Pete awoke the next morning, the events which we have
described appeared to him as a dream; indeed, he had been
dreaming of them all night, and it was somewhat difficult to
unravel
the tangled thread of recollection, so as to separate the
realities of the day from the illusions of the pillow. But
resolving
to know the truth, he seized his gun, and hastened to the
woods. Alas! every experiment produced the same vexatious
result. The gun was charmed! No two ways about that!
It was too true to make a joke of; and the hunter stalked
harmlessly
through the forest.
Day after day he went forth, and returned with no better
success
.
The very deer became sensible of his inoffensiveness, and
would raise their heads, and gaze mildly at him as he passed; or
throw back their antlers, and bound carelessly across his path.
Day after day, and week after week, passed without bringing any
change; and Pete began to feel very ridiculously. A harmless
mana fellow with a gun, that could not shoot! he could imagine
no situation more miserable than his own. To walk through the
woods, to see the game, to come within gun-shot of it, and yet to
be unable to kill a deer, seemed to be the height of human
wretchedness. He felt as if he was the meanest kind of a
white man. There was a littleness, an insignificance, attached
to the idea of not being able to kill a deer, which, to Pete's mind,
was downright disgrace. More than once, he was tempted to
throw the gun into the river; but the excellence of the weapon,
and the recollection of former exploits, restrained him; and he
continued to stroll through the woods, firing now and then at a fat
buck, under the hope that the charm would expire some time or
other, by its own limitation; but the fat bucks continued to treat
him with a familiarity amounting to contempt, and to frisk
fearlessly
in his path.
At length Pete bethought him of a celebrated Indian doctor,
who lived at no great distance. We do not care to say much of
doctors, as they are a touchy raceand shall therefore touch
upon this one briefly. An Indian doctor is not necessarily a
descendant of the Aborigines. The title, it is true, originates
from the confidence which many of our countrymen repose in
the medical skill of the Indian tribes. But to make an Indian
doctor a red skin is by no means indispensable. To have been
taught by a savage, to have seen one, or, at all events, to have
heard of one, is all that is necessary, to enable any individual to
practise this lucrative and popular branch of the healing art.
Neither is any great proficiency in literature requisite; it is
important only to be expert in spell-ing. Your Indian doctor is
one who practises without a diplomathe only degree his exhibits,
is a high degree of confidence. He neither nauseates the
stomach
with odious drugs, nor mars the fair proportions of nature
with the sanguinary lancet. He believes in the sympathy which
is supposed to exist between the body and the mind, which, like
the two arms of a syphon, always preserve a corresponding
relation
to each other; and the difference between him and the
regular
physiciancalled in the vernacular of the frontier, the
marcury
doctoris that they operate at different points of the same
figurethe one practising on the immaterial spirit, while the
other grapples with the bones and muscles. I cannot determine
which is right; but must award to the Indian doctor at least this
advantage, that his art is the most widely beneficial; for while
your doctor of medicine restores a lost appetite, his rival can, in
addition, recover a strayed or stolen horse. If the former can
bring back the faded lustre to a fair maiden's cheeks, the latter
remove the spell from a churn or a rifle. The dyspeptic and the
dropsical may hie to the disciples of Rush and Wistar, but the
crossed-in-love, and lack-a-daysical, find a charm in the
practitioner
who professes to follow nature.
To a sage of this order, did Pete disclose his misfortune, and
apply for relief. The doctor examined the gun, and looked wise;
and having measured the calibre of the bore, with a solemnity
which was as imposing as it was unquestionably proper on so
serious
an occasion, directed the applicant to come again.
At the appointed time, the hunter returned, and received from
the wise man two balls, one of pink, the other of a silver hue.
The doctor instructed him to load his piece with one of these
bullets
,
which he pointed out, and proceed through the woods to a
certain secluded hollow, at the head of which was a spring. Here
he would see a white fawn, at which he was to shoot. It would
be wounded, but would escape, and he was to pursue its trail,
until
he found a buck, which he was to kill with the other ball. If
he accomplished all this accurately, the charm would be broken;
but success would depend upon his having faith, keeping up his
courage, and firing with precision.
Pete, who was well acquainted with all the localities, carefully
pursued the route which had been indicated, treading lightly
along, sometimes elated with the prospect of speedily breaking
the spell, and restoring his beloved gun to usefulness and
respectability
sometimes
doubting the skill of the doctoradmiring the
occult knowledge of men who could charm and uncharm deadly
weaponsand ashamed alternatively of his doubts and his belief.
At length he reached the lonely glen; and his heart bounded with
delight, as he beheld the white fawn quietly grazing by the
fountain
.
The ground was open, and he was unable to get within his
usual distance, before the fawn raised her delicate head, looked
timidly around, and snuffed the breeze, as if conscious of the
approach
of danger. Pete trembled with excitementhis heart
palpitated
.
It was a long shot and a bad chancebut he could not
advance a step further, without danger of starting the gameand
Brown Bess could carry a ball farther than that, with fatal effect.
Luck's a lord, said he, as he drew the gun up to his face,
took a deliberate aim, and pulled the trigger. The fawn bounded
aloft at the report, and then darted away through the brush, while
the hunter hastened to examine the signs. To his great joy he
found the blood profusely scattered; and now flushed with the
confidence of success, he stoutly rammed down the other ball, and
pursued the trail of the wounded fawn. Long did he trace the
crimson drops upon the snow, without beholding the promised
victim
.
Hill after hill he climbed, vale after vale he passed
searching
every thicket with penetrating eyes; and he was about to
renounce
the chase, the wizard, and the gun, when lo!directly
in his path, stood a noble buck, with numerous antlers branching
over his fine head!
Aha! my jolly fellow! I've found you at last! exclaimed
the delighted hunter, you are the very chap I've been looking
after. Your blood shall wipe off the disgrace from my charming
Bess, that never hung fire, burned priming, nor missed the mark
in her born days, till that vile abominable varment blowed his
brimstone breath on her! Here goes
He shot the buck. The spell was brokenBrown Bess was
restored to favour, and Pete Featherton never again wanted
venison
.